UNIVERSITE 



UNIVERSITY 




LIBRA RIES 



3 9007 0407 7980 3 



16- 



LEITH, PROF. T. H. 
4 Meadow Lane 
Donvers, Massachusetts 



Date Due 






rM:— ^ ^ — 








Pit , c 

































































York Form — Cooper Graphics 



THE MACMILLAN COMPANY 

NEW YORK • BOSTON • CHICAGO • DALLAS 
ATLANTA - SAN FRANCISCO 

MACMILLAN AND CO., Limited 

LONDON • BOMBAY - CALCUTTA • MADRAS 
MELBOURNE 

THE MACMILLAN COMPANY 
OF CANADA, Limited 

TORONTO 



THE LOGIC OF 
MODERN PHYSICS 



BY 

p. W. BRIDGMAN 

HOLLIS PROFESSOR OF MATHEMATICS AND NATURAL HISTORY 
IN HARVARD UNIVERSITY 



THE MACMITXAN COMPANY 



Copyright, 1927, 
By the MACMILLAN COMPANY. 



All rights reserved — no part of this book 
may be reproduced in any form without per- 
mission in writing from the publisher, except 
by a reviewer who wishes to quote brief pas- 
sages in connection with a review written 
for inclusion in magazine or newspaper. 

Set up and electrotyped. 
Published April, 1927. 
Sixth Printing, 1951 



PRINTED IN THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA 



PREFACE 



This excursion into the field of fundamental criti- 
cism by one whose activities have hitherto been con- 
fined almost entirely to experiment is not evidence of 
senile decay, as might be cynically assumed. I have 
always, throughout all my experimental work, felt 
an imperative need of a better understanding of the 
foundations of our physical thought and have for a 
long time made more or less unsystematic attempts to 
reach such an understanding. Only now, however, 
has a half sabbatical year given me leisure to attempt 
a more or less orderly exposition. 

In spite of previous writings on the broad funda- 
mentals by Clifford, Stallo, Mach, and Poincare, to 
mention only a few, I believe a new essay of this crit- 
ical character needs no apology. For entirely apart 
from the question of whether many of the points of 
view of these essays can be maintained, the discovery 
of new facts in the domain of relativity and quantum 
theory has shifted the center of interest and emphasis. 
All the quite recent activity with the new quantum 
mechanics seems to call for a new examination of 
fundamental matters which shall recognize, at least 
by implication, the existence of the special phenom- 
ena of the quantum domain. However, the necessity 
for re-examination does not mean at all that many of 

V 



vi PREFACE 

tlie results of previous criticism may not still be 
accepted ; some of these results have become so thor- 
oughly incorporated into physical thinking that wc 
can assume them without mention. Thus the funda- 
mental attitude of this essay is empiricism, which is 
now justified as the attitude of the physicist in large 
part by the inquiry into the physiological origin of 
our concepts of space, time, and mechanics with 
which the previous essays were largely concerned. 

None of the previous essays have consciously or 
immediately affected the details of this ; in fact I have 
not read any of them within several years. If pas- 
sages here recall passages already written, it is be- 
cause the ideas have been assimilated and the precise 
origin forgotten; it is probably worth while to let 
such passages stand without revision, because such 
ideas gain in plausibility through having been found 
acceptable to independent thought. 

I am much indebted to Professor R. F. Alfred 
Hoernle of the Department of Philosophy of Johan- 
nesburg University, South Africa, for suggesting sev- 
eral modifications to make the text more acceptable 
to a philosopher, and slight amplifications for the 
benefit of readers not familiar with all the details of 
recent technical developments in physics. 



INTRODUCTION 

One of the most noteworthy movements in recent 
physics is a change of attitude toward what may be 
called the interpretative aspect of physics. It is 
being increasingly recognized, both in the writings 
and the conversation of physicists, that the world o£ 
experiment is not understandable without some ex- 
amination of the purpose of physics and of the nature 
of its fundamental concepts. It is no new thing to 
attempt a more critical understanding of the nature 
of physics, but until recently all such attempts have 
been regarded with a certain suspicion or even some- 
times contempt. The average physicist is likely to 
deprecate his own concern with such questions, and 
is inclined to dismiss the speculations of fellow physi- 
cists with the epithet ^'metaphysical." This attitude 
has no doubt had a certain justification in the utter 
unintelligibility to the physicist of many metaphys- 
ical speculations and the sterility of such speculations 
in yielding physical results. However, the growing 
reaction favoring a better understanding of the inter- 
pretative fundamentals of physics is not a pendulum 
swing of the fashion of thought toward metaphysics, 
originating in the upheaval of moral values produced 
by the great war, or anything of the sort, but is a 

vii 



viii 



INTRODUCTION 



reaction absolutely forced upon us by a rapidly in- 
creasing array of cold experimental facts. 

This reaction, or rather new movement, was with- 
out doubt initiated by the restricted theory of rela- 
tivity of Einstein. Before Einstein, an ever increas- 
ing number of experimental facts concerning bodies 
in rapid motion required increasingly complicated 
modifications in our naive notions in order to pre- 
serve self-consistency, until Einstein showed that 
everything could be restored again to a wonderful 
simplicity by a slight change in some of our funda- 
mental concepts. The concepts which were most 
obviously touched by Einstein were those of space 
and time, and much of the writing consciously in- 
spired by Einstein has been concerned with these con- 
cepts. But that experiment compels a critique of 
much more than the concepts of space and time is 
made increasingly evident by all the new facts being 
discovered in the quantum realm. 

The situation presented to us by these new quan- 
tum facts is two-fold. In the first place, all these 
experiments are concerned with things so small as 
to be forever beyond the possibility of direct experi- 
ence, so that we have the problem of translating the 
evidence of experiment into other language. Thus 
we observe an emission line in a spectroscope and 
may infer an electron jumping from one energy level 
to another in an atom. In the second place, we have 
the problem of understanding the translated experi- 
mental evidence. Now of course every one knows 
that this problem is making us the greatest difficulty. 



INTRODUCTION 



ix 



The experimental facts are so utterly different from 
those of our ordinary experience that not only do we 
apparently have to give up generalizations from past 
experience as broad as the field equations of electro- 
dynamics, for instance, but it is even being questioned 
whether our ordinary forms of thought are applic- 
able in the new domain; it is often suggested, for 
example, that the concepts of space and time break 
down. 

The situation is rapidly becoming acute. Since I 
began writing this essay, there has been a striking 
increase in critical activity inspired by the new quan- 
tum mechanics of 1925-26, and it is common to hear 
expositions of the new ideas prefaced by analysis of 
what experiment really gives to us or what our funda- 
mental concepts really mean. The change in ideas is 
now so rapid that a number of the statements of this 
essay are already antiquated as expressions of the 
best current opinion ; however I have allowed these 
statements to stand, since the fundamental arguments 
are in nowise affected and we have no reason to think 
that present best opinions are in any way final. We 
have the impression of being in an important forma- 
tive period ; if we are, the complexion of physics for 
a long time in the future will be determined by our 
present attitude toward fundamental questions of in- 
terpretation. To meet this situation it seems to me 
that something more is needed than the hand-to- 
mouth philosophy that is now growing up to meet 
special emergencies, something approaching more 
closely to a systematic philosophy of all physics 



X 



INTRODUCTION 



which shall cover the experimental domains already 
consolidated as well as those which are now making 
us so much trouble. It is the attempt of this essay 
to give a more or less inclusive critique of all physics. 
Our problem is the double one of understanding what 
we are trying to do and what our ideals should be in 
physics, and of understanding the nature of the struc- 
ture of physics as it now exists. These two ends are 
together furthered by an analysis of the fundamental 
concepts of physics; an understanding of the con- 
cepts we now have discloses the present structure of 
physics and a realization of what the concepts should 
be involves the ideals of physics. This essay will be 
largely concerned with the fundamental concepts; it 
will appear that almost all the concepts can profit 
from re-examination. 

The material of this essay is largely obtained by 
observation of the actual currents of opinion in phys- 
ics; much of what I have to say is more or less com- 
mon property and doubtless every reader will find 
passages that he will feel have been taken out of his 
own mouth. On certain broad tendencies in present 
day physics, however, I have put my own interpre- 
tation, and it is more than likely that this interpreta- 
tion will be unacceptable to many. But even if not 
acceptable, I hope that the stimulus of combatting 
the ideas offered here may be of value. 

Certain limitations will have to be set to our 
inquiry in order to keep it within manageable com- 
pass. It is of course the merest truism that all our 
experimental knowledge and our understanding of 



INTRODUCTION xi 

nature is impossible and non-existent apart from our 
own mental processes, so that strictly speaking no 
aspect of psychology or epistemology is without per- 
tinence. Fortunately we shall be able to get along 
with a more or less naive attitude toward many of 
these matters. We shall accept as significant our 
common sense judgment that there is a world external 
to us, and shall limit as far as possible our inquiry 
to the behavior and interpretation of this ^'externaP' 
world. We shall rule out inquiries into our states of 
consciousness as such. In spite, however, of the best 
intentions, we shall not be able to eliminate com- 
pletely considerations savoring of the metaphysical, 
because it is evident that the nature of our thinking 
mechanism essentially colors any picture that we can 
form of nature, and we shall have to recognize that 
unavoidable characteristics of any outlook of ours are 
imposed in this way. 



CONTENTS 



PAGE 



Preface v 

Introduction vii 

CHAPTER 

I. Broad Points of View i 

New Kinds of Experience Always Possible . . 2 
The Operational Character of Concepts ... 3 
Einstein's Contribution in Changing Our Atti- 
tude toward Concepts 3 

Detailed Discussion of the Concept of Length . 9 

The Relative Character of Knowledge ... 25 

Meaningless Questions 28 

General Comments on the Operational Point of 

View 31 

II. Other General Considerations 33 

The Approximate Character of Empirical Knowl- 
edge 33 

Explanations and Mechanisms 37 

Models and Constructs 52 

The Role of Mathematics in Physics .... 60 

III. Detailed Consideration of Various Concepts 

OF Physics 66 

The Concept of Space 66 

The Concept of Time 68 

The Causality Concept 80 

The Concept of Identity 91 

The Concept of Velocity 97 

The Concepts of Force and Mass 102 

The Concept of Energy 108 

The Concepts of Thermodynamics . . . . 117 

Electrical Concepts 13 1 

xiii 



xiv CONTENTS 

PAGE 

The Nature of Light and the Concepts of Relativity 150 

Other Relativity Concepts 166 

Rotational Motion and Relativity 178 

Quantum Concepts 186 

CHAPTER 

IV. Special Views of Nature 196 

The Simplicity of Nature 198 

Determinism 211 

On the Possibility of Describing Nature Completely 

in Terms of Analysis 220 

A Glimpse Ahead . 222 

Index 227 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



CHAPTER I 
BROAD POINTS OF VIEW 

Whatever may be one's opinion as to our perma- 
nent acceptance of the analytical details of Einstein's 
restricted and general theories of relativity, there can 
be no doubt that through these theories physics is 
permanently changed. It was a great shock to dis- 
cover that classical concepts, accepted unquestion- 
ingly, were inadequate to meet the actual situation, 
and the shock of this discovery has resulted in a crit- 
ical attitude toward our whole conceptual structure 
which must at least in part be permanent. Reflection 
on the situation after the event shows that it should 
not have needed the new experimental facts which 
led to relativity to convince us of the inadequacy of 
our previous concepts, but that a sufficiently shrewd 
analysis should have prepared us for at least the pos- 
sibility of what Einstein did. 

Looking now to the future, our ideas of what 
external nature is will always be subject to change as 
we gain new experimental knowledge, but there is 
a part of our attitude to nature which should not be 
subject to future change, namely that part which 
rests on the permanent basis of the character of our 



2 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



minds. It is precisely here, in an improved under- 
standing of our mental relations to nature, that the 
permanent contribution of relativity is to be found. 
We should now make it our business to understand so 
thoroughly the character of our permanent mental 
relations to nature that another change in our atti- 
tude, such as that due to Einstein, shall be forever 
impossible. It was perhaps excusable that a revolu- 
tion in mental attitude should occur once, because 
after all physics is a young science, and physicists 
have been very busy, but it would certainly be a 
reproach if such a revolution should ever prove nec- 
essary again. 

New Kinds of Experience Always Possible 
The first lesson of our recent experience with rel- 
ativity is merely an intensification and emphasis of 
the lesson which all past experience has also taught, 
namely, that when experiment is pushed into new 
domains, we must be prepared for new facts, of an 
entirely different character from those of our former 
experience. This is taught not only by the discovery 
of those unsuspected properties of matter moving 
with high velocities, which inspired the theory of 
relativity, but also even more emphatically by the 
new facts in the quantum domain. To a certain ex- 
tent, of course, the recognition of all this does not 
involve a change of former attitude; the fact has 
always been for the physicist the one ultimate thing 
from which there is no appeal, and in the face of 
which the only possible attitude is a humility almost 



BROAD POINTS OF VIEW 



3 



religious. The new feature in the present situation 
is an intensified conviction that in reality new orders 
of experience do exist, and that we may expect to 
meet them continually. We have already encoun- 
tered new phenomena in going to high velocities, 
and in going to small scales of magnitude: we may 
similarly expect to find them, for example, in deal- 
ing with relations of cosmic magnitudes, or in deal- 
ing with the properties of matter of enormous densi- 
ties, such as is supposed to exist in the stars. 

Implied in this recognition of the possibility of 
new experience beyond our present range, is the rec- 
ognition that no element of a physical situation, no 
matter how apparently irrelevant or trivial, may be 
dismissed as without effect on the final result until 
proved to be without effect by actual experiment. 

The attitude of the physicist must therefore be one 
of pure empiricism. He recognizes no a priori prin- 
ciples which determine or limit the possibilities of 
new experience. Experience is determined only by 
experience. This practically means that we must give 
up the demand that all nature be embraced in any 
formula, either simple or complicated. It may per- 
haps turn out eventually that as a matter of fact nature 
can be embraced in a formula, but we must so organ- 
ize our thinking as not to demand it as a necessity. 

The Operational Character of Concepts 

Einstein's Contribution in Changing Our Attitude 
Toward Concepts 
Recognizing the essential unpredictability of 



4 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



experiment beyond our present range, the physicist, if 
he is to escape continually revising his attitude, must 
use in describing and correlating nature concepts of 
such a character that our present experience does not 
exact hostages of the future. Now here it seems to 
me is the greatest contribution of Einstein. Although 
he himself does not explicitly state or emphasize it, I 
believe that a study of w^hat he has done will show 
that he has essentially modified our view of what the 
concepts useful in physics are and should be. Hith- 
erto many of the concepts of physics have been 
defined in terms of their properties. An excellent 
example is afforded by Newton's concept of absolute 
time. The following quotation from the Scholium 
in Book I of the Principia is illuminating: 

I do not define Time, Space, Place or Motion, as 
being well known to all. Only I must observe that the 
vulgar conceive those quantities under no other notions 
but from the relation they bear to sensible objects. And 
thence arise certain prejudices, for the removing of 
which, it will be convenient to distinguish them into Abso- 
lute and Relative, True and Apparent, Mathematical 
and Common. 

(i) Absolute, True, and Mathematical Time, of 
itself, and from its own nature flows equably without 
regard to anything external, and by another name is 
called Duration. 

Now there is no assurance whatever that there 
exists in nature anything with properties like those 
assumed in the definition, and physics, when reduced 
to concepts of this character, becomes as purely an 



BROAD POINTS OF VIEW 



5 



abstract science and as far removed from reality as 
the abstract geometry of the mathematicians, built 
on postulates. It is a task for experiment to discover 
w^hether concepts so defined correspond to anything 
in nature, and we must always be prepared to find 
that the concepts correspond to nothing or only par- 
tially correspond. In particular, if we examine the 
definition of absolute time in the light of experiment, 
we find nothing in nature with such properties. 

The new attitude toward a concept is entirely dif- 
ferent. We may illustrate by considering the con- 
cept of length : what do we mean by the length of an 
object? We evidently know what we mean by 
length if we can tell what the length of any and every 
object is, and for the physicist nothing more is 
required. To find the length of an object, we have to 
perform certain physical operations. The concept 
of length is therefore fixed when the operations by 
which length is measured are fixed : that is, the con- 
cept of length involves as much as and nothing more 
than the set of operations by which length is deter- 
mined. In general, we mean by any concept nothing 
more than a set of operations; the concept is synony- 
mous with the corresponding set of operations. If the 
concept is physical, as of length, the operations are 
actual physical operations, namely, those by which 
length is measured; or if the concept is mental, as of 
mathematical continuity, the operations are mental 
operations, namely those by which we determine 
whether a given aggregate of magnitudes is continu- 
ous. It is not intended to imply that there is a hard 



6 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



and fast division between physical and mental con- 
cepts, or that one kind of concept does not always con- 
tain an element of the other; this classification of 
concept is not important for our future considera- 
tions. 

We must demand that the set of operations equiva- 
lent to any concept be a unique set, for otherwise 
there are possibilities of ambiguity in practical appli- 
cations which we cannot admit. 

Applying this idea of ^'concept" to absolute time, 
we do not understand the meaning of absolute time 
unless we can tell how to determine the absolute time 
of any concrete event, i.e., unless we can measure 
absolute time. Now we merely have to examine any of 
the possible operations by which we measure time to 
see that all such operations are relative operations. 
Therefore the previous statement that absolute time 
does not exist is replaced by the statement that abso- 
lute time is meaningless. And in making this state- 
ment we are not saying something new about nature, 
but are merely bringing to light implications already 
contained in the physical operations used in measur- 
ing time. 

It is evident that if we adopt this point of view 
toward concepts, namely that the proper definition 
of a concept is not in terms of its properties but in 
terms of actual operations, we need run no danger of 
having to revise our attitude toward nature. For if 
experience is always described in terms of experi- 
ence, there must always be correspondence between 
experience and our description of it, and we need 



BROAD POINTS OF VIEW 



7 



never be embarrassed, as we were in attempting to 
find in nature the prototype of Newton's absolute 
time. Furthermore, if we remember that the opera- 
tions to which a physical concept are equivalent are 
actual physical operations, the concepts can be de- 
fined only in the range of actual experiment, and are 
undefined and meaningless in regions as yet 
untouched by experiment. It follows that strictly 
speaking we cannot make statements at all about 
regions as yet untouched, and that when we do make 
such statements, as we inevitably shall, we are mak- 
ing a conventionalized extrapolation, of the loose- 
ness of which we must be fully conscious, and the 
justification of which is in the experiment of the 
future. 

There probably is no statement either in Einstein 
or other writers that the change described above in 
the use of ''concept" has been self-consciously made, 
but that such is the case is proved, I believe, by an 
examination of the way concepts are now handled 
by Einstein and others. For of course the true mean- 
ing of a term is to be found by observing what a man 
does with it, not by what he says about it. We may 
show that this is the actual sense in which concept is 
coming to be used by examining in particular Ein- 
stein's treatment of simultaneity. 

Before Einstein, the concept of simultaneity was 
defined in terms of properties. It was a property of 
two events, when described with respect to their rela- 
tion in time, that one event was either before the 
other, or after it, or simultaneous with it. Simul- 



8 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



taneity was a property of the two events alone and 
nothing else; either two events were simultaneous or 
they were not. The justification for using this term 
in this way was that it seemed to describe the behav- 
ior of actual things. But of course experience then 
was restricted to a narrow range. When the range 
of experience was broadened, as by going to high 
velocities, it was found that the concepts no longer 
applied, because there was no counterpart in experi- 
ence for this absolute relation between two events. 
Einstein now subjected the concept of simultaneity 
to a critique, which consisted essentially in showing 
that the operations which enable two events to be 
described as simultaneous involve measurements on 
the two events made by an observer, so that "simul- 
taneity" is, therefore, not an absolute property of the 
two events and nothing else, but must also involve the 
relation of the events to the observer. Until there- 
fore we have experimental proof to the contrary, we 
must be prepared to find that the simultaneity of two 
events depends on their relation to the observer, and 
in particular on their velocity. Einstein, in thus 
analyzing what is involved in making a judgment of 
simultaneity, and in seizing on the act of the observer 
as the essence of the situation, is actually adopting 
a new point of view as to what the concepts of physics 
should be, namely, the operational view. 

Of course Einstein actually went much further 
than this, and found precisely how the operations for 
judging simultaneity change when the observer 
moves, and obtained quantitative expressions for the 



BROAD POINTS OF VIEW 



9 



efifect of the motion of the observer on the relative 
time of two events. We may notice, parenthetically, 
that there is much freedom of choice in selecting the 
exact operations; those w^hich Einstein chose were 
determined by convenience and simplicity with rela- 
tion to light beams. Entirely apart from the precise 
quantitative relations of Einstein's theory, however, 
the important point for us is that if we had adopted 
the operational point of view, we would, before the 
discovery of the actual physical facts, have seen that 
simultaneity is essentially a relative concept, and 
would have left room in our thinking for the dis- 
covery of such effects as were later found. 

Detailed Discussion of the Concept of Length 
We may now gain further familiarity with the 
operational attitude toward a concept and some of its 
implications by examining from this point of view 
the concept of length. Our task is to find the opera- 
tions by which we measure the length of any concrete 
physical object. We begin with objects of our com- 
monest experience, such as a house or a house lot. 
What we do is sufficiently indicated by the following 
rough description. We start with a measuring rod, 
lay it on the object so that one of its ends coincides 
with one end of the object, mark on the object the 
position of the other end of the rod, then move the 
rod along in a straight line extension of its previous 
position until the first end coincides with the pre- 
vious position of the second end, repeat this process 
as often as we can, and call the length the total num- 



lO 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



bcr of times the rod was applied. This procedure, 
apparently so simple, is in practice exceedingly com- 
plicated, and doubtless a full description of all the 
precautions that must be taken would fill a large 
treatise. We must, for example, be sure that the 
temperature of the rod is the standard temperature 
at which its length is defined, or else we must make 
a correction for it; or we must correct for the gravi- 
tational distortion of the rod if we measure a vertical 
length; or we must be sure that the rod is not a 
magnet or is not subject to electrical forces. All 
these precautions would occur to every physicist. 
But we must also go further and specify all the 
details by which the rod is moved from one position 
to the next on the object — its precise path through 
space and its velocity and acceleration in getting from 
one position to another. Practically of course, pre- 
cautions such as these are not mentioned, but the 
justification is in our experience that variations of 
procedure of this kind are without effect on the final 
result. But we always have to recognize that all our 
experience is subject to error, and that at some time 
in the future we may have to specify more carefully 
the acceleration, for example, of the rod in moving 
from one position to another, if experimental accu- 
racy should be so increased as to show a measureable 
effect. In principle the operations by which length 
is measured should be uniquely specified. If we have 
more than one set of operations, we have more than 
one concept, and strictly there should be a separate 
name to correspond to each different set of operations. 



BROAD POINTS OF VIEW ii 

t 

So much for the length of a stationary object, 
which is complicated enough. Now suppose we have 
to measure a moving street car. The simplest, and 
what we may call the "naive" procedure, is to board 
the car with our meter stick and repeat the opera- 
tions we would apply to a stationary body. Notice 
that this procedure reduces to that already adopted 
in the limiting case when the velocity of the street 
car vanishes. But here there may be new questions 
of detail. How shall we jump on to the car with 
our stick in hand? Shall we run and jump on from 
behind, or shall we let it pick us up from in front? 
Or perhaps does now the material of which the stick 
is composed make a difference, although previously 
it did not? All these questions must be answered by 
experiment. We believe from preseot evidence that 
it makes no difference how we jump on to the car, 
or of what material the rod is made, and that the 
length of the car found in this way will be the same 
as if it were at rest. But the experiments are more 
difficult, and we are not so sure of our conclusions as 
before. Now there are very obvious limitations to 
the procedure just given. If the street car is going 
too fast, we can not board it directly, but must use 
devices, such as getting on from a moving automo- 
bile; and, more important still, there are limitations 
to the velocity that can be given to street cars or to 
meter sticks by any practical means in our control, so 
that the moving bodies which can be measured in this 
way are restricted to a low range of velocity. If we 
want to be able to measure the length of bodies mov- 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



ing with higher velocities such as we find existing 
in nature (stars or cathode particles), we must adopt 
another definition and other operations for measur- 
ing length, which also reduce to the operations 
already adopted in the static case. This is precisely 
what Einstein did. Since Einstein's operations were 
difYerent from our operations abore, his '^lengtV^ 
does not mean the same as our ^^lengthf^ We must 
accordingly be prepared to find that the length of a 
moving body measured by the procedure of Einstein 
is not the same as that above; this of course is the 
fact, and the transformation formulas of relativity 
give the precise connection between the two lengths. 

Einstein's procedure for measuring the length of 
bodies in motion was dictated not only by the con- 
sideration that it must be applicable to bodies with 
high velocities, but also by mathematical conveni- 
ence, in that Einstein describes the world mathemat- 
ically by a system of coordinate geometry, and the 
"length" of an object is connected simply with quan- 
tities in the analytic equations. 

It is of interest to describe briefly Einstein's actual 
operations for measuring the length of a body in mo- 
tion ; it will show how operations which may be sim- 
ple from a mathematical point of view may appear 
complicated from a physical viewpoint. The 
observer who is to measure the length of a moving 
object must first extend over his entire plane of refer- 
ence (for simplicity the problem is considered two- 
dimensional) a system of time coordinates, i.e., at 
each point of his plane of reference there must be a 



BROAD POINTS OF VIEW 



13 



clock, and all these clocks must be synchronized. At 
each clock an observer must be situated. Now to 
find the length of the moving object at a specified 
instant of time (it is a subject for later investigation 
to find whether its length is a function of time), the 
two observers who happen to coincide in position 
with the two ends of the object at the specified time 
on their clocks are required to find the distance 
between their two positions by the procedure for 
measuring the length of a stationary object, and this 
distance is by definition the length of the moving 
object in the given reference system. This procedure 
for measuring the length of a body in motion hence 
involves the idea of simultaneity, through the simul- 
taneous position of the two ends of the rod, and we 
have seen that the operations by which simultaneity 
are determined are relative, changing when the 
motion of the system changes. We hence are pre- 
pared to find a change in the length of a body when 
the velocity of the measuring system changes, and 
this in fact is what happens. The precise numerical 
dependence is worked out by Einstein, and involves 
other considerations, in which we are not interested 
at present. 

The two sorts of length, the naive one and that 
of Einstein, have certain features in common. In 
either case in the limit, as the velocity of the measur- 
ing system approaches zero, the operations approach 
those for measuring the length of a stationary object. 
This, of course, is a requirement in any good defini- 
tion, imposed by considerations of convenience, and 



THE IX)GIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



it is too obvious a matter to need elaboration. 
Another feature is that the operations equivalent to 
either concept both involve the motion of the sys- 
tem, so that we must recognize the possibility that 
the length of a moving object may be a function of 
its velocity. It is a matter of experiment, unpredict- 
able until tried, that w^ithin the limits of present 
experimental error the naive length is not affected 
by motion, and Einstein's length is. 

So far, we have extended the concept of length in 
only one way beyond the range of ordinary experi- 
ence, namely to high velocities. The extension may 
obviously be made in other directions. Let us 
inquire what are the operations by which we meas- 
ure the length of a very large object. In practice we 
probably first meet the desirability of a change of 
procedure in measuring large pieces of land. Here 
our procedure depends on measurments with a sur- 
veyor's theodolite. This involves extending over the 
surface of the land a system of coordinates, starting 
from a base line measured with a tape in the con- 
ventional way, sighting on distant points from the 
extremities of the line, and measuring the angles. 
Now in this extension we have made one very essen- 
tial change: the angles between the lines connecting 
distant points are now angles between beams of 
light. We assume that a beam of light travels in a 
straight line. Furthermore, we assume in extending 
our system of triangulation over the surface of the 
earth that the geometry of light beams is Euclidean. 
We do the best we can to check the assumptions, but 



BROAD POINTS OF VIEW 



15 



at most can never get more than a partial check. 
Thus Gauss ^ checked whether the angles of a large 
terrestrial triangle add to two right angles and found 
agreement within experimental error. We now 
know from the experiments of Michelson ' that if 
his measurements had been accurate enough he 
would not have got a check, but would have had an 
excess or defect according to the direction in which 
the beam of light travelled around the triangle with 
respect to the rotation of the earth. But if the geom- 
etry of light beams is Euclidean, then not only must 
the angles of a triangle add to two right angles, but 
there are definite relations between the lengths of 
the sides and the angles, and to check these relations 
the sides should be measured by the old procedure 
with a meter stick. Such a check on a large scale 
has never been attempted, and is not feasible. It 
seems, then, that our checks on the Euclidean char- 
acter of optical space are all of restricted character. 
We have apparently proved that up to a certain scale 
of magnitude optical space is Euclidean with respect 
to measures of angle, but this may not necessarily 
involve that space is also Euclidean with respect to 
measures of length, so that space need not be com- 
pletely Euclidean. There is a further most impor- 
tant restriction in that our studies of non-Euclidean 
geometry have shown that the percentage excess of 
the angles of a non-Euclidean triangle over 180° 

^ C. F. Gauss, Gesammelte Werke, especially vol. IV. 
' See a discussion of the theory of this experiment by L. Silber- 
stein, Jour. Opt. Soc. Amer. 5, 291-307. 1921. 



i6 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



may depend on the magnitude of the triangle, so 
that it may well be that we have-not detected the 
non-Euclidean character of space simply because 
our measurements have not been on a large enough 
scale. 

We thus see that the concept of length has under- 
gone a very essential change of character even within 
the range of terrestrial measurements, in that we 
have substituted for what I may call the tactual con- 
cept an optical concept, complicated by an assump- 
tion about the nature of our geometry. From a very 
direct concept we have come to a very indirect con- 
cept with a most complicated set of operations. 
Strictly speaking, length when measured in this way 
by light beams should be called by another name, 
since the operations are dififerent. The practical 
justification for retaining the same name is that 
within our present experimental limits a numerical 
difference between the results of the two sorts of 
operations has not been detected. 

We are still worse ofif when we make the extension 
to solar and stellar distances. Here space is entirely 
optical in character, and we never have an opportun- 
ity of even partially comparing tactual with optical 
space. No direct measures of length have ever been 
made, nor can we even measure the three angles of a 
triangle and so check our assumption that the use of 
Euclidean geometry in extending the concept of space 
is justified. We never have under observation more 
than two angles of a triangle, as when we measure 
the distance of the moon by observation from the two 



BROAD POINTS OF VIEW 



17 



ends of the earth's diameter. To extend to still 
greater distance our measures of length, we have to 
make still further assumptions, such as that infer- 
ences from the Newtonian laws of mechanics are 
valid. The accuracy of our inferences about lengths 
from such measurements is not high. Astronomy is 
usually regarded as a science of extraordinarily high 
accuracy, but its accuracy is very restricted in char- 
acter, namely to the measurement of angles. It is 
probably safe to say that no astronomical distance, 
except perhaps that of the moon, is known with an 
accuracy greater than 0.1%. When we push our 
estimates to distances beyond the confines of the solar 
system in which we are assisted by the laws of 
mechanics, we are reduced in the first place to meas- 
urements of parallax, which at best have a quite infe- 
rior accuracy, and which furthermore fail entirely 
outside a rather restricted range. For greater stellar 
distances we are driven to other and much rougher 
estimates, resting for instance on the extension to 
great distances of connections found within the range 
of parallax between brightness and spectral type of a 
star, or on such assumptions as that, because a group 
of stars looks as if it were all together in space and 
had a common origin, it actually is so. Thus at 
greater and greater distances not only does experi- 
mental accuracy become less, but the very nature of 
the operations by which length is to be determined 
becomes indefinite, so that the distances of the most 
remote stellar objects as estimated by different 
observers or by different methods may be very 



i8 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



divergent. A particular consequence of the inaccu- 
racy of the astronomical measures of great distances 
is that the question of whether large scale space is 
Euclidean or not is merely academic. 

We thus see that in the extension from terrestrial 
to great stellar distances the concept of length has 
" changed completely in character. To say that a cer- 
tain star is 10' light years distant is actually and con- 
ceptually an entire different kind of thing from say- 
ing that a certain goal post is 100 meters distant. 
Because of our conviction that the character of our 
experience may change when the range of phenom- 
ena changes, we feel the importance of such a ques- 
tion as whether the space of distances of 10^ light 
years is Euclidean or not, and are correspondingly 
dissatisfied that at present there seems no way of 
giving meaning to it. 

We encounter difficulties similar to those above, 
and are also compelled to modify our procedures, 
when we go to small distances. Down to the scale 
of microscopic dimensions a fairly straightforward 
extension of the ordinary measuring procedure is 
sufficient, as when we measure a length in a microm- 
eter eyepiece of a microscope. This is of course a 
combination of tactual and optical measurements, 
and certain assumptions, justified as far as possible 
by experience, have to be made about the behavior 
of light beams. These assumptions are of a quite 
different character from those which give us con- 
cern on the astronomical scale, because here we meet 
difficulty from interference effects due to the finite 



BROAD POINTS OF VIEW 



19 



scale of the structure of light, and are not concerned 
with a possible curvature of light beams in the long 
reaches of space. Apart from the matter of conveni- 
ence, we might also measure small distances by the 
tactual method. 

As the dimensions become smaller, certain difficul- 
ties become increasingly important that were negli- 
gible on a larger scale. In carrying out physically 
the operations equivalent to our concepts, there are 
a host of practical precautions to be taken which 
could be explicitly enumerated with difficulty, but of 
which nevertheless any practical physicist is con- 
scious. Suppose, for example, we measure length 
tactually by a combination of Johanssen gauges. In 
piling these together, we must be sure that they are 
clean, and are thus in actual contact. Particles of 
mechanical dirt first engage our attention. Then as 
we go to smaller dimensions we perhaps have to pay 
attention to adsorbed films of moisture, then at still 
smaller dimensions to adsorbed films of gas, until 
finally we have to work in a vacuum, which must be 
the more nearly complete the smaller the dimensions. 
About the time that we discover the necessity for a 
complete vacuum, we discover that the gauges them- 
selves are atomic in structure, that they have no defi- 
nite boundaries, and therefore no definite length, but 
that the length is a hazy thing, varying rapidly in 
time between certain limits. We treat this situation 
as best we can by taking a time average of the 
apparent positions of the boundaries, assuming that 
along with the decrease of dimensions we have ac- 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



quired a corresponding extravagant increase in nim- 
bleness. But as the dimensions get smaller continu- 
ally, the difficulties due to this haziness increase in- 
definitely in percentage effect, and we are eventually 
driven to give up altogether. We have made the dis- 
covery that there are essential physical limitations to 
the operations which defined the concept of length. 
[We perhaps do not regard the substitution of optical 
for tactual space on the astronomical scale as com- 
pelled by the same sort of physical necessity, because 
I suppose the possible eventual landing of men in 
the moon will always be one of the dreams of human- 
ity.] At the same time that we have come to the end 
of our rope with our Johanssen gauge procedure, our 
companion with the microscope has been encounter- 
ing difficulties due to the finite wave length of light; 
this difficulty he has been able to minimize by using 
light of progressively shorter wave lengths, but he 
has eventually had to stop on reaching X-rays. Of 
course this optical procedure with the microscope is 
more convenient, and is therefore adopted in 
practice. 

Let us now see what is implied in our concept of 
length extended to ultramicroscopic dimensions- 
What, for instance, is the meaning of the statement 
that the distance between the planes of atoms in a 
certain crystal is 3 x 10'' cm.? What we would like 
to mean is that 1/3 x 10' of these planes piled on top 
of each other give a thickness of 1 cm. ; but of course 
such a meaning is not the actual one. The actual 
meaning may be found by examining the operations 



BROAD POINTS OF VIEW 



21 



by which we arrived at the number 3 x 10"'. As a 
matter of fact, 3 x 10 ' was the number obtained by 
solving a general equation derived from the wave 
theory of light, into which certain numerical data 
obtained by experiments with X-rays had been sub- 
stituted. Thus not only has the character of the con- 
cept of length changed from tactual to optical, but 
we have gone much further in committing ourselves 
to a definite optical theory. If this were the whole 
story, we would be most uncomfortable with respect 
to this branch of physics, because we are so uncertain 
of the correctness of our optical theories, but actually 
a number of checks can be applied which greatly 
restore our confidence. For instance, from the density 
of the crystal and the grating space, the weight of the 
individual atoms may be computed, and these weights 
may then be combined with measurements of the di- 
mensions of other sorts of crystal into which the same 
atoms enter to give values of the densities of these 
crystals, which may be checked against experiment. 
All such checks have succeeded within limits of 
accuracy which are fairly high. It is important to 
notice that, in spite of the checks, the character of the 
concept is changing, and begins to involve such things 
as the equations of optics and the assumption of the 
conservation of mass. 

We are not content, however, to stop with dimen- 
sions of atomic order, but have to push on to the elec- 
tron with a diameter of the order of 10"'' cm. What 
is the possible meaning of the statement that the diam- 
eter of an electron is 10 cm.? Again the only an- 



22 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



swcr is found by examining the operations by which 
the number 10"'' was obtained. This number came 
by solving certain equations derived from the field 
equations of electrodynamics, into which certain 
numerical data obtained by experiment had been sub- 
stituted. The concept of length has therefore now 
been so modified as to include that theory of electri- 
city embodied in the field equations, and, most 
important, assumes the correctness of extending these 
equations from the dimensions in which they may be 
verified experimentally into a region in which their 
correctness is one of the most important and prob- 
lematical of present-day questions in physics. To find 
whether the field equations are correct on a small 
scale, we must verify the relations demanded by the 
equations between the electric and magnetic forces 
and the space coordinates, to determine which 
involves measurement of lengths. But if these space 
coordinates cannot be given an independent meaning 
apart from the equations, not only is the attempted 
verification of the equations impossible, but the ques- 
tion itself is meaningless. If we stick to the concept 
of length by itself, we are landed in a vicious circle. 
As a matter of fact, the concept of length disappears 
as an independent thing, and fuses in a complicated 
way with other concepts, all of which are themselves 
altered thereby, with the result that the total number 
of concepts used in describing nature at this level is 
reduced in number. A precise analysis of the situa- 
tion is difficult, and I suppose has never been 
attempted, but the general character of the situation is 



BROAD POINTS OF VIEW 



23 



evident. Until at least a partial analysis is attempted, 
I do not see how any meaning can be attached to such 
questions as whether space is Euclidean in the small 
scale. 

It is interesting to observe that any increased ac- 
curacy in knowledge of large scale phenomena must, 
as far as we now can see, arise from an increase in the 
accuracy of measurement of small things, that is, in 
the measurement of small angles or the analysis of 
minute differences of wave lengths in the spectra. To 
know the very large takes us into the same field of 
experiment as to know the very small, so that opera- 
tionally the large and the small have features in 
common. 

This somewhat detailed analysis of the concept of 
length brings out features common to all our con- 
cepts. If we deal with phenomena outside the do- 
main in which we originally defined our concepts, we 
may find physical hindrances to performing the 
operations of the original definition, so that the orig- 
inal operations have to be replaced by others. These 
new operations are, of course, to be so chosen that they 
give, within experimental error, the same numerical 
results in the domain in which the two sets of 
operations may be both applied; but we must recog- 
nize in principle that in changing the operations we 
have really changed the concept, and that to use the 
same name for these different concepts over the entire 
range is dictated only by considerations of conveni- 
ence, which may sometimes prove to have been pur- 
chased at too high a price in terms of unambiguity. 



24 TllK LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 

Wc must always be prepared some day to find that 
an increase in experimental accuracy may show that 
the two different sets of operations which give the 
same results in the more ordinary part of the domain 
of experience, lead to measurably different results 
in the more unfamiliar parts of the domain. We 
must remain aware of these joints in our conceptual 
structure if we hope to render unnecessary the serv- 
ices of the unborn Einsteins. 

The second feature common to all concepts 
brought out by the detailed discussion of length is 
that, as we approach the experimentally attainable 
limit, concepts lose their individuality, fuse together, 
and become fewer in number, as we have seen that at 
dimensions of the order of the diameter of an electron 
the concepts of length and the electric field vectors 
fuse into an amorphous whole. Not only does nature 
as experienced by us become different in character 
on its horizons, but it becomes simpler, and therefore 
our concepts, which are the building stones of our 
descriptions, become fewer in number. This seems 
to be an entirely natural state of affairs. How the 
number of concepts is often kept formally the same as 
we approach the horizon will be discussed later in 
special cases. 

A precise analysis of our conceptual structure has 
never been attempted, except perhaps in very re- 
stricted domains, and it seems to me that there is room 
here for much important future work. Such an 
analysis is not to be attempted in this essay, but only 
some of the more important qualitative aspects are to 



BROAD POINTS OF VIEW 



25 



be pointed out. It will never be possible to give a 
clean-cut logical analysis of the conceptual situation, 
for the nature of our concepts, according to our 
operational point of view, is the same as the nature of 
experimental knowledge, which is often hazy. Thus 
in the transition regions where nature is getting 
simpler and the number of operationally independ- 
ent concepts changes, a certain haziness is inevitable, 
for the actual change in our conceptual structure in 
these transition regions is continuous, corresponding 
to the continuity of our experimental knowledge, 
whereas formally the number of concepts should be 
an integer. 

The Relative Character of Knowledge 
Two other consequences of the operational point 
of view must now be examined. First is the conse- 
quence that all our knowledge is relative. This may 
be understood in a general or a more particular sense. 
The general sense is illustrated in Haldane's book 
on the Reign of Relativity. Relativity in the general 
sense is the merest truism if the operational defini- 
tion of concept is accepted, for experience is described 
in terms of concepts, and since our concepts 
are constructed of operations, all our knowledge must 
unescapably be relative to the operations selected. 
But knowledge is also relative in a narrower sense, 
as when we say there is no such thing as absolute 
rest (or motion) or absolute size, but rest and size 
are relative terms. Conclusions of this kind are in- 
volved in the specific character of the operations in 



26 THK LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



terms of which rest or size are defined. An examina- 
tion of the operations by which we determine 
whether a body is at rest or in motion shows that the 
operations are relative operations: rest or motion is 
determined with respect to some other body selected 
as the standard. In saying that there is no such 
thing as absolute rest or motion we are not making 
a statement about nature in the sense that might be 
supposed, but we are merely making a statement 
about the character of our descriptive processes. 
Similarly with regard to size: examination of the 
operations of the measuring process shows that size 
is measured relative to the fundamental measuring 
rod. 

The '^absolute" therefore disappears in the orig- 
inal meaning of the word. But the ^'absolute" may 
usefully return with an altered meaning, and we may 
say that a thing has absolute properties if the numeri- 
cal magnitude is the same when measured with the 
same formal procedure by all observers. Whether 
a given property is absolute or not can be determined 
/ only by experiment, landing us in the paradoxical 
position that the absolute is absolute only relative to 
experiment. In some cases, the most superficial 
observation shows that a property is not absolute, as, 
for example, it is at once obvious that measured 
velocity changes with the motion of the observer. 
But in other cases the decision is more difficult. Thus 
Michelson thought he had an absolute procedure for 
measuring length, by referring to the wave length of 



BROAD POINTS OF VIEW 



27 



the red cadmium line as standard;^ it required diffi- 
cult and accurate experiment to show that this length 
varies with the motion of the observer. Even then, 
by changing the definition of the length of a moving 
object, we believe that length might be made to re- 
assume its desired absolute character. 

To stop the discussion at this point might leave 
the impression that this observation of the relative 
character of knowledge is of only a very tenuous and 
academic interest, since it appears to be concerned 
mostly with the character of our descriptive proc- 
esses, and to say little about external nature. [What 
this means we leave to the metaphysician to decide.] 
But I believe there is a deeper significance to all this. 
It must be remembered that all our argument starts 
with the concepts as given. Now these concepts 
involve physical operations ; in the discovery of what 
operations may be usefully employed in describing 
nature is buried almost all physical experience. In 
erecting our structure of physical science, we are 
building on the work of all the ages. There is then 
this purely physical significance in the statement that 
all motion is relative, namely that no operations of 
measuring motion have been found to be useful in 
describing simply the behavior of nature which are 
not operations relative to a single observer ; in making 
this statement we are stating something about nature. 
It takes an enormous amount of real physical experi- 

^ A. A. Michelson, Light Waves and Their Uses, University of 
Chicago Press, 1903, Chap. V. 



28 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



dice to discover relations of this sort. The discovery 
that the number obtained by counting the number 
of times a stick may be applied to an object can be 
simply used in describing natural phenomena was 
one of the most important and fundamental discov- 
eries ever made by man. 

Meaningless Questions 
Another consequence of the operational character 
of our concepts, almost a corollary of that considered 
above, is that it is quite possible, nay even disquiet- 
ingly easy, to invent expressions or to ask questions 
that are meaningless. It constitutes a great advance 
in our critical attitude tow^ard nature to realize that 
a great many of the questions that w^e uncritically 
ask are without meaning. If a specific question has 
meaning, it must be possible to find operations by 
which an answer may be given to it. It will be found 
in many cases that the operations cannot exist, and 
the question therefore has no meaning. For instance, 
it means nothing to ask whether a star is at rest or 
not. Another example is a question proposed by 
Clifford, namely, whether it is not possible that as 
the solar system moves from one part of space to 
another the absolute scale of magnitude may be 
changing, but in such a way as to affect all things 
equally, so that the change of scale can never be 
detected. An examination of the operations by which 
length is measured in terms of measuring rods shows 
that the operations do not exist (because of the nature 
of our definition of length) for answering the ques- 



BROAD POINTS OF VIEW 



29 



tion. The question can be given meaning only from 
the point of view of some imaginary superior being 
watching from an external point of vantage. But 
the operations by which such a being measures length 
are different from the operations of our definition 
of length, so that the question acquires meaning only 
by changing the significance of our terms — in the 
original sense the question means nothing. 

To state that a certain question about nature is 
meaningless is to make a significant statement about 
nature itself, because the fundamental operations are 
determined by nature, and to state that nature cannot 
be described in terms of certain operations is a sig- 
nificant statement. 

It must be recognized, however, that there is a 
sense in which no serious question is entirely without 
meaning, because doubtless the questioner had in 
mind some intention in asking the question. But to 
give meaning in this sense to a question, one must 
inquire into the meaning of the concepts as used by 
the questioner, and it will often be found that these 
concepts can be defined only in terms of fictitious 
properties, as Newton's absolute time was defined by 
its properties, so that the meaning to be ascribed to 
the question in this way has no connection with real- 
ity. I believe that it will enable us to make more 
significant and interesting statements, and therefore 
will be more useful, to adopt exclusively the opera- 
tional view, and so admit the possibility of questions 
entirely without meaning. 

This matter of meaningless questions is a very 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



subtle thing which may poison much more of our 
thought than that dealing with purely physical 
phenomena. I believe that many of the questions 
asked about social and philosophical subjects will be 
found to be meaningless when examined from the 
point of view of operations. It would doubtless con- 
duce greatly to clarity of thought if the operational 
mode of thinking were adopted in all fields of 
inquiry as well as in the physical. Just as in the phys- 
ical domain, so in other domains, one is making a 
significant statement about his subject in stating that 
a certain question is meaningless. 

In order to emphasize this matter of meaningless 
questions, I give here a list of questions, with which 
the reader may amuse himself by finding whether 
they have meaning or not. 

( 1 ) Was there ever a time when matter did not 
exist? 

(2) May time have a beginning or an end? 

(3) Why does time flow? 

(4) May space be bounded? 

(5) May space or time be discontinuous? 

(6) May space have a fourth dimension, not directly 
detectible, but given indirectly by inference? 

(7) Are there parts of nature forever beyond our 
detection? 

(8) Is the sensation which I call blue really the same 
as that which my neighbor calls blue? Is it 
possible that a blue object may arouse in him 
the same sensation that a red object does in 
me and vice versa? 

(9) May there be missing integers in the series of 
natural numbers as we know them ? 



BROAD POINTS OF VIEW 31 

(10) Is a universe possible in which 2-[-2 4=4^ 

(11) Why does negative electricity attract positive? 

(12) Why does nature obey laws? 

(13) Is a universe possible in which the laws are 
different? 

(14) If one part of our universe could be completely 
isolated from the rest, would it continue to obey 
the same laws ? 

(15) Can we be sure that our logical processes are 
valid? 

General Comments on the Operational Point 
OF View 

To adopt the operational point of view involves 
much more than a mere restriction of the sense in 
w^hich we understand '^concept," but means a far- 
reaching change in all our habits of thought, in that 
w^e shall no longer permit ourselves to use as tools in 
our thinking concepts of w^hich w^e cannot give an 
adequate account in terms of operations. In some 
respects thinking becomes simpler, because certain 
old generalizations and idealizations become incap- 
able of use; for instance, many of the speculations of 
the early natural philosophers become simply 
unreadable. In other respects, how^ever, thinking 
becomes much more difficult, because the operational 
implications of a concept are often very involved. 
For example, it is most difficult to grasp adequately 
all that is contained in the apparently simple con- 
cept of "time," and requires the continual correction 
of mental tendencies w^hich we have long unques- 
tioningly accepted. 



32 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



Operational thinking will at first prove to be an 
unsocial virtue; one will find oneself perpetually 
unable to understand the simplest conversation of 
one's friends, and will make oneself universally 
unpopular by demanding the meaning of apparently 
the simplest terms of every argument. Possibly after 
every one has schooled himself to this better way, 
there will remain a permanent unsocial tendency, 
because doubtless much of our present conversation 
will then become unnecessary. The socially optimis- 
tic may venture to hope, however, that the ultimate 
effect will be to release one's energies for more stimu- 
lating and interesting interchange of ideas. 

Not only will operational thinking reform the 
social art of conversation, but all our social relations 
will be liable to reform. Let any one examine in 
operational terms any popular present-day discus- 
sion of religious or moral questions to realize the 
magnitude of the reformation aw^aiting us. Wher- 
ever we temporize or compromise in applying our 
theories of conduct to practical life we may suspect 
a failure of operational thinking. 



CHAPTER II 



OTHER GENERAL CONSIDERATIONS 

The Approximate Character of Empirical 
Knowledge 

Although many aspects of the processes by which 
we obtain knowledge of the external physical world 
are much beyond the scope of our present inquiry, 
one matter must be mentioned in detail because it 
tacitly underlies all our discussion, the fact, namely, 
that all results of measurement are only approximate. 
That such is true is evident after the most superficial 
examination of any measuring process; any state- 
ment about numerical relations between measured 
quantities must always be subject to the qualifica- 
tion that the relation is valid only within limits. 
Furthermore, all experience seems to be of this 
character; we never have perfectly clean-cut knowl- 
edge of anything, but all our experience is sur- 
rounded by a twilight zone, a penumbra of uncer- 
tainty, into which we have not yet penetrated. This 
penumbra is as truly an unexplored region as any 
other region beyond experiment, such as the region of 
high velocities, for example, and we must hold no 
preconceived notions as to what will be found within 

33 



M THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 

the region. The penumbra is to be penetrated by 
improving the accuracy of measurement. Within 
what was at one time penumbra has been found the 
displacement of angular position of the stars near the 
edge of the solar disc, and within the penumbra as 
yet unpenetrated we look for such effects as the 
equivalence of mass and energy. Many of the great 
discoveries of the future will probably be made 
within the penumbra: we have already mentioned 
that increased knowledge of phenomena of a cosmic 
scale is to be obtained by increasing the accuracy of 
measurement of the very small. 

It is a general consequence of the approximate 
character of all measurement that no empirical 
science can ever make exact statements. This was 
fairly obvious in the case of mechanics, but it re- 
quired a Gauss' to convince us that the geometry in 
which we are interested as physicists is an empirical 
subject, and that one cannot say that actual space is 
Euclidean, but only that actual space approaches to 
ideal Euclidean space within a certain degree of 
approximation. I believe that we are compelled to go 
nill further, and recognize that arithmetic, so far 
as it purports to deal with actual physical objects, is 
also affected with the same penumbra of uncertainty 
as all other empirical science. A typical statement 
of empirical arithmetic is that 2 objects plus 2 
objects makes 4 objects. This statement acquires phys- 
ical meaning only in terms of certain physical opera- 
tions, and these operations must be performed in 

^ C. F. Gauss, Gesammelte Werke, especially vols. IV and VIII. 



OTHER GENERAL CONSIDERATIONS 35 



time. Now the penumbra gets into this situation 
through the concept of object. If the statement of 
arithmetic is to be an exact statement in the mathe- 
matical sense the ^'object" must be a definite clean-cut 
thing, which preserves its identity in time with no 
penumbra. But this sort of thing is never experi- 
enced, and as far as we know does not correspond 
exactly to anything in experience. It is of course true 
that in most experience the penumbra is so very thin 
and snug-fitting that it requires special effort to rec- 
ognize its presence at all; but scrutiny, I believe, 
shows that it is always there. If our experience had 
been restricted to phenomena in a vacuum, and the 
objects we were trying to count had been spheres of a 
gas which expand and interpenetrate, it is obvious 
that the concept of ^^object" as a thing with identity 
would have been much more difficult to form. Or, 
if our objects are tumblers of water, we discover 
when our observation reaches a certain stage of 
refinement that the amount of water is continually 
changing by evaporation and condensation, and we 
are bothered by the question whether the object is 
still the same after it has waxed and waned. Com- 
ing to solids, we eventually discover that even solids 
evaporate, or condense gases on them, and we see 
that an object with identity is an abstraction corre- 
sponding exactly to nothing in nature. Of course the 
penumbra of uncertainty which surrounds our arith- 
metical statements because of this property of phys- 
ical objects is so exceedingly tenuous that practically 
we are not aware of its existence, and expect never to 



36 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



find undiscovered phenomena within the penumbra. 
But in principle we must recognize its presence, and 
must further recognize that all empirical science 
must be of this character. 

In most empirical sciences, the penumbra is at first 
prominent, and becomes less important and thinner 
as the accuracy of physical measurement is increased. 
In mechanics, for example, the penumbra is at first 
like a thick obscuring veil at the stage where we 
measure forces only by our muscular sensations, and 
gradually is attenuated, as the precision of measure- 
ments increases. But with the arithmetical concept 
of an individual identifiable object it is the exact 
reverse; a crude point of view does not suspect the 
existence of the penumbra at all, and we discover it 
only by highly refining our methods. Doubtless 
arithmetic owes its early development to this prop- 
erty. 

We may now go still further. Operations them- 
selves are, of course, derived from experience, and 
would be expected also to have a nebulous edge of 
uncertainty. We have to ask such questions as 
whether the operations of arithmetic are clean-cut 
things. Is the operation of multiplying 2 objects by 
2 a definite operation, with no enveloping haze? All 
our physical experience convinces us that if there is 
a penumbra about the concept of operations of this 
sort it is so tenuous as to be negligible, at least for the 
present; but the question affords an interesting topic 
for speculation. We also have to ask whether mental 
operations may similarly be enveloped in a haze. 



OTHER GENERAL CONSIDERATIONS 37 



Explanations and Mechanisms 
Perhaps the climax of our task of interpreting and 
correlating nature is reached when we are able to 
find an explanation of phenomena; with the finding 
of the explanation we are inclined to feel that our 
understanding of the situation is complete. We now 
have to ask what is the nature of the explanation 
which we set as the goal of our efforts. The answer 
is not easy to give, and there may be difference of 
opinion about it. We shall get the best answer to 
this, as to so many other questions, by adopting the 
operational point of view, and examining what we 
do in giving an explanation. I believe that examina- 
tion will show that the essence of an explanation con- 
sists in reducing a situation to elements with which 
we are so familiar that we accept them as a matter 
of course, so that our curiosity rests.' '^Reducing a 
situation to elements" means, from the operational 
point of view, discovering familiar correlations be- 
tween the phenomena of which the situation is com- 
posed. 

There is involved here the thesis that it is possible 
to analyze nature into correlations, without, how- 
ever, any assumption whatever as to the character of 
these correlations. It seems to me that such a thesis 
is the most general that can be made if nature is to 
be intelligible at all. This thesis underlies all the 
considerations of this essay, and we shall not try to 
find anything more general. We shall, however, 

^ The ultimate elements of explanation are analogous to the 
axioms of formal mathematics. 



38 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



recognize that any assumption as to the character of 
the correlations constitutes a special hypothesis which 
may restrict the future, and that therefore these spe- 
cial hypotheses are to be subjected to special exam- 
ination. We return to this matter in more detail in 
discussing the causality concept, which is closely 
related to the concept of explanation. 

In this view of explanation there is no implication 
that the ^'element" is either a smaller or a larger scale 
thing than the phenomenon being explained; thus we 
may explain the properties of a gas in terms of its 
constituent molecules, or perhaps some day we shall 
become so familiar with the idea of a non-Euclidean 
space that we shall explain (instead of describe) the 
gravitational attraction of a stone by the earth in 
terms of a space-time curvature imposed by all the 
rest of the matter in the universe. 

If this is accepted as the true nature of explanation, 
we see that an explanation is not an absolute sort of 
thing, but what is satisfactory for one man will not 
be for another. The savage is satisfied by explaining 
the thunderstorm as the capricious act of an angry 
god. The physicist demands more, and requires that 
the familiar elements to which we reduce a situation 
be such that we can intuitively predict their behavior. 
Thus even if the physicist believed in the existence of 
the angry god, he would not be satisfied with this 
explanation of the thunderstorm because he is not so 
well acquainted with angry gods as to be able to pre- 
dict when anger is followed by a storm. He would 
have to know why the god had become angry, and 



OTHER GENERAL CONSIDERATIONS 39 



why making a thunderstorm eased his ire. But even 
with this additional qualification, scientific explana- 
tion is obviously still a relative affair — relative to the 
elements or axioms to which we make reduction and 
which we accept as ultimate. These elements depend 
to a certain extent on the purpose in view, and also 
on the range of our previous physical experience. If 
we are explaining the action of a machine, we are 
satisfied to reduce the action to the push and pull of 
the various members of the machine, it being 
accepted as an ultimate that these members transmit 
pushes or pulls. But the physicist who has extended 
his experimental knowledge further, may want to 
explain how the members transmit pushes or pulls in 
terms of the action on each other of the electrons in 
their orbits in the atoms. The character of our 
explanatory structure will depend on the character 
of our experimental knowledge, and will change as 
this changes. 

Formally, there is no limit to the process of expla- 
nation, because we can always ask what is the ex- 
planation of the elements in terms of which we have 
given the last explanation. But the point of view of 
operations shows that this is mere formalism which 
ends only in meaningless jargon, for we soon arrive 
at the limit of our experimental knowledge, and be- 
yond this the operations involved in the concepts of 
our explanations become impossible and the concepts 
become meaningless. 

As we extend experimental knowledge and push 
our explanations further and further, we see that the 



40 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



explanatory sequence may be terminated in several 
possible ways. In the first place, we may never push 
our experiments beyond a stage into which the ele- 
ments with which we are already familiar do not 
enter. In this case explanation is very simple: it 
involves nothing essentially new, but merely the dis- 
entanglement of complexities. The kinetic theory of 
gases, in explaining the thermal properties of a gas 
in terms of ordinary mechanical properties of the 
molecules, suggests such a situation. Or, secondly, 
our experiments may bring us into contact with situ- 
ations novel to us, in which we can recognize no 
familiar elements, or at least must recognize that 
there is something in addition to the familiar ele- 
ments. Such a situation constitutes an explanatory 
crisis and explanation has to stop by definition. Or 
thirdly, we may try to force our explanations into a 
predetermined mold, by formally erecting or invent- 
ing beyond the range of present experiment ultimates 
more or less like elements already fam^iliar to us, and 
seek to explain all present experience in terms of 
these chosen ultimates. 

Leaving for the present the third possibility, which 
is within our control to accept or reject, and is a 
formal matter, it is merely a question of experimental 
fact which of the first two possibilities corresponds 
to the actual state of affairs. The most perfunctory 
examination of the present state of physics shows that 
we are now facing the second of these possibilities, 
and that in the new experimental facts of relativity, 
and in all quantum phenomena, we are confronted 



OTHER GENERAL CONSIDERATIONS 



with an explanatory crisis. It has often been empha- 
sized that Einstein's theory of gravitation does not 
seek at all to give an explanation of gravitational 
phenomena, but merely describes and correlates these 
phenomena in comparatively simple mathematical 
language. No more attempt is made to reduce the 
gravitational attraction between the earth and the sun 
to simple terms than was made by Newton. In the 
realm of quantum phenomena it is of course the 
merest commonplace that our old ideas of mechanics 
and electrodynamics have failed, so that it is a matter 
of the greatest concern to find how many, or indeed 
whether any, elements of the old situations can be 
carried over into the new. 

An examination of many of the so-called ^'explana- 
tions" of quantum theory constitutes at once a justifi- 
cation of the definition of explanation given above, 
and of the statement that in quantum phenomena we 
are at an explanatory crisis. For the endeavor of all 
these quantum explanations is to find in every new 
or more complicated situation the same elements 
which have already been met in simpler situations, 
and which are therefore relatively more familiar. 
For example, many quantum phenomena are made to 
involve the emission of energy when an electron 
jumps from one orbit to another. But always the ele- 
ments to which reduction is made are themselves 
quantum phenomena, and these are still so new and 
unfamiliar that we feel an instinctive need for 
explanation in other terms. We seek to understand 
why the electron emits when it jumps. 



42 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



The explanatory crisis which now confronts us in 
relativity and quantum phenomena is but a repetition 
of what has occurred many time in the past. A sim- 
ilar crisis confronted Prometheus when he discov- 
ered fire, and the first man who observed a straw 
sticking to a piece of rubbed amber, or a suspended 
lodestone seeking the north star. Every kitten is 
confronted with such a crisis at the end of nine days. 
Whenever experience takes us into new and unfa- 
miliar realms, we are to be at least prepared for a 
new crisis. 

/ Now what are we to do in such a crisis? It seems 
' to me that the only sensible course is to do exactly 
what the kitten does, namely, to wait until we have 
amassed so much experience of the new kind that it 
is perfectly familiar to us, and then to resume the 
process of explanation with elements from our new 
experience included in our list of axioms. Not only 
will observation show that this is what is now actu- 
ally being done with respect to quantum and gravi- 
tational phenomena, but it is in harmony with the 
entire spirit of our outlook on nature. All our knowl- 
edge is in terms of experience; we should not expect 
or desire to erect an explanatory structure different 
in character from that of experience. Our experi- 
ence is finite; on the confines of the experimentally 
attainable it becomes hazy, and the concepts in terms 
of which we describe it fuse together and lose inde- 
pendent meaning. Furthermore, at every extension 
of our experimental range we must be prepared to 
find, and as a matter of fact we have often found, 



OTHER GENERAL CONSIDERATIONS 43 



that we encounter phenomena of an entirely novel 
character for which previous experience has given 
us no preparation. The explanatory structure pro- 
posed above has all these properties; it is finite, being 
terminated by the edge of experiment, the final 
stages of our explanations are hazy in that it becomes 
more and more difficult to distinguish elements of 
familiar experience, and every now and then we must 
admit new elements into our explanations. 

The first step in resuming our explanatory prog- 
ress, after we have been confronted with such a crisis, 
is to seek for various sorts of correlation between the 
elements of our new experience, in the confident 
expectation that these elements will eventually 
become so familiar to us that they may be used as the 
ultimates of a new explanation. This is exactly what 
is now happening in quantum theory. 

Diametrically opposed to the views above, there 
is another ideal of the explanatory process which is 
held by many physicists, and which has been men- 
tioned above as the third possible way in which the 
explanatory sequence may be terminated, namely, 
the endeavor to devise beyond the limit of present 
experiment a structure built of elements like some 
of those of our present experience, in the action of 
which we endeavor to find the explanation of phe- 
nomena in the present range. Now a program such 
as this, as a serious program for the final correlation 
of nature, is entirely opposed to the spirit of the con- 
siderations expounded here. There is no warrant 
whatever in experience for the conviction that as we 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



penetrate deeper and deeper we shall find the ele- 
ments of previous experience repeated, although 
sometimes we do find such repetitions, as in the be- 
havior of gases. Yet this has been the attitude of 
many eminent physicists, for example, Faraday and 
Maxwell, in seeking to explain distant electrical 
action by the propagation through a medium of a 
mechanical push or pull, or by Hertz, who sought in 
all phenomena the effect of concealed masses with 
ordinary mechanical inertia. Although as a gen- 
eral principle this program seems to be absolutely 
without justification, nevertheless it may be justified 
if the specific character of the physical facts seems to 
indicate a repetition at lower levels of elements 
familiar higher up. Hertz undoubtedly had this 
justification, as did also Maxwell to a certain extent, 
in the discovery that the general equations of electro- 
dynamics are of the same form as the generalized 
Lagrangean equations of mechanics. For Faraday, 
however, there seems no such justification; the urge 
to this sort of thing in Faraday came from an uncrit- 
ical acceptance of his own temperamental reactions. 

From a less serious point of view it may, however, 
be quite justified to make such a working hypothesis 
as that in the action of electrical forces may be dis- 
covered the same elements with which we arc 
familiar in the everyday experiences of mechanics. 
For such a hypothesis often enables us to make par- 
tial correlations which suggest new experimental 
tests, and thus gives the stimulus to an extension of 
our experimental horizon. Many physicists recog- 



OTHER GENERAL CONSIDERATIONS 



nize the tentative character of such attempted expla- 
nations, but others apparently take them more 
seriously, as for example Lord Kelvin in his con- 
tinuous life-long attempts to find a mechanical 
explanation of all physical phenomena. This quota- 
tion from Kelvin is illuminating. '^I never satisfy 
myself until I can make a mechanical model of a 
thing. If I can make a mechanical model, I can 
understand it. As long as I cannot make a mechani- 
cal model all the way through, I cannot understand 
it. . . . But I want to understand light as well as I can 
without introducing things that we understand even 
less of." 

So much for general considerations on the nature 
of explanation. Coming now to greater detail, many 
explanations involve what may be described as a 
mechanism. It is difficult to characterize exactly 
what we mean by mechanism, but it seems to be asso- 
ciated with an attitude of mind that strives to realize 
the third of the possibilities mentioned above. As a 
matter of fact, the mechanism sought for is usually 
of a particular type, in that the ultimate elements 
selected are mechanical elements. This point of view^ 
is particularly characteristic of the English school 
of physicists. Although ^^mechanism" usually implies 
mechanical elements, we may show by specific 
examples that we do actually use the word in a 
broader significance. If, for example, we could devise 
within the core of an atom a revolving system of 
electrical charges, acting on each other with the ordi- 
nary inverse square forces of electrostatics, such that 



46 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



every now and then the system becomes unstable and 
breaks up, we should doubtless say that we had found 
a mechanism for explaining radioactive disintegra- 
tion. 

However, the formulation of a precise definition 
of mechanism is of secondary concern to us; we are 
primarily interested in understanding the attitude of 
mind that feels a mechanism is necessary. A typical 
example of such an urge to a mechanism is afforded 
by the gravitational action between distant bodies. 
To many minds the concept of action at a distance is 
absolutely abhorrent, not to be tolerated for an 
instant. Such an intolerable situation is avoided by 
the invention of a medium filling all space, which 
transmits a force from one body to the other through 
the successive action on each other of its contiguous 
parts. Or the dilemma of action at a distance may 
be avoided in other ways, as by Boscovitch in the 
eighteenth century, who, in order to explain gravi- 
tation, filled space with a triply infinite horde of 
infinitesimal projectiles. Now of course it is a mat- 
ter for experiment to decide whether any physical 
reality can be ascribed to a medium which makes 
gravitation possible by the action of its adjacent 
parts, but I can see no justification whatever for the 
attitude which refuses on purely a priori grounds to 
accept action at a distance as a possible axiom or ulti- 
mate of explanation. It is difficult to conceive any- 
thing more scientifically bigoted than to postulate 
that all possible experience conforms to the same type 
as that with which we are already familiar, and 



OTHER GENERAL CONSIDERATIONS 47 



therefore to demand that explanation use only ele-\ 
ments familiar in everyday experience. Such an atti- / 
tude bespeaks an unimaginativeness, a mental obtuse- 
ness and obstinacy, which might be expected to have 
exhausted their pragmatic justification at a lower 
plane of mental activity. 

Although it will probably be fairly easy to give 
intellectual assent to the strictures of the last para- 
graph, I believe many will discover in themselves a 
longing for mechanical explanation which has all 
the tenacity of original sin. The discovery of such a 
desire need not occasion any particular alarm, because 
it is easy to see how the demand for this sort of 
explanation has had its origin in the enormous pre- 
ponderance of the mechanical in our physical experi- 
ence. But nevertheless, just as the old monks strug- 
gled to subdue the flesh, so must the physicist struggle 
to subdue this sometimes nearly irresistible, but per- 
fectly unjustifiable desire. One of the large purposes 
of this exposition will be attained if it carries the con- 
viction that this longing is unjustifiable, and is worth 
making the effort to subdue. 

The situation with respect to action at a distance 
is typical of the general situation. I believe the 
essence of the explanatory process is such that we must 
be prepared to accept as an ultimate for our explana- 
tions the mere statement of a correlation between 
phenomena or situations with which we are suffi- 
ciently familiar. Thus, in quantum theory, there is 
no reason why we should not be willing to accept as 
an ultimate the fundamental fact that when an elec- 



sS THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



tron jumps radiation is emitted, provided always that 
we can give independent meaning in terms of opera- 
tions to the jumping of an electron. If there is no 
experiment suggesting other and intermediate phe- 
nomena, we ought to be able to rest intellectually sat- 
isfied with this. Of course it is quite a different mat- 
ter, and entirely justified, to imagine what the 
assumption of finer details in the process would 
involve experimentally, and then to seek for these 
possible new experimental facts. 

It is a consequence of this view that any correlation 
is adapted to be an absolutely final element of 
explanation, and can never be superseded by the dis- 
covery of new experimental facts, if the correlation 
is by definition beyond the reach of further experi- 
ment. Such a possibility, for example, is contained 
in a correlation between the numerical magnitude of 
the gravitational constant and the total mass of the 
universe. Something of this sort may be well at- 
tempted by those who desire their explanations to 
take a formally final shape. We shall return to this 
subject later. 

The instinctive demand for a mechanism is forti- 
fied by observation of the many important cases in 
which mechanisms have been discovered or invented. 
However, the significance of such successful attempts 
must be subject to most careful scrutiny. The mat- 
ter has been discussed by Poincare,' who showed that 

^ Henri Poincare. Wissenschaft and Hypothese, Translated into 
German by F. and L. Lindemann, Teubner, Leipzig, 1906. See 
especially p. 217. 



OTHER GENERAL CONSIDERATIONS 



not only is it always possible to find a mechanistic 
explanation of any phenomenon (Hertz's program 
was a perfectly possible one) , but there are always an 
infinite number of such explanations. This is very 
unsatisfactory. We want to be able to find the real 
mechanism. Now an examination of specific pro- 
posed mechanisms will show that most mechanisms 
are more complicated than the simple physical phe- 
nomenon which they are invented to explain, in that 
they have more independently variable attributes than 
the phenomenon has been yet proved to have. An 
example is afforded by the mechanical models 
invented to facilitate the study of the properties of 
simple inductive electrical circuits. The great num- 
ber of such models which have been proposed is suf- 
ficient indication of their possible infinite number. 
But if the mechanism has more independently vari- 
able attributes than the original phenomenon, it is 
obvious that the question is without meaning whether 
the mechanism is the real one or not, for in the me- 
chanism there must be simple motions or combina- 
tions of motions which have no counterpart in fea- 
tures of the original phenomenon as yet discovered. 
Obviously, then, the operations do not exist by which 
we may set up a one to one correspondence between 
the properties of the mechanism and the natural 
phenomenon, and the question of reality has no mean- 
ing. If, then, a mechanism is to be taken seriously 
as actually corresponding to reality, we must demand 
that it have no more degrees of freedom than the 
original phenomenon, and we must also be sure that 



so THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



the phenomenon has no undiscovered features. Phys- 
ical experience shows that such conditions are most 
difficult to meet, and indeed the probability is that 
they are impossible. 

A mechanism with more independently variable 
attributes than the phenomenon may prove to be a 
very useful tool of thought, and therefore worth in- 
venting and studying, but it is to be regarded no more 
seriously than is a mnemonic device, or any other 
artifice by which a man forces his mind to give him 
better service. 

There is another possible program of explanation, 
the converse of that considered above, namely, to 
explain all familiar facts of ordinary experience in 
terms of less familiar facts found at a deeper level. 
The most striking example of this is the recent at- 
tempt to give a complete electrical explanation of the 
universe. The original attempt was to explain elec- 
trical effects in mechanical terms; this attempt 
failed. At about the same time the existence of the 
electron was experimentally established, so that it was 
evident that electricity is a very fundamental con- 
stituent of matter. The program of explanation was 
reversed, and an electrical explanation sought for all 
mechanical phenomena, including in particular me- 
chanical mass. But this attempt has also failed; we 
recognize that part of mass may be non-electrical in 
character, we postulate non-electrical forces inside 
the electron, and further, we usually postulate for 
electrons and protons the property of impenetrabil- 
ity, a property derived from experience on a higher 
scale of magnitude. 



OTHER GENERAL CONSIDERATIONS 51 



A program of this general sort is likely to be 
regarded with considerable sympathy, and indeed the 
chances of success seem much greater than do those 
of the converse program, for in our experience large 
scale phenomena are more often built up from and 
analyzed into small scale phenomena than the con- 
verse. But as a matter of principle we must again 
recognize that the only appeal is to experiment, and 
that we have to ask just one question: "Is it true, as 
a matter of fact, that all large scale phenomena can 
be built up of elements of small scale phenomena?'' 
It seems to me that the experimental warrant for this 
conviction has not yet been given. The failure of 
the attempted electrical explanation of the universe 
is a case in point. However, the failure to prove a 
proposition is no guarantee that some time it may not 
be proved, and many physicists are convinced of the 
ultimate feasability of this program. Personally I 
feel that the large may not always be analyzed into 
the smaller; the subject will be discussed again. 

A conviction of the significance of microscopic 
analysis has many features in common with the usual 
conviction of the ultimate simplicity of nature. The 
thesis of simplicity involves in addition the assump- 
tion that the kinds of small scale elements are few in 
number, but actually this involves no important dif- 
ference between the two convictions, because we have 
seen that the elements of which we build our struc- 
ture become fewer in number as we approach the 
limit of the experimentally attainable. We may 
properly grant to convictions of this sort pragmatic 
value in suggesting new correlations and experiments, 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



but a recognition of the empirical basis of all physics 
will not allow us to go further. 

Models and Constructs 
In discussing the concept of length, we could find 
no meaning in questions such as: "Is space on a 
scale of 10-8 cm. Euclidean?" Nevertheless it will 
seem to many that they do attach a perfectly definite 
meaning to a question of this kind. Of course it must 
be agreed that magnitudes of 10"^ cm. cannot be 
thought of in terms of immediate sensation. When 
one thinks of an atom as a thing with any geometrical 
properties at all, I believe he will find that what he 
essentially does is to imagine a model, multiplying 
all the hypothetical dimensions by a factor large 
enough to bring it to a magnitude of ordinary experi- 
ence. This large scale model is given properties cor- 
responding to those of the physical thing. For 
example, the model of the atom which was accepted 
in the fall of 1925 contains electrons rotating in orbits, 
and every now and then an electron jumps from one 
orbit to another, and simultaneously energy is radi- 
ated from the atom. Such a model is satisfactory if 
it offers the counterpart of all the phenomena of the 
original atom. Now I believe the only meaning that 
any one can find in his statement that the space of the 
atom is Euclidean is that he believes that he can con- 
struct in Euclidean space a model with all the 
observed properties of the atom. This possibility 
may or may not be sufficient to give real physical 
significance to the statement that the space of the atom 



OTHER GENERAL CONSIDERATIONS 53 



is Euclidean. The situation here is very much the 
same as it was with respect to mechanisms. The 
model may have many more properties than corre- 
spond to measurable properties of the atom, and in 
particular, the operations by which the space of the 
model is tested for its Euclidean character may [and 
as a matter of fact I believe ^o] not have any counter- y 
part in operations which can be carried out on the 
atom. Further, we cannot attach any real significance 
to the statement that the space of the atom is Eucli- 
dean unless we can show that no model constructed 
in non-Euclidean space can reproduce the measurable 
properties of the atom. 

In spite of all thi§, I believe that the model is a 
useful and indeed unescapable tool of thought, in that 
it enables us to think about the unfamiliar in terms 
of the familiar. There are, however, dangers in its 
use: it is the function of criticism to disclose these 
dangers, so that the tool may be used with confidence. 

Closely related to the mental model are mental con- 
structs, of which physics is full. There are many sorts 
of constructs: those in which we are interested are 
made by us to enable us to deal with physical situa- 
tions which we cannot directly experience through 
our senses, but with which we have contact indirectly 
and by inference. Such constructs usually involve the 
element of invention to a greater or less degree. A 
construct containing very little of invention is that 
of the inside of an opaque solid body. We can never 
experience directly through our senses the inside 
such a solid body, because the instant we directly 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



experience it, it ceases by definition to be the inside. 
We have here a construct, but so natural a one as to 
be practically unavoidable. An example of a con- 
struct involving a greater amount of invention is the 
stress in an elastic body. A stress is by definition a 
property of the interior points of a body w^hich is con- 
nected mathematically in a simple vs^ay with the 
forces acting across the free surface of the body. A 
stress is then, by its very nature, forever beyond the 
reach of direct experience, and it is therefore a con- 
struct. The entire structure of a stress corresponds to 
nothing in direct experience; it is related to force, 
but is itself a six-fold magnitude, whereas a force is 
only three-fold 

W e have next to ask whether the stress, which we 
have invented to meet the situation in a body exposed 
to forces, is a good construct. In the first place, a 
stress has the same number of degrees of freedom as 
the observable phenomenon, for it is one of the propo- 
sitions of the mathematical theory of elasticity that 
the boundary conditions, which are the experimental 
variables, uniquely determine the stress in a given 
body [i.e, a body of given elastic constants] ; and of 
course it is at once obvious, by an inspection of the 
equations, that conversely a possible stress system 
uniquely determines the boundary conditions to the 
significant amount. There is, therefore, a unique 
one-to-one correspondence between a stress and the 
physical situation it was made to meet, and so far a 
stress is a good construct. Up to this point a stress, 
from the point of view of the operations in terms of 



OTHER GENERAL CONSIDERATIONS 55 



which it is defined, is a purely mathematical inven- 
tion, which is justified because it is convenient in 
describing the behavior of bodies subjected to the 
action of force. But we wish now to go farther and 
ascribe physical reality to a stress, meaning by this 
that a stress in a solid body shall correspond to some 
real physical state of the interior points. Let us 
examine, from the point of view of operations, what 
the meaning of a statement like this may be. Since 
we now wish to ascribe an additional physical mean- 
ing to a stress beyond that of the mathematical opera- 
tions in terms of which the stress was determined, 
there must exist additional physical operations cor- 
responding to this meaning, or else our statement is 
meaningless. Now of course it is a matter of the most 
elementary experience that physical phenomena do 
exist which allow these other independent operations. 
A body under stress is also in a state of strain, which 
may be determined from the external deformations, 
or the strain at internal points may be made more 
vividly real by those optical effects of double refrac- 
tion in transparent bodies which are now so exten- 
sively used in model experiments, or if the stress is 
pushed beyond a certain point, we have such new 
phenomena as permanent set or finally, rupture. 

We have, then, every reason to be satisfied with 
our construct of stress. In the first place, from the 
formal point of view, it is a good construct because 
there is a unique correspondence between it and the 
physical data in terms of which it is defined; and in 
the second place we have a right to ascribe physical 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



reality to it because it is uniquely connected with 
other physical phenomena, independent of those 
which entered its definition. This last requirement, 
in fact, from the operational point of view, amounts 
to nothing more than a definition of what we mean 
by the reality of things not given directly by experi- 
ence. Since now in addition to satisfying the formal 
requirements, experience shows that a stress is most 
useful in correlating phenomena, we are justified in 
giving to this construct of stress a prominent place 
among our concepts. 

Consider now another construct, one of the most 
important of physics, that of the electric field. In 
the first place, an examination of the operations by 
which we determine the electric field at any point 
will show that it is a construct, in that it is not a 
direct datum of experience. To determine the elec- 
tric field at a point, we place an exploring charge at 
the point, measure the force on it, and then calculate 
the ratio of the force to the charge. We then allow 
the exploring charge to become smaller and smaller, 
repeating our measurement of force on each smaller 
charge, and define the limit of the ratio of the force 
to the charge as the electric field intensity at the point 
in question, and the limiting direction of the force on 
a small charge as the direction of the field. We may 
extend this process to every point of space, and so 
obtain the concept of a field of force, by which every 
point of the space surrounding electric charges is 
tagged with the appropriate number and direction, 
the exploring charge having completely disappeared. 



OTHER GENERAL CONSIDERATIONS 57 



The field is, then, clearly a construct. Next, from 
the formal point of view of mathematics, it is a good 
construct, because there is a one to one correspond- 
ence between the electric field and the electric charges 
in terms of which it is defined, the field being 
uniquely determined by the charges, and conversely 
there being only one possible set of charges corre- 
sponding to a given field. Now nearly every physicist 
takes the next step, and ascribes physical reality to 
the electric field, in that he thinks that at every point 
of the field there is some real physical phenomenon 
taking place which is connected in a way not yet pre- 
cisely determined with the number and direction 
which tag the point. At first this view most naturally 
involved as a corollary the existence of a medium, 
but lately it has become the fashion to say that the 
medium does not exist, and that only the field is real. 
The reality of the field is self-consciously inculcated 
in our elementary teaching, often with considerable 
difficulty for the student. This view is usually 
credited to Faraday, and is considered the most fun- 
damental concept of all modern electrical theory. Yet 
in spite of this, I believe that a critical examination 
will show that the ascription of physical reality to 
the electric field is entirely without justification. I 
cannot find a single physical phenomenon or a single 
physical operation by which evidence of the existence 
of the field may be obtained independent of the opera- 
tions which entered the definition. The only physical 
evidence we ever have of the existence of a field is 
obtained by going there with an electric charge and 



58 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



observing the action on the charge [when the charges 
are inside atoms we may have optical phenomena], 
which is precisely the operation of the definition. It 
is then either meaningless to say that a field has 
physical reality, or we are guilty of adopting a defi- 
nition of reality which is the crassest tautology. 

There can be no question whatever of the tremen- 
dous importance of the concept of the electric field as 
a tool in thinking about, describing, correlating, and 
predicting the properties of electrical systems; elec- 
trical science is inconceivable without this or some- 
thing equivalent. But in addition to this aspect of 
the field concept, the further tacit implication of 
physical reality is almost always present, and has had 
/the greatest influence on the character of physical 
; thought and experiment. Yet I do not believe that 
the additional implication of physical reality has 
justified itself by bringing to light a single positive 
\ result, or can offer more than the pragmatic plea of 
having stimulated a large number of experiments, all 
with persistently negative results. It is sufficient to 
mention the fate of the attempt of Faraday and Max- 
well to ascribe a stress like that of ordinary matter 
to the ether, which failed because, among other 
reasons, nothing can exist in the ether analagous to the 
strain of ordinary matter, to indicate the unfruitful- 
ness of the idea of physical reality. It seems to me 
that any pragmatic justification in postulating reality 
for the electric field has now been exhausted, and that 
we have reached a stage where we should attempt to 



OTHER GENERAL CONSIDERATIONS 



get closer to the actual facts by ridding the field con- 
cept of the implications of reality. 

Another indispensable and most interesting con- 
struct is that of the atom. This is evidently a con- 
struct, because no one ever directly experienced an 
atom, and its existence is entirely inferential. The 
atom was invented to explain constant combining 
weights in chemistry. For a long time there was no 
other experimental evidence of its existence, and it 
remained a pure invention, without physical reality, 
useful in discussing a certain group of phenomena. 
It is one of the most fascinating things in physics to 
trace the accumulation of independent new physical 
information all pointing to the atom, until now we 
are as convinced of its physical reality as of our hands 
and feet. 

A construct which had to be abandoned because it 
did not turn out to have physical reality, and which 
furthermore was not sufficiently useful in the light of 
newly discovered phenomena, was that of a caloric 
fluid. 

The notion of "physical reality" is not of prime 
importance to this discussion of the character of our 
constructs ; our definition of the meaning of physical 
reality may not appeal to everyone. The essential 
point is that our constructs fall into two classes : those 
to which no physical operations correspond other 
than those which enter the definition of the construct, 
and those which admit of other operations, or which 
could be defined in several alternative ways in terms 



Co THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



of physically distinct operations. This difference in 
the character of constructs may be expected to cor- 
respond to essential physical differences, and these 
physical differences are much too likely to be over- 
looked in the thinking of physicists. We must 
always be on our guard not to forget the physical dif- 
ferences between a thing like a stress in an elastic 
body and an electromagnetic field. 

The moral of all this is that constructs are most 
useful and even unavoidable things, but that they may 
have great dangers, and that a careful critique may 
be necessary to avoid reading into them implications 
for which there is no warrant in experience, and 
which may most profoundly affect our physical out- 
look and course of action. 

The Role of Mathematics in Physics 
Practically all the formulations of theoretical 
physics are made in mathematical terms; in fact to 
obtain such formulations is generally felt to be the 
goal of theoretical physics. It is then evidently per- 
tinent to consider what the nature of the mathematics 
is to which we assign so prominent a role. 

We have in the first place to understand why it is 
possible to express physical relations in mathematical 
language at all. I am not sure that there is much 
meaning in this question. It is the merest truism, 
evident at once to unsophisticated observation, that 
mathematics is a human invention. Furthermore, the 
mathematics in which the physicist is interested was 
developed for the explicit purpose of describing the 



OTHER GENERAL CONSIDERATIONS 6i 



behavior of the external world, so that it is certainly 
no accident that there is a correspondence between 
mathematics and nature. The correspondence is not 
by any means perfect, however, but there is always in 
mathematics a precise quality to which none of our 
information about nature ever attains. The theorems 
of Euclid's geometry illustrate this in a preeminent 
degree. The statement that there is just one straight 
line between two points and that this is the shortest 
possible path between the points is entirely different 
in character from any information ever given by 
physical measurement, for all our measurements are 
subject to error. It is possible, nevertheless, to give a 
certain real physical meaning to the ideally precise 
statements of geometry, because it is a result of every- 
day experience that as we refine the accuracy of our 
physical measurements the quantitative statements of 
geometry are verified within an ever decreasing 
margin of error. From this arises that view of the 
nature of mathematics which apparently is most com- 
monly held; namely that if we could eliminate the 
imperfections of our measurements, the relations of 
mathematics would be exactly verified. Abstract 
mathematical principles are supposed to be active in 
nature, controlling natural phenomena, as Pythagoras 
long ago tried to express with his harmony of the 
spheres and the mystic relations of numbers. 

This idealized view of the connection of mathe- 
matics with nature could be maintained only during 
that historical period when the accuracy of physical 
measurement was low, and must now be abandoned. 



62 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



For it is no longer true that the precise relations of 
Euclid's geometry may be indefinitely appoximated 
to by increasing the refinements of the measuring pro- 
cess, but there are essential physical limitations to the 
very concepts of length, etc., which enter the geomet- 
rical formulations, set by the discrete structure of 
matter and of radiation. This is no academic matter, 
but touches the essence of the situation. There is no 
longer any basis for the idealization of mathematics, 
and for the view that our imperfect knowledge of 
nature is responsible for failure to find in nature the 
precise relations of mathematics. It is the mathe- 
matics made by us which is imperfect and not our 
knowledge of nature. [From the operational point 
of view it is meaningless to attempt to separate 
"nature" from "knowledge of nature".] The con- 
cepts of mathematics are inventions made by us in 
the attempt to describe nature. Now we shall repeat- 
edly see that it is the most difficult thing in the world 
to invent concepts which exactly correspond to what 
we know about nature, and we apparently never 
achieve success. Mathematics is no exception; we 
doubtless come closer to the ideal here than anywhere 
else, but we have seen that even arithmetic does not 
completely reproduce the physical situation. 

Mathematics appears to fail to correspond exactly 
to the physical situation in at least two respects. In 
the first place, there is the matter of errors of meas- 
urement in the range of ordinary experience. Now 
mathematics can deal with this situation, although 
somewhat clumsily, and only approximately, hy 



OTHER GENERAL CONSIDERATIONS 63 



Specifically supplementing its equations by statements 
about the limit of error, or replacing equations by 
inequalities — in short, the sort of thing done in every 
discussion of the propagation of error of measure- 
ment. In the second place, and much more impor- 
tant, mathematics does not recognize that as the 
physical range increases, the fundamental concepts 
become hazy, and eventually cease entirely to have 
physical meaning, and therefore must be replaced by 
other concepts which are operationally quite difTerent. 
For instance, the equations of motion make no dis- 
tinction between the motion of a star into our galaxy 
from external space, and the motion of an electron 
about the nucleus, although physically the meaning 
in terms of operations of the quantities in the equa- 
tions is entirely different in the two cases. The struc- 
ture of our mathematics is such that we are almost 
forced, whether we want to or not, to talk about the 
inside of an electron, although physically we cannot 
assign any meaning to such statements. As at present 
constructed, mathematics reminds one of the loqua- 
cious and not always coherent orator, who was said to 
be able to set his mouth going and go off and leave 
it. What we would like is some development of 
mathematics by which the equations could be made 
to cease to have m.eaning outside the range of num- 
erical magnitude in which the physical concepts 
themselves have meaning. In other words, the prob- 
lem is to make our equations correspond more closely 
to the physical experience back of them; it evidently 
needs some sort of new invention to accomplish this. 



64 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



We return later, in discussing Lorentz's equations 
of electrodynamics, to the disadvantages arising from 
the present undiscriminating character of mathe- 
matics. In the meantime, we must recognize that there 
are very important advantages here, as well as dis- 
advantages. All experience justifies the expectation 
that the laws of nature with which we are already 
familiar hold at least approximately and without 
violent change in the unexplored regions immediately 
beyond our present reach. By assuming an unlimited 
validity for the laws as we now know them, mathe- 
matics enables us to penetrate the twilight zone, and 
make predictions which may be later verified. It is 
only when we are carried too far afield that we must 
deprecate this characteristic of our mathematics. 

There is another aspect of the use of mathematics 
in describing nature that is often lost sight of ; namely, 
that any system of equations can contain only a very 
small part of the actual physical situation; there is 
behind the equations an enormous descriptive back- 
ground through which the equations make connection 
with nature. This background includes a description 
of all the physical operations by which the data are 
obtained which enter the equations. For instance, 
when Einstein formulates the behavior of the uni- 
verse in terms of the world lines of events, the events 
as they enter the equations are entirely colorless 
things, merely 3 space and 1 time coordinate. To 
make connection with experience there must be a 
descriptive background giving the physical contents 
of the events; for example, there may be the state- 



OTHER GENERAL CONSIDERATIONS 65 



ment that some of the events are light signals. This 
descriptive background is supposed to remain fixed, 
unaffected by any operations to which the equations 
themselves are subject. If, for example, the frame of 
reference of the equations is altered by changing its 
velocity, the physical significance of the descriptive 
background is supposed to remain unaltered, or 
rather no mention is usually made of this question at 
all. It w^ould seem, however, that this matter needs 
some discussion. The descriptive background gets its 
meaning only in terms of certain physical operations. 
If the descriptive background remains unaltered 
when the uniform velocity of the frame of reference 
is changed, for instance, this means that the motion 
of the frame of reference does not at all affect the 
possibility of carrying out certain operations. This 
is pretty close to the restricted principle of relativity / 
itself, which states that the form of natural laws is not . 
affected by uniform velocity. Until a more careful 
analysis of the situation is made it would seem there- 
fore that there is some ground for the suspicion that 
the principle of relativity is involved in the possi- 
bility of giving to physical phenomena a complete ^ 
mathematical formulation, understanding ^^com- 
plete" to mean "including the descriptive back- 
ground." 



CHAPTER III 



DETAILED CONSIDERATION OF VARIOUS 
CONCEPTS OF PHYSICS 

We now begin our detailed consideration of the 
most important concepts of physics. It is entirely 
beyond the scope of this essay to attempt more than 
an indication of some of the most important matters. 
Neither is it to be expected that the parts of this dis- 
cussion will always have a very close connection with 
each other; the purpose of the discussion is to aid in 
acquiring the greatest possible self-consciousness of 
the whole structure of physics. 

The Concept of Space 

/ A logically satisfying definition of what we under- 
stand by the concept of space is doubtless difficult to 
give, but we shall not be far from the mark if we 
think of it as the aggregate of all those concepts which 

"have to do with position. Position means position of 
something. The position of things is determined by 
some system of measurement; perhaps the simplest 
is that implied in a Cartesian coordinate system with 
its three measurements of length. Hence much of the 
essential discussion of space has already been given 
in connection with the concept of length. We have 
seen that measurements of length are made with phys- 
66 



THE CONCEPT OF SPACE 



67 



ical measuring rods applied to some physical object. 
We cannot measure the distance between two points 
in empty space, because if space were empty there 
would be nothing to identify the position of the ends 
of the measuring rod when we move it from one posi- 
tion to the next. We see, then, from the point of 
view of operations that the framework of Cartesian 
geometry, often imagined in an ideal mathematical 
sense, is really a physical framework, and that what 
we mean by spatial properties is nothing but the 
properties of this framework. When we say that 
space is Euclidean, we mean that the physical space 
of meter sticks is Euclidean: it is meaningless to ask 
whether empty space is Euclidean. Geometry, there- 
fore, in so far as its results are expected to apply to 
the external physical world, and in as far as it is not 
a logical system built up fom postulates, is an experi- 
mental science. This view is now well understood 
and accepted, but there was a time when it was not 
accepted, but vigorously attacked ; the change of atti- 
tude toward this question is symptomatic of a change 
of attitude toward many other similar questions. 

We have already emphasized that the space of 
astronomy is not a physical space of meter sticks, but 
is a space of light waves. We may, therefore, have 
different kinds of space, depending on the funda- 
mental operations. The space of meter sticks we have 
called ^^tactual space", and the space of light beams 
^'optical space". If we ask whether astronomical 
space is Euclidean, we mean merely to ask whether 
those features of optical space which are within the 



68 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



reach of astronomical measurement are Euclidean. 
The only possible attitude with respect to this ques- 
tion, or such related questions as whether the total 
volume of space is finite, or whether space has curva- 
ture, is that it is entirely for experiment to decide, 
and that we have no right to form any preconceived 
notion whatever. It is therefore beyond the scope of 
this discussion. 

It is interesting to notice that the restricted theory 
of relativity virtually assumes, although often with- 
out making the explicit statement, that tactual and 
optical space are the same. This equivalence results 
from the properties assumed for light beams. The 
distance of a mirror may be found equally well by 
measuring it with meter sticks, or by determining the 
time required by a light signal to travel there and 
back. This situation is, however, logically unsatis- 
fying, because it must be assumed that the operations 
for measuring time are independently defined, and 
we shall see that they are not. It is a consequence of 
the assumed equivalence of tactual and optical space 
that the path of a beam of light is a straight line, as a 
straight line is determined by operations with meter 
sticks. When we come to astronomical phenomena, 
the physical operations with meter sticks can no 
longer be carried out, and it is meaningless to ascribe 
to beams of light on an astronomical scale the same 
geometrical properties that we do on a small scale. 

The Concept of Time 
According to our viewpoint, the concept of time 



THE CONCEPT OF TIME 



69 



is determined by the operations by which it is meas- 
ured. We have to distinguish two sorts of time ; the 
time of events taking place near each other in space, 
or local time, and the time of events taking place at 
considerably separated points in space, or extended 
time. As we now know, the concept of extended 
time is inextricably mixed up with that of space. 
This is not primarily a statement about nature at all, 
and might have been made simply by the observation 
that the operations by which extended time is meas- 
ured involve those for measuring space. Of course 
historically the doctrine of relativity was responsible 
for the critical attitude which led to an examination 
of the operations of measuring time, but relativity 
was not necessary for a realization of the spatial 
implications of time, any more than the discovery of 
Planck's quantum unit h w^as necessary for the inven- 
tion by Planck of his absolute units of measurement, 
although historically he was inspired to make this 
invention by discovering h, and in his own mind 
seems to have thought of the connection as a necessary 
one.* 

The physical operations at the basis of the meas- 
urement of time have never been subjected to the 
critical examination which seems to be required. One 
method of measurement, for instance, involves the 
properties of light. 

A meter stick is set up with mirrors at the two 
ends, and a light beam travels back and forth between 

^ Max Planck, The Theory of Heat Radiation, translated by 
Masius, P. Blakiston's Son & Co., 19 14 edition, p. 174. 



70 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



the two mirrors without absorption. The time 
required for a single passage back and forth is 
defined as the unit of time, and time is measured 
simply by counting these intervals. But such a pro- 
cedure is unsatisfactory if we are to permit ourselves 
all those operations which are demanded by even the 
simplest postulate of relativity, for we must be able 
to move our clock from place to place, transfer it 
from one system to another in relative motion, and 
with it determine the properties of light beams in the 
stationary or moving system. We recognize in prin- 
ciple that the length of the meter stick may be dif- 
ferent w^hen it is in motion, that it may change also 
during the acceleration incident to moving it from 
one place to another, and that until proved to the 
contrary the velocity of light may be a function of 
velocity or acceleration. The complicated interplay 
of all these possibilities leaves us in much doubt as 
to the physical significance of such postulates as, for 
example, that the velocity of light is the same in the 
moving system and the stationary system. In order 
to ascribe any simple significance to postulates about 
the velocity of light, it would seem that we must 
have an instrument for measuring this velocity, and 
therefore for measuring time, which does not itself 
involve the properties of light. To do this we might 
seek to specify the measurement of time in purely 
mechanical terms, as for instance in terms of the 
vibration of a tuning fork, or the rotation of a 
flywheel. But here again we encounter great diffi- 
culties, because we recognize that the dimensions of 



THE CONCEPT OF TIME 71 



our mechanical clock may change when it is set in 
motion, and that the mass of its parts may also change. 
We want to use the clock as a physical instrument in 
determining the laws of mechanics, which of course 
are not determined until we can measure time, and 
we find that the laws of mechanics enter into the 
operation of the clock. 

The dilemma which confronts us here is not an 
impossible one, and is in fact of the same nature as 
that which confronted the first physicist who had to 
discover simultaneously the approximate laws of 
mechanics and geometry with a string which 
stretched when he pulled it. We must first guess at 
what the laws are approximately, then design an 
experiment so that, in accordance with this guess, 
the effect of motion on some phenomenon is much 
greater than the expected effect on the clock, then 
from measurements with uncorrected clock time find 
an approximate expression for the effect of motion 
on mass or length, with which we correct the clock, 
and so on ad infinitum. However, so far as I know, 
the possibility of such a procedure has not been 
analyzed, and until the analysis is given, our com- 
placency is troubled by a real disquietude, the inten- 
sity of which depends on the natural skepticism of 
our temperament. 

In practice, the difficulties of such a logical treat- 
ment are so great that the matter has been entirely 
glossed over. It is convenient to postulate a clock, of 
unknown construction, but such that the velocity of 
light, when measured in terms of it^ has certain prop- 



72 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



crtics. Such, for example, is the point of view in 
Birkhoff's recent book/ The difficulty with this 
metliod is that the resulting edifice is as divorced 
from physical reality as is the logical geometry of 
postulates. We cannot be at all sure that the prop- 
erties of light as measured with our physical clocks 
are the same as the theoretical properties. The diffi- 
culty is particularly important and fundamental in 
the general theory of relativity; the basis of the 
whole theory is the infinitesimal interval ds, which 
is supposed to be given. Once given, the mathematics 
follows. But in a physical world, ds is not given, but 
must be found by physical operations, and these 
operations involve measurements of length and of 
time with clocks whose construction is not specified. 
In any actual physical application the question must 
be answered whether the physical instrument used in 
measuring the temporal part of ds is really a clock 
or not. There is at present no criterion by which 
this question can be answered. If the vibrating atom 
is a clock, then the light of the sun is shifted toward 
the infra-red, but how do we know that the atom is a 
clock (some say yes, others no) ? If we find the dis- 
placement physically have we thereby proved that 
general relativity is physically true, or have we 
proved that the atom is a clock, or have we merely 
proved that there is a particular kind of connection 
between the atom and the rest of nature, leaving the 
possibility open that neither is the atom a clock nor 

^ G. D. Birkhoff. Relativity and Modern Physics, Harvard 
University Press, 1923. 



THE CONCEPT OF TIME 



73 



general relativity true? In practice, of course, we 
shall adopt the solution which is simplest and most 
satisfying aesthetically, and doubtless shall say that 
the atom is a clock and relativity true. But if we 
adopt this simple view, we must also cultivate the 
abiding consciousness that at some time in the future 
troubles may have their origin here. 

It seems to me that the logical position of general 
relativity theory is merely this: Given any physical 
system, then it is possible to assign values to ds such 
that relations mathematically deduced by the prin- 
ciple of relativity correspond to relations between 
measurable quantities in the physical system; but that 
the things that we physically call ds are anything 
more than approximately connected with the dss 
required to give the mathematical relations, is at 
present no more than a pious faith. 

To return to the concept of time, we have already 
stated that there are two main problems, that of meas- 
uring time at a single point of space, and that of 
spreading a time system over all space. The second 
aspect of the problem is that to which attention has 
been directed by relativity theory; the following 
detailed examination shows how the operations of 
relativity for setting and synchronizing clocks at dis- 
tant places involve the measurement of space. It is 
a fundamental postulate that the adjustment of the 
clocks is to be accomplished by light signals. The 
synchronization of the clocks is now simple enough. 
We merely demand that light signals sent from the 
master clock at intervals of one second arrive at any 



74 



TFIE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



distant clock -at intervals of one second as measured 
by it, and we change the rate of the distant clock 
until it measures these intervals as one second. After 
its rate has been adjusted, the distant clock is to be so 
set that when a light signal is despatched from the 
master clock at its indicated zero of time the time 
of arrival recorded at the distant clock shall be such 
that the distance of the clock from the master clock 
divided by the time of arrival shall give the velocity 
of light, assumed already known. This operation 
involves a measurement of the distance of the distant 
clock, so that in spreading the time coordinates over 
space the measurement of space is involved by defini- 
tion, and the measurement of time is, therefore, not a 
self-contained thing. This is the physical basis for 
the treatment of space and time as a four-dimensional 
manifold. Although mathematically the numbers 
measuring space and time enter the formulas symmet- 
rically, nevertheless the physical operations by which 
these numbers are obtained are entirely distinct and 
never fuse, and I believe it can lead only to con- 
fusion to see in the possibility of a four dimensional 
treatment anything more than a purely formal matter. 

The notion of extended time, therefore, involves 
the measurement of space. It is an interesting ques- 
tion whether the notion of local time also involves 
the measurement of space. A rigorous answer to 
this question involves giving the specifications for 
the construction of a clock, which we have seen has 
not yet been done. It seems to me probable, how- 
ever, that the construction of even a single local clock 



THE CONCEPT OF TIME 



75 



involves in some way the measurement of space. If, 
for example, we use a vibrating tuning fork, we must 
find how the time of vibration depends on the ampli- 
tude of vibration, and this involves space measure- 
ment, or if we use a rotating flywheel, we have to 
correct for the change of moment of inertia due to 
the change of dimensions when it is set into motion 
or brought into a gravitational field, and all this 
involves space measurement. However, these con- 
siderations are not certain, and perhaps the question 
is not important. 

There is now the further consideration that actu- 
ally in practice the concept of local time is not 
entirely divorced from that of extended time, for 
two bodies cannot occupy the same space at the same 
time, and the time of any event is actually measured 
on an instrument at some distance, communication 
being maintained by light or elastic signals. But 
experience convinces us that in the limit, as the 
phenomenon to be measured gets closer to the clock, 
there is no measurable difference, whether communi- 
cation with the clock is maintained by light, or 
acoustical or tactual signals, so that we have come 
in physical practice to accept measurement of the 
time of events in the immediate neighborhood of the 
clock (local time) as one of the ultimately simple 
things behind which we do not attempt to go. 

Local time is, therefore, a concept treated by the 
physicist even now as simple and unanalyzable. This 
concept is what most people have in mind when they 
think of time. Time, according to this concept, is 



76 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



something with the properties of local time; it was 
something of this kind that Newton must have meant 
by his absolute time, and it is the tacit retention of 
this sort of concept that is responsible for the diffi- 
culty so often found in grasping the idea of the rela- 
tivity of simultaneity, which is of course entirely 
foreign to our experience of simultaneity in local 
time. An examination of the operations involved 
in extending time has shown how the concept of 
extended time is different from that of simple local 
time; this difference leads to appreciably different 
numerical relations when we are dealing with high 
velocities or great distances. Local time is proved 
by experience not to be a satisfactory concept for 
dealing with events separated by great distances in 
space or with phenomena involving high velocities. 
For instance, we must not talk about the age of a 
beam of light, although the concept of age is one of 
the simplest derivatives of the concept of local time. 
Neither must we allow ourselves to think of events 
taking place in Arcturus now with all the connota- 
tions attached to events taking place here now. It 
is difficult to inhibit this habit of thought, but we 
must learn to do it. The naive feeling is very strong 
that it does mean something to talk about the entire 
present state of the universe independent of the proc- 
ess by which news of the condition of distant parts 
is determined by us. I believe that an examination 
of this feeling will show that it is psychological in 
character ; what we mean by the totality of the present 
is merely the entire present content of our conscious- 



THE CONCEPT OF TIME 



77 



ness. This is apparently a simple direct thing; we 
do not appreciate until we make further analysis that 
our present consciousness of the existence of the moon 
or a star is due to light signals, and that therefore 
the apparently simple immediate consciousness of 
events distant in space involves complicated physical 
operations. 

Similarly, if we continue to use local time, we get 
into trouble, when we go to high velocities, with our 
simple concept of velocity, which may be defined in 
terms of a combination of space and time concepts. 
The concept of local time thus loses its value and 
becomes merely a blunted tool when we try to carry 
it out of its original range. But the concept of 
extended time, with which we have to replace local 
time, is a complicated thing, to which we have not 
yet got ourselves accustomed; it may perhaps prove 
to be so complicated as never to be a very useful 
intuitive tool of thought. 

All these considerations about time have been con- 
cerned only with intervals of such an order of magni- 
tude that they are readily experienced by any indi- 
vidual. If we have to deal with intervals either very 
long or very short, it is obvious that our entire pro- 
cedure changes, and consequently the concept 
changes. In extending the time concept to eras 
remote in the past, for example, we try as always, to 
choose the new operations so as to piece on continu- 
ously with those of ordinary experience. A precise 
analysis of the change in the concept of time when 
applied to the remote past does not seem to be of 



78 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



great significance for our present physical purpose, 
and will not be attempted here. It is perhaps worth 
while to point out, however, that all our other con- 
cepts, as well as that of time, must be modified when 
applied to the remote past; an example is the concept 
of truth. It is amusing to try to discover what is the 
precise meaning in terms of operations of a statement 
like this: ^^It is true that Darius the Mede arose at 
6:30 on the morning of his thirtieth birthday." 

Of more concern for our physical purposes is the 
modification which the time concept undergoes 
when applied to very short intervals. What is the 
meaning, for example, in saying that an electron 
when colliding with a certain atom is brought to rest 
in 10-'^ seconds? Here I believe the situation is very 
similar to that with regard to short lengths. The 
nature of the physical operations changes entirely, 
and as before, comes to contain operations of an elec- 
trical and optical character. The immediate signifi- 
cance of 10-'^ is that of a number, which when sub- 
stituted into the equations of optics, produces agree- 
ment with observed facts. Thus short intervals of 
time acquire meaning only in connection with the 
equations of electrodynamics, whose validity is doubt- 
ful and which can be tested only in terms of the 
space and time coordinates which enter them. Here 
is the same vicious circle that we found before. Once 
again we find that concepts fuse together on the limit 
of the experimentally attainable. 

This discussion of the concept of time will doubt- 
less be felt by some to be superficial in that it makes 



THE CONCEPT OF TIME 



79 



no mention of the properties of the physical time to 
which the concept is designed to apply. For instance, 
we do not discuss the one dimensional flow of time, 
or the irrevocability of the past. Such a discussion, 
however, is beyond our present purpose, and would 
take us deeper than I feel competent to go, and per- 
haps beyond the verge of meaning itself. Our dis- 
cussion here is from the point of view of operations: 
we assume the operations to be given, and do not 
attempt to ask why precisely these operations were 
chosen, or whether others might not be more suitable. 
Such properties of time as its irrevocability are 
implicitly contained in the operations themselves, 
and the physical essence of time is buried in that long 
physical experience that taught us what operations 
are adapted to describing and correlating nature. We 
may digress, however, to consider one question. It 
is quite common to talk about a reversal of the direc- 
tion of flow of time. Particularly, for example, in 
discussing the equations of mechanics, it is shown that 
if the direction of flow of time is reversed, the whole 
history of the system is retraced. The statement is 
sometimes added that such a reversal is actually 
impossible, because it is one of the properties of 
physical time to flow always forward. If this last 
statement is subjected to an operational analysis, I 
believe that it will be found not to be a statement 
about nature at all, but merely a statement about 
operations. It is meaningless to talk about time mov- 
ing backward: by definition, forward is the direction 
in which time flows. 



So 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



The Causality Concept 
The causality concept is unquestionably one of the 
most fundamental, perhaps as fundamental as that 
of space and time, and therefore at least equally 
entitled to a first place in the discussion. But as 
ordinarily understood, there are certain spatial and 
temporal implications in the causality concept, so 
that it can best be discussed in this order after our 
examination of space and time. 

There is an aspect of the causality concept that in 
many respects is closely related to the question of 
^^explanation", for to find the causes of an event 
usually involves at the same time finding its explana- 
tion. But there are nevertheless sufficient differences 
to warrant a separate discussion. 

It seems fairly evident that there was originally in 
the causality concept an animistic element much like 
that in the concept of force to be discussed later. The 
physical essence of the concept as we now have it, 
freed as much as possible from the animistic ele- 
ment, seems to be somewhat as follows. We assume 
in the first place an isolated system on which we can 
perform unlimited identical experiments, that is, the 
system may be started over again from a definite 
initial condition as often as desired.' We assume 

^ We must include in general in the concept of ''initial condi- 
tion" the past history of the system. In order not to make this 
condition so broad as to defeat itself, we have to add the observa- 
tion that actually identity of past history is necessary over only a 
comparatively short interval of time. Logical precision seems un- 
attainable here — the physical concepts themselves have not the 
necessary precision. 



THE CAUSALITY CONCEPT 



8i 



further that when so started, the system always runs 
through exactly the same sequence of events in all its 
parts. This contains the assumption that the course 
of events runs independent of the absolute time at 
which they occur — there is no change with time of 
the properties of the universe/ It is a result of 
experience that systems with these properties actually 
exist. An alternative way of stating our fundamental 
hypothesis is that two or more isolated similar systems 
started from the same initial condition run through 
the same future course of events. Upon the system 
given in this way, which by itself runs a definite 
course of events, we assume that we can superpose 
from the outside certain changes, which have no con- 
nection with the previous history of the system, and 
are completely arbitrary. Now of course in nature, 
as we observe it, there is no such thing as an arbitrary 
change, without connection with past history, so that 
strictly our assumption is a pure fiction. It is here 

* As so often in physics, we appear to be doing two things at 
once here. It is doubtful whether we can give a meaning to 
"definite initial condition" apart from the future behavior of the 
system, so that we have no real right to infer from uniform future 
behavior both a constancy of the laws of nature, independent of 
time, and a constancy of initial condition. I very much question 
whether a thoroughgoing operational analysis would show that 
there are really two independent concepts here, and whether the 
use of two formally quite different concepts is anything more than 
a convenience in expression. It seems to me that it may be just 
as meaningless to ask whether the laws of nature are independent 
of time as it was to ask with Clifford whether the absolute scale 
of magnitude may not be changing as the solar system travels 
through space. 



82 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 

that the animistic element still seems to persist, 
although perhaps not necessarily. We regard our 
acts as not determined by the external world, so that 
changes produced in the external world by acts of 
our wills are, to a certain degree of approximation, 
arbitrary. The system, then, on which we are experi- 
menting, is one capable of isolation from us in that 
we may regard ourselves as outside the system, and 
having no connection with it. The system, further- 
more, is capable of isolation from the rest of the 
physical universe, in that events taking place outside 
the system have no connection with those taking place 
inside.' Experience gives the justification for assum- 
ing that physical isolation of this sort is possible. 
Actually, of course, isolation is never complete, but 
only partial, up to presumably any desired degree of 
approximation. 

The statement that two exactly similar isolated 
systems, starting from the same initial conditions 
(including past history in the general idea of initial 
condition) will run through the same future course 
of events involves as a corollary that if differences 
develop in the behavior of two such apparently sim- 
ilar systems these differences are evidence of other 
previous differences. The thesis that this corresponds 
to experience may be called the thesis of essential 
connectivity and is perhaps the broadest we have: it 

^ Here again, the concept of "isolation" or "connection" is 
defined only in terms of the behavior of the system, and it is not 
clear whether this is really an operationally independent concept 
or not. 



THE CAUSALITY CONCEPT 83 



is the thesis that differences between the behavior of 
systems do not occur isolated but are associated with 
other difiPerences. It is essentially the same thesis as 
that already mentioned in connection with "explana- 
tion", namely that it is possible to correlate any of the 
phenomena of nature with other phenomena. 

If now the connectivity or correlation between 
phenomena is of a special kind, we have a causal 
connection; namely, if whenever we arbitrarily 
impress event A on a system we find that event B 
always occurs, whereas if we had not impressed A, 
B would not have occurred, then we say that A is 
the cause of B, and B the effect of A. By suitably 
choosing the event A, we may find the effect of any 
event of which the system is susceptible. 

The relation between A and B is an unsymmetri- 
cal one, by the very nature of the definition, the cause 
being the arbitrary variable element, and the effect 
that which accompanies it. Furthermore, A may 
obviously be the cause of more than one event B, and 
may cause a whole train of events. 

The causal concept analyzed in this way is not 
simple by any means. We do not have a simple 
event A causally connected with a simple event B, 
but the whole background of the system in which the 
events occur is included in the concept, and is a vital 
part of it. If the system, including its past history, 
were different, the nature of the relation between 
A and B might change entirely. The causality con- 
cept is therefore a relative one, in that it involves the 
whole system in which the events take place. 



84 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 

In practice we now take an exceedingly pregnant 
step and seek to extend the concept, and rid ourselves 
as much as possible of its relativity. It is a matter 
of experience that there are often a great number of 
systems in which A is the cause of B. In many cases 
the causal relation persists through such a very wide 
range of systems that we lose sight entirely of the 
system, and come to assume that we have an absolute 
causal connection between A and B. For instance, 
when I strike a bell, and hear the sound, the causal 
connection persists through such a great number of 
different kinds of system that I might think that 
here is an absolute causal connection. Such an abso- 
lute causal connection would mean that always under 
all circumstances, the striking of the bell is accom- 
panied by a sound. But all conditions means only all 
those conditions covered by experiment. Thus in 
the case of the bell, all our experiments were made 
in the presence of the atmosphere. The causal con- 
nection between the striking of the bell and the 
sound should have been always recognized in prin- 
ciple as relative to the presence of the atmosphere. 
Indeed, later experiments in the absence of the 
atmosphere show that the atmosphere does play an 
essential part. Now as a matter of fact, the atmos- 
phere is so comparatively easy to remove that we 
very readily include the atmosphere in the chain of 
causal connection. But if the atmosphere had been 
impossible to remove, like the old ether of space, our 
idea of the causal connections between the striking 
of the bell and its sound might have been quite dif- 



THE CAUSALITY CONCEPT 85 



ferent. In actual physical applications of the causal- 
ity concept, the constant background which is main- 
tained during all the variations by which the causal 
connection is established usually has to be inferred 
from the context. 

It is a matter of perhaps universal experience that 
the event A is accompanied by not only one event, 
which is the effect of A by definition, but A entails a 
whole causal train of events. It seems to be a general- 
ization from experience that the causally connected 
train of events started by A is a never ending train, 
provided the system is large enough. This is per- 
haps not necessary in the general case, but if the event 
A involves imparting external energy to the system, 
or the action of external force (momentum change), 
there can be no question. 

That there is a causal train started by A is par- 
ticularly evident if A and B are separated in space. 
Thus in the case of the bell, the impulse given to the 
air by the vibration of the bell is propagated through 
the air as an elastic wave, which thus constitutes the 
causal train of events. The phenomenon of propaga- 
tion is characteristic of causal connections of a 
mechanical character, and is the justification for the 
introduction of the time concept in connection with 
the causality concept, where it now appears for the 
first time. It is evident that when a disturbance is 
propagated to a distant point, the effect follows the 
cause in time, as time is usually measured. 

We extend this result, and usually think that the 
effect necessarily follows the cause. We now examine 



86 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



whether this is a necessary result of the causality 
concept. If we are to talk about the time of events 
at different places, we must have some way of setting 
clocks all over space. If this is done arbitrarily, 
there is no necessary connection between the local 
clock times of a cause and its effect, but nevertheless 
the causality concept involves a certain temporal 
relation even in this most general case. Suppose that 
event A takes place at point 1 and its effect, event B, 
at point 2. We station a confederate at 2 who sends 
a light signal (or any other sort of signal) to 1, as 
soon as the event B occurs at 2, Then it is a conse- 
quence of the nature of the causality concept that 
the signal cannot arrive at 1 before event A occurs. 
For if it did arrive before A, we should merely omit 
to perform A, which by hypothesis is arbitrary, and 
entirely in our control, and then our assumption 
would be violated that the system is such that the 
event B occurs only when A also occurs. The same 
argument shows a fortiori that if the effect B occurs 
at the same place as its cause A, it cannot precede 
it in time. I cannot see that the nature of the causal- 
ity concept imposes any further restriction on the 
time of B. The restricted principle of relativity, 
however, in postulating that no signal can be propa- 
gated faster than a light signal, virtually makes a 
further assumption about the temporal connection of 
causally connected events, namely, that the event B 
at 2 cannot occur before the arrival at 2 of a light 
signal which started from 1 at the instant that A 
occurred at 1. For if B did occur earlier, we could 



THE CAUSALITY CONCEPT 



87 



use events A and B as a signaling code, thus violat- 
ing our hypothesis. 

There is thus a closest connection in time, when 
time is extended over space as the theory of relativity 
directs, between cause and effect, depending on their 
separation in space; from this arises the relativity 
concept of the causal cone, which in the four dimen- 
sional manifold of space-time divides the aggregate 
of all those events which may be causally related 
from the aggregate of those which are separated by 
such a small interval in time and such a large inter- 
val in space that communication by light signals and 
therefore a causal connection is not possible. Given 
now two events A and B which are related as cause 
to effect in one system of reference, then they must 
be causally related also in every other system of refer- 
ence. For if they were not, we could by definition of 
causality suppress the event A in one of the systems 
in which the causal relation does not hold, and this, 
because of the nature of the concept of event, involves 
suppressing A in all the systems, thus violating our 
hypothesis of a causal connection in the original sys- 
tem. The concept of eventinvolved in this argument 
will be examined later. It appears then, that the 
fundamental postulate of relativity (that the form 
of natural laws is the same in all reference systems) 
demands that the temporal order of events causally 
connected be the same in all reference systems. 

The whole universe at this present moment is often 
supposed to be causally connected with all succeeding 
states. This means that if we could repeat experience, 



88 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



starting from the same initial conditions, the future 
course of events would always be found to be the 
same. The truth of this conviction can never be 
tested by direct experiment, but it is something at 
which we arrive by the usual physical process of 
successive approximation. It is difficult to formulate 
precisely what we mean by "present" state of the uni- 
verse, and there is every reason to think that such a 
formulation is not unique, but the concept contains 
the necessary implication that none of the events con- 
stituting the "present" can be causally connected. 
The events in distant places which constitute the 
present must be separated by an interval of time less 
than time required by light to travel between the two 
places. 

The conviction, arising from experience, that the 
future is determined by the present and correspond- 
ingly the present by the past, is often phrased dififer- 
ently by saying that the present causally determines 
the future. This is iR a certain sense a generalization 
of the causality concept. It is one of the principal 
jobs of physics to analyze this complex causal connec- 
tion into components, representing as far as possible 
the future state of the system as the sum of independ- 
ent trains of events started by each individual event 
of the present. How far such an analysis is possible 
must be decided by experiment. It is certainly pos- 
sible to a very large extent in most cases, but there 
seems to be no reason to expect that a complete 
analysis is possible. So far as the system is describ- 
able in terms of linear differential equations, the 



THE CAUSALITY CONCEPT 



89 



causal trains started by different events propagate 
themselves in space and time without interference 
and with simple addition of effects, and conversely 
the present may be analyzed back into the simple sum 
of elementary events in the past, but if the equations 
governing the motion of the system are not linear, 
effects are not additive, and such a causal analysis 
into elements is not possible. No emphasis is to be 
laid here on the differential aspect of the equations: 
it is quite possible that finite difference equations 
may have the same property of additivity. Although 
there can be no question that linear equations enor- 
mously preponderate, neither can there be any doubt 
that some phenomena cannot be described in terms 
of linear equations {e.g., ferro-magnetism) , so that 
there seems no reason to think that a causal analysis 
is always possible. I believe, however, that the 
assumption that such an analysis into small scale ele- 
ments is possible is tacitly made in the thought of 
many physicists. If the analysis is not possible, we 
may expect to find results following the cooperation 
of several events which cannot be built up from the 
results of the events occurring individually. 

When a causal analysis is possible, finding the sim- 
plest events which act as the origin of independent 
causal trains is equivalent to finding the ultimate 
elements in a scheme of explanation, so that here we 
merge with the concept of explanation, as already 
mentioned. As was true of the explanatory sequence, 
so here there can be no formal end of the causal 
sequence, because we can always ask for the cause 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



of the last member. But it may be physically mean- 
ingless to extend the causal sequence beyond a cer- 
tain point. We have seen from the point of view of 
operations that the causal concept demands the pos- 
sibility of variation in the system. It is therefore 
meaningless to say that A is the cause of B unless v^e 
can experience systems in which A does not occur. 
Now if in extending the causal sequence, we even- 
tually arrive at a condition so broad that physically 
no further variation can be made, our causal sequence 
has to stop. 

Corresponding to this property of the causality 
concept, the causal sequence may be terminated either 
formally, by postulate, or naturally, by the intrinsic 
physical nature of the elements of the sequence. Thus 
if we say that light gets from point to point because 
it is propagated by a medium of unalterable prop- 
erties, which fills all space, which is always present 
and can never be eliminated physically, we have by 
the postulated properties of the medium brought the 
possibility of further inquiry to a close, because to 
take the next step and ask the cause of the properties 
of the ether, demands that we be able to perform 
experiments with the ether altered or absent. Such 
an ending of the sequence is evidently pure formal- 
ism, without physical significance. But other con- 
siderations may give physical significance. Thus if 
there are other sorts of experiment that can be 
explained by assuming a universal medium of the 
same properties, the concept proves not only to be 
useful, but to have a certain degree of physical sig- 



THE CAUSALITY CONCEPT 



91 



nificance. An example of an inevitable termination 
of the causal sequence is afforded by the possibility, 
already mentioned, that the value of the gravitational 
constant may be determined by the total quantity of 
matter in the universe. Without further qualifica- 
tion, this is an entirely sterile statement, but if it can 
be shown that there is a simple numerical connection, 
the matter takes on interest, and we may seek further 
for a correlation between the numerical relation and 
other things. 

This analysis of the causality concept does not pre- 
tend to be complete and leaves many interesting ques- 
tions untouched. Perhaps one of the most interesting 
of these questions is whether we can separate into 
cause and effect two phenomena which always accom- 
pany each other, and whether therefore the classifi- 
cation of phenomena into causally connected groups 
is an exhaustive classification. But the discussion is 
broad enough for our purpose here; the most impor- 
tant points of view to acquire are that the causality 
concept is relative to the whole background of the 
system which contains the causally connected events, 
and that we must assume the possibility of an 
unlimited number of identical experiments, so that 
the causality concept applies only to sub-groups of 
events separated out from the aggregate of all events. 

The Concept of Identity 
One of the most fundamental of all the concepts 
with which we describe the external world is that of 
identity; in fact, thinking would be almost inconceiv- 



92 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



able without such a concept. By this concept we 
bridge the passage of time; it enables us to say that 
a particular object in our present experience is the 
same as an object of our past experience. From the 
point of view of operations, the meaning of identity 
is determined by the operations by which we make 
the judgment that this object is the same as that one 
of my past experience. In practice there are many 
indirect ways of making this judgment, but I believe 
the essence of the situation lies in the possibility of 
continuous connection between the object of the 
present and the past by continuous observation 
(either direct or indirect) through all intermediate 
time. We must, for example, be able to look con- 
tinuously at the object, and state that while we look 
at it, it remains the same. This involves the posses- 
sion by the object of certain characteristics — it must 
be a discrete thing, separated from its surroundings 
by physical discontinuities which persist. The con- 
cept of identifiability applies, therefore, only to cer- 
tain classes of physical objects; no one thinks of 
trying to identify the wind of to-day with the wind of 
yesterday. It is somewhat easier to identify a liquid 
such as water in its flow in a stream, because we can 
make the motion of the water visible by solid par- 
ticles suspended in it, but even here it is not easy to 
prove to a captious critic that it is really the water 
and not the suspended particles of solid that we are 
identifying. Even solids, when our measurements 
are sufficiently refined, seem to lose their discon- 
tinuous edges, as has been suggested in the discussion 



THE CONCEPT OF IDENTITY 93 



of the approximate character of experimental arith- 
metic, and the identity concept becomes hazy. 

There can be no question that the concept of 
identity is a tool perfectly well adapted to deal 
approximately with nature in the region of our ordi- 
nary experience, but we have to ask a more serious 
question. Does not the apparent demand of our 
thinking apparatus to be furnished with discrete and 
identifiable things to think about impose a very essen- 
tial restriction on any picture of the physical universe 
which we are able to form? We are continually sur- 
prising ourselves in the invention of discrete struc- 
ture further and further down in the scale of things, 
whole sole raison d'etre is to be found entirely within 
ourselves. Thus Osborne Reynolds ^ has speculated $je^ 



seriously and most elaborately about an atomic struc-^ 
ture in the ether, and we find Eddington ' hinting 
at the existence of structure of an order of magnitude 
of 10-40 cm. On a much larger scale of magnitude 
we also think in the same terms, and conceive posi- 
tive and negative elementary charges with hard and 
impenetrable cores, which involves a complete 
change in the law of force at points sufficiently close. 
What physical assurance have we that an electron in 
jumping about in an atom preserves its identifiability 
in anything like the way that we suppose, or that the 
identity concept applies here at all ? In fact, the iden- 

^ Osborne Reynolds, The Sub-Mechanics of the Universe, 254 
pp., Cambridge University Press, 1903. 

^ A. S. Eddington, Report on Gravitation, Lon. Phys. Soc., 
1918, p. 91. 




94 



THi: LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



tity concept seems to lose all meaning in terms of 
actual operations on this level of experience. 

The mind seems essentially incapable of dealing 
with continuity as a property of physical things; it is 
not even able to talk about continuity except in nega- 
tive terms. To each attempted description of the 
properties of a truly continuous substance, it can say 
^'No, it is not that", but cannot imagine experience 
which corresponds to what it conceives a really con- 
tinuous thing ought to feel like. In terms of opera- 
tions, continuity has only a sort of negative meaning. 
Now certain implications of this inability of the mind 
can be removed by appropriate postulates, as, for 
example, we can postulate the complete annihilation 
of a negative by a positive charge, as is now being 
done in certain speculations.^ There is point in doing 
this, because the annihilation of two charges has 
physical meaning. But it is a question whether all 
implications of this habit of thought can be removed, 
and whether any picture that we can form of nature 
will not be tinged — sicklied o'er with the pale cast 
of thought. 

The operational view suggests that in this last we 
are coming perilously close to a meaningless question, 
although there is a certain sense in which there is 
meaning here. It may turn out as a matter of fact 
that we shall not be able to carry our delving into 
small-scale phenomena deeper than a certain point, 
and that nature will appear to be finite downward, 
so that we shall bring up against a wall of some kind. 

' For example, J. H. Jeans, Nat. 114, 828-829, 1924. 



THE CONCEPT OF IDENTITY 



But to ask in such a situation whether we have come 
to the end because nature is really finite, or whether 
we only appear to be at an end because of some prop- 
erty of our minds, such as inability to deal with con- 
tinuity, is, I believe, a meaningless question. 

In actual use the identity concept is extended, and 
identity is used in other senses than the fundamental 
one examined above. For instance, we speak of two 
observers seeing the same object, or if the object 
moves or does something, we may speak of two 
observers perceiving the same happening. A hap- 
pening about which the judgment of sameness is pos- 
sible when perceived by different observers (or 
mathematically expressed when observed in two ref- 
erence frames) is what we mean by an event, which 
is one of the fundamental concepts of relativity 
theory. What now is involved in this concept of 
event, or what do we mean when we say that two 
observers experience the same event? A first crude 
attempt might say that the event is the same if it is 
described in the same way by the two observers. But 
this leads us into all the complicated questions of 
the meaning of language, which we would gladly 
avoid, and is furthermore not true, because the 
whistle of a locomotive, for example, does not have 
the same pitch for two observers moving with differ- 
ent velocities. A satisfactory analysis of the situation 
is difficult to give, but I believe the essence lies in the 
discrete character of the event, just as the identity 
concept when applied only to objects involved dis- 
creteness. The event is bounded on all sides by dis- 



96 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



continuities, both in space and time. Now it seems 
to be a result of experience that discontinuities have a 
certain absolute significance, in that there is a 
one-to-one correspondence between the discontinui- 
ties observed in any one reference system and those 
observed in any other. Corresponding discontinui- 
ties in two reference systems are by definition the 
same. An event is by definition the aggregate of all 
phenomena bounded by certain discontinuities, and 
two reference systems are by definition describing the 
same event if the discontinuous boundaries of the 
event are the same, irrespective of the appearance of 
the event in the two systems. The emission of a 
light signal, for example, is an event according to this 
definition, although it may appear as red light in 
one reference system and green in another. 

We now see that the concept of event is only an 
approximate concept, as was also that of identity, 
and for the same reason, namely, there are no such 
things in experience as sharp discontinuities, but as 
our measurements become more refined, the edges of 
supposed discontinuities become blurred. As we go 
to smaller scales of magnitude this blurring becomes 
more important, until the physical possibility of per- 
forming those operations by which the discontinui- 
ties are detected entirely disappears, and the concept 
of event acquires, in terms of operations, an entirely 
different meaning. We continue to think of the event 
in the same way as before in terms of a mental model, 
but the true operational significance now depends on 
the particular phenomenon under consideration. The 



THE CONCEPT OF VELOCITY 97 



concept of event is really not the same sort of thing 
when applied to the emission of a quantum of radia- 
tion from an atom, or the emission of gamma radia- 
tion from a radioactive disintegration, or the flashing 
of a signal from a dark lantern by opening and closing 
a shutter. Here as always, when our range of experi- 
ence is extended, we must be prepared at some future 
time to find that, by extending the ordinary concept 
of event to small-scale phenomena by the device of 
the mental model, we have by implication smuggled 
into our picture phenomena which do not exist, so 
that it will be necessary to revise our thinking, cast- 
ing it into terms corresponding to direct experience. 

The Concept of Velocity 
The concept of velocity, as ordinarily defined, 
involves the two concepts of space and time. The 
operations by which we measure the velocity of an 
object are these: we first observe the time at which 
the object is at one position, and then later observe 
the time at which it is at a second position, divide the 
distance between the two positions by the time inter- 
val, and if necessary, when the velocity is variable, 
take the limit. As long as we deal with fairly low 
velocities we do not have to inquire carefully as to 
the kind of time we use in these operations, but when 
the velocities become high, we do have to take care 
to use the local times at the two positions of the body, 
which means that we must have a time system spread 
over space, or, in other words, the '^extended" time 
system. This velocity concept, defined in this way, 



98 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



may be used as a tool in describing nature, and it will 
be found that nature has certain properties; for 
example, the velocity of light is 3 x 10'° cm./sec. 
Further, no material thing can be given a velocity as 
high as this, but as its velocity is made to approach 
this value, increments of energy increasing without 
limit are required. 

But now it is very much a question for examination 
whether the velocity concept defined in this particular 
way has been chosen wisely as a tool for describing 
natural phenomena. It is quite possible to modify 
the velocity concept, that is, to set up other opera- 
tions which correspond to our instinctive feeling of 
what velocity is in terms of immediate sensation and 
such that all numerical measures are unmodified at 
low velocities.^ For example, a traveller in an auto- 
mobile measures his velocity by observing the clock 
on his instrument board and the mile stones which he 
passes on the road. This operation dififers from that 
of the definition above in that the time is no longer 
extended time, but is the local time of the moving 
object. The space coordinates used in this alternative 
operation at first seem a hybrid sort of thing, but 
they are what the observer would actually most natu- 
rally use : they are what he would measure with a tape 
measure fixed to a point of the road and allowed to 

X ^ It is an interesting question for the psychologist whether the 
velocity concept is not a more primitive thing in order of apprehen- 
sion than that of time, and whether the concept of time is not 
derived from observing things in motion, or whether indeed there 
is any necessary connection at all between velocity and time in 
terms of untutored experience. 



THE CONCEPT OF VELOCITY 99 



unwind as he proceeds, or what is measured by a 
vessel at sea with a log line let out behind. Or there 
is still another most interesting way of defining 
velocity, in which the analysis into space and time is 
not made at all, but velocity is directly measured by 
building up the given velocity by physical addition 
of a unit velocity selected arbitrarily. This matter 
is discussed at some length in my book ^^Dimensional 
Analysis^',"^ but is of sufficient pertinence here to 
describe briefly. We may in the first place construct 
a concrete standard for velocity, as, for example, by 
stretching a string between two pegs on a board with 
a fixed weight. If we strike the string, a disturbance 
travels along the string which we can follow with 
the eye, and we define unit velocity as the velocity of 
this disturbance. An object has greater than unit 
velocity if it outruns the disturbance, and less if it 
lags behind. We may now duplicate our standard, 
making another board with pegs and stretched string, 
and check the equality of the two velocities by observ- 
ing that the two disturbances run together. We now 
define two units of velocity as the velocity of anything 
which runs with the disturbance of the string of the 
second board, when the second board is made to 
move bodily with such a velocity that it runs with 
the disturbance of the first string. The process 
may be extended indefinitely, and any velocity 
measured. 

If either of these two alternative definitions of 
velocity were adopted, it would be found that the 

* Yale University Press, 1922. 



100 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 

velocity of light is infinite. Further, there would be 
no limit to the velocity which can be imparted to 
material bodies on giving them unlimited energy, 
which is what we are prepared to regard from ordi- 
nary experience is natural and simple. The infinite 
velocity for light, on the other hand, is most unnat- 
ural, particularly if we favor a medium point of 
view. We are here faced with a dilemma — all sorts 
of phenomena cannot at the same time be treated 
simply. If we attach the most fundamental signifi- 
cance to the behavior of material bodies, we shall do 
well to adopt one of the alternative definitions of 
velocity. If, on the other hand, we regard the 
phenomena of light as the most fundamental, we shall 
endeavor to form our definition so that the properties 
of light are simple. This was precisely the point 
of view of Einstein; it is characteristic of his entire 
scheme of restricted relativity that light is the funda- 
mental thing, and this influenced him in adopting the 
first definition of velocity. Now one can have no 
quarrel with this desire to make light fundamental 
(the wisdom of doing this is to be justified by the 
results) , and if the properties of light are to be treated 
mathematically, one can easily see the desirability of 
getting rid of infinite attributes, and so admit the 
desirability of making the velocity of light finite. 
But all this involves another very insidious assump- 
tion which we ourselves have tacitly used in all our 
preceding discussion, namely, that the notion of 
velocity properly pertains to light at all. Einstein 
has very definitely adopted this point of view, and 



THE CONCEPT OF VELOCITY 



SO determined the character of the entire structure 
of relativity. I believe, on the contrary, that it is 
very gravely to be questioned whether the identifica- 
tion of light with a thing travelling, which is involved 
in applying the velocity concept, should be made. 
This discussion must be postponed, however, until we 
deal with the properties of light. The important 
points for us to notice at present are that the definition 
of velocity actually used involves the concept of 
extended time, and that it would be possible to define 
velocity in different ways, which would give quite a 
different complexion to phenomena at high velocities, 
but which would leave untouched our ordinary 
experience. 

The velocities at which the precise form of defini- 
tion becomes important are higher than can be 
reached in ordinary mechanical experiments. Such 
velocities can be attained in terrestrial laboratories 
only with electrified particles, as in experiments in 
high vacua or with radioactive disintegrations. It is 
interesting to notice that we very seldom attempt a 
direct measurement of velocity in such experiments 
by following a discrete particle in its flight and find- 
ing the time required to pass over a measured dis- 
tance, but the velocities are measured indirectly, by 
calculation from the equations of electrodynamics 
and in terms of such immediately observed things as 
curvature of path. It is true that one or two experi- 
ments have attempted a more direct measure of 
velocity, but it seems there is room for more work 
here. 



I02 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 

The Concepts of Force and Mass 
Another concept of great importance is that of 
force. Since the usual analysis finds a connection 
between force and acceleration, and acceleration 
involves velocity, this is a natural place for the dis- 
cussion of force. This concept has been subjected to 
much analysis by various vs^riters. In origin the con- 
cept doubtless arises from the muscular sensations 
of resistance experienced from external bodies. This 
crude concept may at once be put on a quantitative 
basis by substituting a spring balance for our muscles, 
or instead of the spring balance w^e may use any 
elastic body, and measure the force exerted by it in 
terms of its deformation. Of course, the various 
precautions which must be taken in carrying out this 
idea physically are complex; the matter of precau- 
tions against temperature changes, for example, is 
one of the most easily understood. The concept of 
force so defined is limited to static systems ; it is the 
task of statics to find the relation between the forces 
in systems at rest. We next extend the force concept 
to systems not in equilibrium, in which there are 
accelerations, and we must conceive that at first all 
our experiments are made in an isolated laboratory 
far out in empty space, v/here there is no gravitional 
field. We here encounter a new concept, that of mass, 
which as it is originally met is entangled with the 
force concept, but may later be disentangled by a 
process of successive approximations. The details of 
the various steps in the process of approximation are 
very instructive as typical of all methods in physics, 



THE CONCEPTS OF FORCE AND MASS 103 



but need not be elaborated here. Suffice it to say that 
we are eventually able to give to each rigid material 
body a numerical tag characteristic of the body, such 
that the product of this number and the acceleration 
it receives under the action of any given force applied 
to it by a spring balance is numerically equal to the 
force, the force being defined, except for a correction, 
in terms of the deformation of the balance, exactly 
as it was in the static case. In particularly, the rela- 
tion found between mass, force, and acceleration 
applies to the spring balance itself by which the force 
is applied, so that a correction has to be applied for a 
diminution of the force exerted by the balance arising 
from its own acceleration. 

We now extend the scope of our measurements by 
bringing our laboratory into the gravitational field 
of the earth, and immediately our experience is 
extended, in that we continually see bodies accele- 
rated with no spring balance (that is, no force) acting 
on them. We extend the concept of force, and say 
that any body accelerated is acted on by a force, and 
the magnitude of this force is defined as that which 
would have been necessary to produce in the same 
body the same acceleration with a spring balance in 
empty space. There is physical justification for this 
extension in that we find we can remove the accelera- 
tion which a body acquires in a gravitational field 
by exerting on it with a spring balance a force of 
exactly the specified amount in the opposite direction. 
This extended idea of force may also be applied to 
systems in which there are electrical actions. 



I04 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 

We thus see that in extending the notion of force 
from bodies in rest to bodies in motion, the character 
of the concept has changed, because the operations 
by which force is measured change — the force acting 
on a body is now measured in terms of its acceleration. 
But in determining the force from the acceleration, 
we have to know the mass. This mass has to be inde- 
pendently measured with the original concept of 
force; otherwise we have no basis for such simple 
statements as that the force of gravity on a body is 
proportional to its mass. All this applies to the 
ordinary range of experiments with low velocities. 
If now we extend the range of measurements, we find 
phenomena which we had not expected ; for example, 
there seem to be difficulties in the way of indefinitely 
increasing the velocity of a material body, as of a 
charged atom. We begin to ask searching questions : 
is the force of gravity independent of velocity at high 
velocities, or is the mass independent of velocity 
under the same conditions or independent of the 
gravitational field, etc.? 

In attempting to answer these new questions, we 
find difficulty with the concepts in terms of which 
they are formulated. There are no operations by 
which we can find whether force is independent of 
velocity unless we first know the mass, or any opera- 
^ \ tions by which a mass can be measured unless we 
know a force. The purely mechanical systems with 
the highest velocities of which we have any experi- 
mental knowledge are the heavenly bodies. The 
motion of these is, with the important exception of 



THE CONCEPTS OF FORCE AND MASS 105 



Mercury, that predicted by the ordinary laws of 
mechanics, so that at first it might appear that we 
have here confirmation of the laws of mechanics for 
bodies with comparatively high velocities. But it 
must be remembered that all we can observe of the 
heavenly bodies is their positions, and that we cannot 
perform on these bodies all the operations by which 
we can check the laws of mechanics for terrestrial 
phenomena. If, for example, mass and the force 
with which gravity acts on mass were both equally 
affected by velocity, the motion of the heavenly 
bodies would be exactly the same as that observed 
now. Hence as we increase the range of velocity, 
the concepts of force and mass simultaneously lose 
their definiteness, and become partially fused. This 
is typical of what we have now come always to expect 
near the limit of the experimentally attainable; 
experience becomes less rich, the choice of physical 
operations more restricted, concepts change and 
become fewer in number. If we are to retain the 
same formal number of concepts, we must introduce 
arbitrary conventions or definitions. These defini- 
tions are to be determined largely by convenience. 
In the case of mechanical systems, this motive of 
convenience is supplied by considerations from out- 
side the domain of mechanical phenomena. The 
highest velocities of practice are not reached in 
mechanical, but in electrical systems, in experiments 
with vacuum tubes, etc. Considerations of conveni- 
ence are therefore dictated from the electrical point 
of view. These considerations will be gone into in 



io6 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



much more detail later; the conclusion is all that we 
need here, which is that it is convenient to assume for 
the charge of the electron a constant number, inde- 
pendent of the velocity, and this involves making its 
mass variable in a definite way with velocity. Now if 
the principle of relativity is accepted, the mass of 
mechanical objects must vary with velocity in the 
same way as the mass of electrical charges. Since 
the variability of this latter is fixed, mechanical mass 
becomes a definite function of velocity, and the force 
is therefore also fixed in any specific physical case. 

The fundamental definition of force given above 
is highly academic, involving as it does hypothetical 
experiments in laboratories situated far out in empty 
space. Some sort of procedure like this seems to 
correspond to more or less explicit statements to be 
found in the literature of mechanics. The meaning 
in terms of actual operations to be given to such 
definitions involves complicated inferential reason- 
ing. We would make much closer connection with 
the conditions of actual experiment if in the defini- 
tion we substituted for the hypothetical operations 
in empty space more or less approximately realizable 
operations on bodies sliding on level table tops 
without friction. I suppose our instinctive feeling 
for the laws of mechanics is such that we are con- 
vinced that definitions in terms of an interstellar 
space laboratory or a level table top are actually the 
same. But in principle we must recognize that when 
the operations are different, the concepts are dififer- 
ent, and if we adopt something equivalent to the tabic 



THE CONCEPTS OF FORCE AND MASS 107 



top definition, as it seems we are physically forced 
to do, we must leave open in our thinking the pos- 
sibility of finding in the present penumbra, when our 
accuracy is sufficiently increased, such phenomena 
perhaps as directional attributes of mass in a 
gravitational field. 

We have just considered the sort of problem that 
we encounter on ordinary scales of magnitude on 
going from low to high velocities ; what becomes of 
the concepts of force and mass when we go to a very 
small scale? Down to the atomic scale we may at 
least slur over the new physical difficulties, for 
although we cannot of course experiment with actual 
atoms, we can nevertheless make measurements of 
the Brownian ' movement of suspensions in liquids 
settling in a gravitational field, for example, and the 
extrapolation to the atom is not a very great one. 
The mass of each individual atom is obtained by 
what is equivalent to a process of counting, assum- 
ing the law of conservation of mass on an atomic 
scale. This is justified by all chemical experience. 
The mass of the component parts of the atoms, the 
electrons, may also perhaps be given a unique sig- 
nificance after we have decided on the laws of the 
electrical field, by experiments on acceleration in 
electrical fields. The question which interests in 
principle here is what meaning, if any, shall be 
attached to the mass of the elements of the electron. 

^ This phenomenon is discussed at length in the book by J. 
Perrin, Brownian Movement and Molecular Reality, translated 
by F. Soddy, Taylor and Francis, I_x)ndon, 1909. 



io8 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



It is evident that we here go beyond any possible 
experience, at least for the present, and that experi- 
ence has again become poorer and our concepts fewer 
in number. All that we can now demand is that 
certain combinations of numbers, some of which rep- 
resent mechanical mass and others electrical charge, 
have proper relations to each other when integrated 
throughout the entire body of the electron. Similar 
questions confront us when we ask what are the forces 
which the parts of the electron exert on each other. 
We return to this question in considering the nature 
of the electrical concepts. In any event, the concepts 
of both force and mass are entirely altered in this 
domain. 

It is interesting to note, in passing, that present 
electrical theory gives no meaning to the mass of the 
elements of the electron, since the total electro- 
magnetic mass of the electron is built up from the 
mutual terms in the action of the elements — the total 
mass is not a linear resultant of the action of the 
elements. 

The Concept of Energy 
In examining the concept of energy, we start with 
purely mechanical energy. In isolated mechanical 
systems, in which there are only conservative forces, 
the sum of kinetic and potential energy is constant. 
The kinetic energy may be defined as S ^ mv'', 
formed for all parts of the body. The potential 
energy is determined by the position of the parts of 
the system, and has physical significance only with 



THE CONCEPT OF ENERGY 109 



reference to a datum position, that is, only changes 
of potential energy have meaning in terms of opera- 
tions. The total energy ascribed to the system has 
therefore an element of arbitrariness in that the 
datum position may be chosen at random, and energy 
acquires meaning only on tracing the history back to 
the epoch of the datum position. 

The concept of energy may be extended from 
mechanical systems to all systems with which we are 
acquainted ; the operations by which meaning is given 
to the extended energy concept involve the general- 
ized conservation principle, or the first law of ther- 
modynamics. The extension to thermal systems is 
immediate; the inclusion of optical and electrical 
systems in the scheme was a most important physical 
step, which of course required careful experimental 
justification. Because of its wide range of applica- 
tion, the energy concept has now come to be regarded 
as one of the most important in physics ; this idea was 
held by Ostwald' twenty and more years ago, and is 
now much to the front because of the connection 
between mass and energy indicated by the theory of 
relativity, and the important role assigned to energy 
levels in spectrum analysis. 

What now is the precise nature and significance 
of the general energy concept? In the first place 
the conservation property of energy is one of the sim- 
plest and most obvious of the properties of matter, so 
that in this property of energy is seen a reason for 
ascribing to it certain of the properties of matter, in 

^ W. Ostwald, Die Energie, Barth, Leipzig, 1908. 



1 lO 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



particular and most important, that of localization in 
i^pacc. We must recognize, however, that this idea 
of a location in space is injected into the situation 
entirely by ourselves, and corresponds to nothing 
directly given by the operations of experiment. The 
idea has had a most important effect, however. Wit- 
ness, for instance, the importance ascribed to the dis- 
covery by Kelvin of a function by which the total 
energy of an electric field can be represented as dis- 
tributed through space ;^ this was one of the most 
important props of the medium point of view. 

A more critical examination is likely to diminish 
considerably our satisfaction with this naive analogy 
drawn between matter and energy. With regard to 
matter, we may still be tolerably satisfied with our 
ascription to matter of location in space, but it is 
quite different with regard to conservation of matter. 
In just what sense is matter conserved? Certainly 
not in terms of mass, as we at one time thought. 
Nevertheless we undeniably have a feeling that there 
is some sort of conservation property here, and are 
driven to formulate it badly in terms of a hypo- 
thetically constant number of protons and electrons. 
I have long thought that Newton was groping after 
some very similar idea when he so far forgot himself 
as to define mass as quantity of matter, a definition 

* This function is %K times the scalar product of electric force 
and displacement. If Maxwell's definition of displacement is 
adopted, the factor yg-rr is replaced by and an accurate analogy 
results between the energy stored in the ether and the elastic energy 
stored in a bent spring. 



THE CONCEPT OF ENERGY iii 



perfectly meaningless to a rigorous and unsym- 
pathetic interpretation. On the other hand, whatever 
meaning may reside in our idea of conservation of 
matter, it certainly is not, in at least one important 
respect, like the conservation of energy. For the 
energy of an isolated mechanical system is a function 
of the frame of reference in which it is described; 
merely by giving velocity to the reference frame and 
altering in no way the mechanical system we may 
change its kinetic, and so its total, energy by any 
direct amount. This does not even remotely resemble 
ordinary matter. I cannot see that the operations 
which are equivalent to the energy concept justify 
us in saying more than that energy is a property of a 
material system; the operations do not seem to give 
any unique meaning to a location associated with 
energy. 

We now ask what significance is to be ascribed to 
the sort of conservation that energy does have. We 
restrict ourselves first to mechanical systems. The 
motions of a mechanical system satisfy certain differ- 
ential equations of the second order, and the actual 
motion is to be found by an integration of the equa- 
tions. In the integral of a differential equation cer- 
tain constants appear which are determined by the 
initial conditions, and are therefore the same during 
all the future motion of the system; obviously these 
constants of motion correspond to conservative prop- 
erties. This reasoning can of course be at once 
extended. Any system, mechanical or not, whose 
motion is determined by differential equations, will 



112 THK LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 

have certain conservative properties. For the systems 
of mechanics energy is one of the conservative func- 
tions; others are momentum and moment of momen- 
tum. Energy is particularly simple, in that it is 
connected with measurable properties of the system 
by a simple formula (S^mv'), and is further- 
more scalar, which is also a property of quantity of 
matter. But to go further and ascribe to energy other 
properties of matter, such as localization in space, is 
entirely overlooking the essential difference in the 
character of the operation by which matter and quan- 
tity of energy are measured, that is, overlooking the 
essential difference in their physical character. 

The possible extension of the energy concept from 
mechanics to thermodynamics receives a sufficient 
physical explanation in terms of our views of the 
essentially mechanical character of thermal phenom- 
ena. That the idea can be extended also to simple 
electrical or magnetic systems, in which the effect of 
velocity of propagation is neglected, is a consequence 
of the fact that in these systems the equations of 
motion remain of the same general mechanical type, 
it having been shown by Maxwell that the equations 
of such systems may be written in the generalized 
Lagrangean form. When, however, we extend our 
formulas to systems in which the velocity of propaga- 
tion is important (that is, when we consider the field 
equations in their general form) we find that the 
Lagrangean equations no longer apply to matter 
taken by itself, and energy is no longer conserved in 
the original sense. A new function appears, however, 



THE CONCEPT OF ENERGY 113 

which behaves mathematically in the same way that 
the energy did before. The equations of motion of 
the system remain Lagrangean in form if the mechan- 
ical parts of the system are supplemented by the elec- 
tric and magnetic fields in space. In this extended 
form we have, therefore, a conservative function as 
before, and the energy concept may be retained in this 
enlarged aspect. The physical operations by which 
energy is determined are entirely altered, however, 
and the physical character of the concept is changed. 
No more than before is there justification for localiz- 
ing energy in space, or ascribing to it other properties 
of matter. Yet the materialization of the energy con- 
cept, and the consequent desire that energy be local- 
ized in space, is one of the strongest arguments in 
many minds for the existence of a medium. 

As far as I can see, therefore, the existence of con- 
servative functions is involved in the possibility of 
describing natural phenomena with differential equa- 
tions. That further there is a conservative function 
of the precise form found in mechanics is a conse- 
quence of the particular form of the equations and 
the nature of the forces. The question of the signifi- 
cance of the fact that the forces of nature appear to 
be conservative, with respect to this particular func- 
tion of mechanics, is of much interest, but it is not 
our immediate concern now. We are interested 
rather to ask under what general conditions we shall 
have conservative functions. Quantum theory 
strongly suggests that when we pass to phenomena on 
a small enough scale, we may no longer be able to 



114 TME LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 

employ differential equations in our descriptions, and 
hence the previous reason for the existence of con- 
stants connected with the motion disappears. Now 
there is one obvious remark to be made about this 
more general situation. Whenever the future history 
of a system is so connected with its present condition 
that we can retrace our way to the present from any 
future configuration, we shall always have conserva- 
tive functions. For any future configuration contains 
certain fixed (or conservative) features, in that we 
can reconstruct the unique present from any future 
state. There is no reason to expect that the operations 
by which we find the fixed features will always be 
simple, as in the mechanical case. Now the deter- 
mination of the future by the present, and conversely 
the possibility of reconstructing the present from the 
future (or the past from the present), is, we are con- 
vinced, a property which is at least approximately 
true of phenomena down to a smaller scale of magni- 
tude than we have yet reached, and so we expect to 
find these conservative functions in systems whose 
ultimate laws of motion are much more general than 
any with which we are yet familiar. The particular 
form of the conservative function depends on the 
character of the system. That there is a scalar con- 
servative function for ordinary systems depends of 
course on particular properties of the system, but we 
are at least prepared to find that a scalar conservative 
function does not necessarily mean a differential equa- 
tion of the second order. 

The potential energy of a system has a particular 



THE CONCEPT OF ENERGY 115 



significance with respect to this point of view. In 
an ordinary mechanical system, the potential energy 
simply measures the work done by the applied forces 
in being displaced from the initial to the final posi- 
tions; that is, the potential energy is a measure of the 
deviation from the initial position, and so measures 
a certain feature of the history of the system. In the 
more general system, in which we may not have dif- 
ferential equations, we may look for something 
analogous to the potential energy which shall meas- 
ure the displacement of the system from its initial 
configuration. Such a measure is always possible as 
long as the past can be reconstructed from the present 
(or the present from the future) . We recall a remark 
of Poincare's ' to the effect that we of necessity must 
always have conservation, because if we have a sys- 
tem in which conservation apparently fails, we 
merely have to invent a new form of potential energy. 
This remark is obviously not of entire generality, 
but applies only to such systems as those considered 
here, in which the past may be reconstructed from 
the present. 

Of late there has been much discussion of the 
advisability, on the basis of certain quantum 
phenomena, of giving up conservation as a principle 
applied to the details of the emission and absorption 
of light, retaining it only in a statistical sense. It 
seems to me that the question here in the minds of 

* Henri Poincare, Wissenschaft und Hypothese, translated into 
German by F. and L. Lindemann, Teubner, Leipzig, 1906, Chap. 
VIII. 



ii6 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



physicists was always merely one of convenience, and 
that few, if any, doubted the ultimate applicability 
of the principle of Poincare, or thought that we were 
here concerned with a system of such great generality 
that the past could not be reconstructed from the 
present. The question was merely whether those 
variables in terms of which the potential energy is 
defined make close enough connection with other 
things of immediate experimental significance, or 
whether on the whole the retention of a potential 
energy is not more trouble than is justified by its 
convenience, making a treatment from the statistical 
point of view preferable. However, this is all now 
a matter of more or less past history, because with 
the recent extension of the experiments of Compton,^ 
we seem to have experimental evidence for the valid- 
ity of the conservation law in detail for elementary 
quantum processes, with a corresponding simple 
potential energy. 

Going still deeper, however, there are quantum 
phenomena which still may have to be treated by 
statistical methods, and this may mean giving up 
conservation in detail. We have no experimental 
evidence, for example, of what the electron is doing 
while jumping from one quantum orbit to another. 
A situation like this merely means that those details 
which determine the future in terms of the past may 
lie so deep in the structure that at present we have no 
immediate experimental knowledge of them, and we 

W. Bothe and H. Geiger, 2S. f. Phys. 32, 639-663, 1925. A. 
H. Compton, Proc. Nat. Acad. Soc, 11, 303-306, 1925. 



THE CONCEPT OF ENERGY 



117 



may for the present be compelled to give a treatment 
from a statistical point of view based on considera- 
tions of probability. But I suppose that no one, 
except perhaps Norman Campbell/ will maintain 
that such a situation is more than temporary, or will 
cease to search for consequences of these details of 
structure which may be open to experimental 
verification. 

Similarly, we cannot permanently be satisfied with 
a picture of radioactive phenomena which represents 
radioactive disintegration as a matter of chance. 

The general conclusion to which all this discussion 
leads is that energy is probably not entitled to the 
fundamental position that physical thought is 
inclined to give it, but that it is a more or less inci- 
dental consequence of more deep-seated properties, 
and that the character of these deep-seated properties 
is subject to only the most general restrictions, so that 
very little about the nature of the details can be 
inferred from the existence of any energy function. 

The Concepts of Thermodynamics 
We shall not be concerned here with the many 
technical questions which are the proper subject of 
treatises on thermodynamics, but shall attempt an 
examination only of some fundamental concepts. 

The most fundamental of these, which sets thermo- 
dynamics off apart from the simpler subjects, is prob- 
ably that of temperature. In origin this concept was 

^ Norman Campbell, Time and Chance, Phil. Mag. I, 1106- 
II17, 1926. 



iiS THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 

without question physiological, in much the same 
way as the mechanical concept of force was physio- 
logical. But just as the force concept was made more 
precise, so the temperature concept may be more or 
less divorced from its crude significance in terms of 
immediate sensation and be given a more precise 
meaning. This precision may be obtained through 
the notion of equilibrium states. We have in the 
first place the fundamental experimental fact that ■ 
when a small body is placed inside a large system, 
which we recognize by crude means as comparatively 
invariable in temperature as time goes on, the small 
body very soon acquires a steady condition, that is, 
it comes to equilibrium with its surroundings. We 
now have the further experimental fact that if the 
small body A is in equilibrium with its environment, 
and body B is also in equilibrium with the same envi- 
ronment, there will be no change of condition of A 
and B when they are brought into contact with each 
other — that is, A and B are each in equilibrium with 
the other and also with the environment and there- 
fore, by definition, at the same temperature as the 
environment. The temperature of the environment \ 
is now measured in terms of some of the properties 
of A and B which crude experience has shown change 
with the physiological temperature of A and B. The 
physiological notion of temperature is thus made 
more precise by being connected with the physical 
phenomenon of equilibrium. 

Now it is at once evident that stated in this way 
without qualification we have said things that are not 



THE CONCEPTS OF THERMODYNAMICS 119 



true. It is not true in general that, when A is in 
equilibrium with an environment and B is in equilib- 
rium with the same environment, A will be in 
equilibrium with B. Suppose, for example, that the 
environment is a stream of water and A is a tiny 
water wheel moving freely in its bearings, and that 
B is a similar wheel with much friction. Then we 
know that B will become warm, and will not be in 
equilibrium with A when brought into contact with 
it. Or we may choose for A a mercury thermometer 
with bulb covered with putty, and for B a similar 
thermometer with bulb sheathed in platinum, and we 
know that the two thermometers will not register 
the same temperature in the water stream. Or still 
more simply, we may try to read the temperature of 
the air in our garden on any bright day with a sil- 
vered and with a blackened bulb thermometer; we 
know that the two thermometers will read different 
temperatures. It is evident, therefore, that we shall 
have to specify much more carefully the conditions 
under which equilibrium holds if we are to give pre- 
cise significance to the temperature concept. 

It seems fairly evident in the first place that we 
shall have to rule out systems in which there is large 
scale mechanical motion; the simple notion of tem- 
perature does not apply to a system moving with 
respect to us. Only when the two thermometers A 
and B move with the same velocity as the stream do 
we have three-fold equilibrium between the stream, 
A and B. We may state this in another way by say- 
ing that the temperature of a moving body must be 



120 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 

measured on a thermometer stationary with respect 
to the body, but this is only a matter of words, and 
properly speaking the temperature concept applies 
only to a certain aspect of the relation between two 
bodies mutually at rest. We here entirely neglect 
relativity questions such, for example, as the proper 
way of correcting for the change of dimensions of 
moving thermometers. 

If now the body whose temperature we are measur- 
ing does not move with the same velocity in all its 
parts, we may still give a meaning to local tempera- 
ture by dividing the body into parts so small that the 
velocity of each part is essentially uniform, and meas- 
uring the temperature of each part with a ther- 
mometer stationary with respect to it. We are now 
confronted with the question of how far to carry the 
process of subdivision. Suppose we have a fluid 
whose motion is completely turbulent when measured 
with instruments of the ordinary scale of magnitude. 
For such a fluid the fundamental equilibrium propor- 
tions hold between two measuring bodies A and B 
and the fluid, provided that the bodies A and B arc 
so large that the motion is completely turbulent on 
their scale of magnitude. We may then define the 
temperature of the turbulent fluid from the stand- 
point of these large scale bodies. But we may also 
define the temperature from the small scale point of 
view as the average of the temperatures recorded by 
sufficiently small thermometers, each moving with 
the velocity of a local bit of the fluid. These two 
temperatures will in general be different, and we 



THE CONCEPTS OF THERMODYNAMICS 121 



must more or less arbitrarily select one which we 
define as the true temperature. It would seem that 
the small scale temperature is the better one to 
choose, because there is a certain degree of arbitrari- 
ness in specifying the scale from which the motion 
shall be judged completely turbulent. But on the 
other hand, there are difficulties in the small scale 
definition, because the turbulence may become more 
and more fine grained, until we end with the motion 
of the molecules themselves, when the operations cer- 
tainly fail which give meaning to the temperature 
concept. In this case of molecular turbulence, 
we are driven back to the large scale definition, 
which obviously corresponds to ordinary physical 
practice. 

It appears then that the temperature concept is 
not a clean cut thing, which can be made to apply to 
all experience, but that it is more or less arbitrary, 
involving the scale of our measuring instruments. 
In any special case, the meaning of the temperature 
concept must be set by special convention. In prac- 
tice this does not often make difficulty, because in the 
majority of cases there is no large scale motion with 
respect to the thermometers. 

Consider now the other aspect of the equilibrium 
problem suggested by the thermometers with black- 
ened and silvered bulbs in the sunshine. Our common 
experience tells us how to deal with this situation 
effectively enough for ordinary purposes. We recog- 
nize that the possibility of temperature equilibrium 
is disturbed by the radiation, and we protect the bulbs 



122 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 

of the thermometers from the sun's radiation by 
appropriate shields. But this only minimizes the 
difficulty. For the shield is warmed by the sun, and 
in turn warms to a less degree by its radiation the 
bulb of the thermometer within. We must recog- 
nize that every body, no matter what its tempera- 
ture, is always emitting radiation, so that the bulb 
of our thermometer is always in a radiation field. At 
first this puts us in a serious quandary as to the whole 
question of equilibrium and the meaning of tempera- 
ture. The situation is saved by the experimental 
observation that there is a particular radiation field 
which affects all thermometers equally, namely, the 
field inside an infinite body all at the same tempera- 
ture. Logically this looks like the vicious circle 
again, for we have not yet defined what we mean by 
the same temperature. But actually we avoid the cir- 
cle here, as in so many other physical cases, by a pro- 
cess of asymptotic approximation. The procedure is 
perhaps something like this : we find that if we experi- 
ment with larger and larger bodies, isolated and at 
great distances from other bodies at approximately 
the same temperature as judged by crude physiologi- 
cal sensations, two thermometers, identical except 
that the bulb of one is blackened and that of the other 
is silvered, record more nearly the same temperature 
as time goes on and as the thermometers are sunk to 
greater depths in the body. In actual practice, of 
course, the radiational opacity of most bodies is so 
high that these precautions against the effects of 
external radiation can usually be entirely ignored. 



THE CONCEPTS OF THERMODYNAMICS 123 



At high temperatures, on the other hand, radiation 
has to be explicitly dealt with. 

The conclusion for us from these considerations is 
that operationally the concept of temperature is tied 
up with that of radiation — the equilibrium concept 
of temperature is strictly never exactly applicable; it 
is only a limiting sort of concept applicable when the 
radiation field is of a special sort, namely, that of a 
black body. 

In spite of the explicit recognition which we have 
to give radiation in defining temperature, we usually 
entirely lose sight of it in thinking about the 
mechanism of ordinary physical processes, as for 
instance when we picture the temperature of a gas 
as determined by the kinetic energy of its molecules. 
Now I have no doubt that negligence of this sort can 
be justified, but the necessary logical analysis is 
apparently complicated, and involves a great many 
different sorts of experiment by methods of asympto- 
tic approximation, by which we establish the existence 
of various sorts of physical constants, such as con- 
stants of emission and absorption and reflection and 
scattering and fluorescence and thermal conductivity. 
We do not need to make the analysis here, but I 
believe that some time it would be worth while to 
attempt it. Such an analysis will justify the prin- 
ciple so often used: that if a body is in thermal equi- 
librium the various processes involved, such as radia- 
tion or thermal conductivity, must when taken 
separately also be in equilibrium. Doubtless, if our 
experience had been confined to higher temperatures, 



124 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



like that of the sun, this notion of different mechan- 
isms acting independently would have been more 
difficult to acquire. 

We next consider another fundamental concept of 
thermodynamics, that of quantity of heat. We are 
at first perhaps inclined to think of this as a com- 
paratively straightforv^ard concept, given immedi- 
ately in terms of experience, but an analysis of the 
operations by which we measure quantity of heat 
will show that the situation is really most compli- 
cated. Consider, for example, Joule's experiment in 
which the mechanical equivalent of heat was meas- 
ured by determining the rise of temperature of the 
water in a container when stirred by paddles driven 
by a falling weight. We do not question that the 
rise of temperature of the water has its origin in the 
mechanical work done on it by the paddles. But 
what about the rise of temperature of the container? 
We shall doubtless say that part of this rise comes 
from heat communicated to it by the warmer water 
in contact with it, and part from mechanical work 
done on it by turbulent impact of the water. But by 
what operations shall we measure what part of the 
energy communicated to the container is heat and 
what part mechanical work? We try to give an 
idealized answer to this question in terms of Maxwell 
demons stationed at all parts of the boundary of the 
containing vessel with small scale measuring instru- 
ments. To measure the heat entering at any point 
I can see nothing else for the Lilliputian observers 
to do but to determine the temperature gradient at 



THE CONCEPTS OF THERMODYNAMICS 125 



every point of the boundary from temperature obser- 
vations at two different levels, and calculate the heat 
inflow from the gradient and the thermal conductiv- 
ity of the material of the walls — there seems no way 
of measuring a flow of heat as such. The inflow of 
mechanical energy must be calculated from a detailed 
knowledge of the elastic waves and other large scale 
deformations of the walls. Here again there is an 
arbitrary element in our procedure ; if our mechanical 
measuring instruments are on too gross a scale, we 
may miss mechanical energy which we would catch 
with finer instruments. 

This situation which we have just submitted to 
detailed analysis is, I believe, typical of the general 
situation; it is not possible in the general case to find 
anything which we can call heat as such. Without 
further explicit examination, we can unambiguously 
speak of a body losing or gaining heat only when 
there has been no energy interchange of any other sort 
with other bodies. In such a case the heat is meas- 
ured in terms of the temperature change of the body. 
The heat concept is in the general case a sort of 
wastebasket concept, defined negatively in terms of 
the energy left over when all other forms of energy 
have been allowed for. 

The essential fact that a quantity of heat can by 
itself be defined only in terms of a drop of tempera- 
ture is somewhat obscured by the usual method of 
thermodynamic analysis. In describing a Carnot 
engine, for example, it is specified that the engine 
shall work between a source and a sink so large that 



126 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



their temperature is not changed by the heat given 
out or absorbed by them, so that the impression is 
natural that heat may in some way be measured apart 
from temperature changes. This of course is not the 
case; we merely require that the source and sink be 
so large that their temperature changes are of a 
different order of magnitude from those in the work- 
ing substance itself, so that with respect to the work- 
ing substance, source and sink may be considered to 
be at constant temperature. 

Assuming now that we are able to measure quantity 
of heat in those cases in which the concept has mean- 
ing, let us examine the first law of thermodynamics, 
which we write in the form: 

dQ+dW=dE 

Here dQ is the heat imparted to a given body by 
other bodies, dW is the work of all kinds done on it 
from outside, and dE is the increase of internal 
energy. Now if this equation says what appears at a 
naive first glance, it should say that we find experi- 
mentally that the relation written always holds 
between the measured quantities dQ, dW, and dE, 
We have seen that in the general case it is not pos- 
sible to assign a unique operational significance to 
dQ and dW , and presumably not to their sum. We 
ignore for the present difficulties of this kind and 
confine attention on dE; how shall we measure it? 
I believe it does not take much examination to con- 
vince us that there are no physical operations for 
measuring dE as such, and that therefore the equa- 



THE CONCEPTS OF THERMODYNAMICS 127 



tion expressing the first law must have a different 
significance from that which appears on the surface. 
This is often recognized in the statement that the 
essence of the first law is that dE is an exact differen- 
tial determined only by the variables which fix the 
internal condition of the body, and not a function of 
the path by which the body is carried from one con- 
dition to another. But what shall we mean by inter- 
nal condition, and how shall we be sure that we have 
found all the variables required to specify it com- 
pletely? Internal condition may be a most compli- 
cated thing and require many variables, as shown by 
a piece of iron with a complicated magnetic history 
or by a piece of aluminum about to undergo recrys- 
tallization after overstrain. Here again I believe 
there is no physical procedure by which general 
meaning can be given to this concept of internal con- 
dition. In specific cases we can state what the vari- 
ables are which determine internal condition, and the 
criterion that we have found the correct internal 
variables is that dE shall be a complete differential 
in terms of them. The first law of thermodynamics 
properly understood is not at all a statement that 
energy is conserved, for the energy concept without 
conservation is meaningless. The essence of the first 
law is contained in the statement that the energy 
concept exists (or has meaning in terms of opera- 
tions). 

The first law is often thought to be one of the 
most general of physics, but in a paradoxical sense 
it is the most special of all laws, because no general 



128 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



meaning can be given to the energy concept, but only 
specific meaning in special cases. The first law owes 
its complete generality to the fact that no specific case 
has yet been found of so broad a character that 
it cannot be included under one or another special 
case. 

Examination will at once justify this view. Thus 
we find a great many systems which are adequately 
described in terms of two variables, pressure and 
temperature, in that a function of p and t can be 
found such that its differential equals dQ+dW. 
There are other systems in which the six components 
of stress and / completely fix the internal condition 
in the sense that they determine a dE, In other 
systems the specification of a magnetic field may be 
necessary, or an electric, or a gravitational field. No 
case is known which cannot be handled in terms of 
the action of external forces of the proper kind, but 
there is no general procedure, and the first law owes 
its generality to the exhaustive cataloging of special 
cases. 

We may now return to the question left in abey- 
ance above of the ambiguity in dQ-\-dW. In all the 
cases in which the specific variables can be found 
which define dE, dQ and dW also have meaning. 
Consider, for example, a gas, the internal condition of 
which may be characterized in terms of t and p. The 
mere fact that the internal condition can be specified 
in terms of two variables, one a mechanical variable, 
shows that the substance is mechanically homo- 
geneous. Being mechanically homogeneous, we do 



THE CONCEPTS OF THERMODYNAMICS 129 



not have the possibility of ambiguous values of dW 
varying with the scale of the measuring instruments, 
and in fact we know that dW = p dv. Similarly the 
gas being homogeneous and at rest as a whole allows 
unique values for dQ. Of course this cannot obscure 
the physical fact that even in such a gas, when we go 
to a small enough scale, we find inhomogeneities 
arising from the Brownian movement, etc. Prac- 
tically our statement means that the inhomogeneities 
are so fine grained that over a very wide range of 
scale of the measuring instruments we find the same 
definite results. The same sort of considerations 
apply to more complicated systems. If dE is a com- 
plete differential in terms of t and six stress com- 
ponents, this means again that the body is homo- 
geneous, its condition is determined by temperature 
and stress, which are the same throughout the body, 
and again there is no possible ambiguity from the 
scale of the instruments which measure dW and dQ. 
It seems in general, then, that if the body allows 
operations by which dE acquires meaning, at the 
same time dQ and dW are provided for. In working 
out this idea in full detail, some care must be 
given to the question of order of differentials. 
dQ, for unit time and unit volume, is strictly 
equal to kv't, where k is thermal conductivity, so 
that in determining dQ the second derivatives of 
temperature are involved. 

If the body is obviously not homogeneous, it is 
still a matter of experience that it can be divided into 
small pieces, each of which are by themselves sufR- 



I30 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 

cicntly homogeneous, and the first law in its usual 
form may be applied to each of the pieces. 

Finally, we emphasize a fact already implicitly 
mentioned, namely, that no physical significance can 
be directly given to flow of heat, and there are no 
operations for measuring it. All we can measure 
are temperature distributions and rates of rise of tem- 
perature. As at present defined, a heat current is a 
pure invention, without physical reality, for any 
determined heat flow may always be modified by the 
addition of a solenoidal vector, with change in no 
measurable quantity. If someone states that 
throughout all space there is a uniform heat current 
of 10" cal./cm." sec. in the direction of Polaris, no dis- 
proof can be given, for such a stream is solenoidal, 
and as much heat flows out of every closed surface 
in unit time as flows in. Such a solenoidal flow is 
meaningless in terms of operations; we could give 
meaning to such a flow only in terms of some slight 
modification of the solenoidal condition introduced 
by the measuring instrument. In all ordinary con- 
ditions the flow of heat given by the simple relation 
q=k Grad t corresponds exactly to what our atomic 
pictures lead to expect in those cases where the details 
of the picture can be worked out. But there may be 
cases where it is advantageous to supplement the 
ordinary heat flow {= k Grad t) by the pure fiction 
of a solenoidal flow, because in this way it may be 
possible to account for new phenomena which appear 
when the solenoidal conditions are slightly departed 
from. Thus if in a conductor at uniform temperature 



THE CONCEPTS OF THERMODYNAMICS 131 



carrying a steady electric current we say that a heat 
current is also flowing proportional to the electric 
current and therefore solenoidal, we may provide the 
possibility for a simple correlation of phenomena 
found under those more complicated conditions when 
an electric current flows in a conductor of non-uni- 
form temperature in a magnetic field. If it should 
turn out that the heat current is uniquely determined 
by considerations of this character, then we have 
taken the first step away from the pure formalism 
which this sort of thing otherwise is in the direction 
of giving physical reality to the invention of "heat 
current.'' 

There are other interesting questions of a funda- 
mental thermodynamic character, such for example, 
as whether the entropy concept has any general sig- 
nificance apart from the scale of our measuring 
instruments, and what is the operational significance 
of applying thermodynamic concepts to radiation, 
but we shall not consider these questions here. 

Electrical Concepts 

We now set ourselves the problem of finding the 
meaning of the various concepts in terms of which 
we describe the behavior of electrical systems, assum- 
ing that we understand what we mean by "electrical." 
We start with the simplest electrical systems, namely, 
those in which we deal with static phenomena on a 
large scale. In such systems there are independent 
physical operations by which we may find the mag- 
nitude of any charge, provided that it is effectively 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



concentrated in a geometrical point. The measure- 
ments involved in these operations are measurements 
of ordinary mechanical forces; we assume that our 
knowledge of mechanics has already taught us how 
to make such measurements. An electrically charged 
body experiences forces, which may be measured by 
tying a string to it and pulling on the string with a 
spring balance hard enough to keep the body in 
equilibrium. Three charges are numerically equal 
if when each is placed at unit distance from another, 
in the absence of the third (or other charge), the 
forces are always the same. If furthermore the forces 
are of unit magnitude, the charges are defined as unit 
charge. Having obtained unit charge, we define the 
magnitude of any other charge as equal to the force 
which it experiences when placed at unit distance 
from unit charge. This of course is all very trite; 
the important thing for us is merely that magnitude 
of charge, or quantity of electricity, is an independent 
physical concept, and that unique operations exist for 
determining it. These operations presuppose the 
ability to perform certain operations of mechanics. 
Having now learned how to measure electrical quan- 
tities, we discover experimentally the inverse square 
law of force, and later arrive at the concept of the 
electric field. As we have seen, the field is an inven- 
tion ; here we shall use this concept only for the pur- 
pose for which the invention was made, and shall not 
involve ourselves in any of the implications of ascrib- 
ing physical reality to the field. Notice that as long 
as we deal only with point charges we do not have to 



ELECTRICAL CONCEPTS 



133 



define field strength in terms of the limiting pro- 
cedure of making the exploring charge smaller, for 
the limiting small charge is necessary only to avoid 
the reaction of the exploring charge on the positions 
of the charges which generate the field. All this 
again is trite; the important point is that the opera- 
tions by which the inverse square law and the con- 
cept of the field are established presuppose that the 
charge is given as an independent concept, since the 
operations involve a knowledge of charges. The 
operations also involve the measurement of forces by 
the ordinary static procedure of mechanics with 
spring balances. With the means now at our com- 
mand we establish one very important property of 
electric charges, namely that the total amount of 
charge on an isolated body of finite size is conserved, 
no matter how the charge is forced to rearrange itself 
by the motion of charges on adjacent bodies. 

By procedures exactly like those outlined above, 
we may treat all the corresponding magnetic quanti- 
ties; there is formal parallelism between the two sets 
of phenomena, but there is the physical difference 
that we have to realize a single magnetic pole by the 
device of using a very long slender magnet. 

We now give our electrical system more freedom, 
in that we allow the charges to be in motion with 
respect to each other. Perhaps the most immediate 
question which we now have to ask is whether charge 
continues to be conserved when set in motion, or 
whether the total charge on an isolated body is a 
function of its velocity? To answer this question we 



134 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



must generalize the procedure by which we assigned 
a numerical value to a stationary charge. Perhaps 
the simplest way is to allow two unit charges each to 
move with constant velocity, remaining at unit dis- 
tance apart, and measure with a spring balance the 
force required to keep them at constant distance 
apart. Now we immediately find that the force is 
altered under these conditions, so that our first 
impulse is to say that the charge is a function of the 
velocity. But as we experiment further, we find that 
the state of affairs is very complicated; the force 
between the two charges at any moment of their 
motion depends not only on the charges, their dis- 
tance apart, and their velocities, but also on the angle 
between the line joining them and the direction of 
motion in the lines. Further experiment of other 
kinds yields other information; it requires a force to 
maintain a charge in uniform motion in a magnetic 
field, or to maintain a magnetic pole in motion in an 
electric field. A moving electric charge exerts a 
force on a stationary magnetic pole, so that by defini- 
tion the moving charge is surrounded by a magnetic 
field, and similarly a moving magnetic pole is sur- 
rounded by an electric field. Returning to our two 
moving electric charges, we are impelled to ask 
whether, if all these complications are possible, the 
numerical constant (unity for static charges) in the 
inverse square law of force is a function of velocity 
as well as the magnitude of the charges themselves? 
Tf we broaden the question in this way, as we appar- 
ently must, our problem becomes indeterminate, for 



ELECTRICAL CONCEPTS 



135 



we are trying to answer two different questions with a 
single kind of measurement, namely of the force 
between moving charges. I have had no better luck 
on trying other methods of measurement. Appar- 
ently the operations do not exist by which unique 
meaning can be given to the question of whether the 
magnitude of a charge is a function of its velocity. 
On realizing this situation, we are at first embarrassed 
to know how to proceed, but we reflect that the 
embarrassment is not of our own making, but corre- 
sponds to a physical fact. The concept of charge as 
a unique and independent thing essentially pertains 
only to static systems. We may extend the concept 
to moving systems if we wish, as a matter of conveni- 
ence to ourselves, but must recognize that such an 
extension is an invention of ours and not a reality of 
nature. Now we do make such an extension, and we 
make it in the simplest possible way, that is, we define 
the charge on an isolated body in motion as that 
which we should find on it if we reduced it to rest 
and made measurements according to the regular 
static procedure. That this is a convenient thing to 
do depends on the experimental result that the 
charge so found is independent of the way in which 
velocity is imparted to or removed from the body; 
in other words, whenever the body is reduced to rest, 
the same charge is always found on it. 

Although this is pure definition on our part, it 
turns out to have a most simple and convenient con- 
nection with experimental facts which were discov- 
ered after the decision to treat a moving charge in 



I j6 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 

this way was made; the discovery is of the atomic 
structure of electricity. If then we agree to call each 
elementary charge a constant independent of the 
velocity, the total charge on a body becomes merely 
proportional to the count of the total number of 
atomic charges on the body, which is certainly highly 
convenient and suggestive. 

Having now fixed what we mean by the magnitude 
of a moving charge, we are ready to turn to the gen- 
eral problem of the behavior of any system of charged 
bodies in motion. For the present we consider only 
phenomena of the scale of everyday experience. The 
most general problem that has meaning here is to 
determine all measurable properties of the system in 
terms of those data which experiment shows can be 
arbitrarily specified. Now we have already empha- 
sized that the electromagnetic field itself is an inven- 
tion, and is never subject to direct observation. What 
we observe are material bodies, with or without 
charges (including eventually in this category 
electrons), their positions, motions, and the forces to 
which they are subject. The forces are to be meas- 
ured according to definition in mechanical terms, 
either by the strains in members of a framework if 
the system is in equilibrium, or in terms of accelera- 
tions and masses if it is not in equilibrium. The 
electromagnetic field as such is not the final object 
of our calculations, but the calculation of it is only 
an intermediate auxiliary step, convenient to make 
because our mathematical formulation gives so simple 
a connection between electromagnetic field, charges^ 



ELECTRICAL CONCEPTS 



137 



and mechanical action that the latter can be cal- 
culated at once in terms of the former. In fact the 
connection is so simple that in many cases we have 
come to regard our problem as solved if we can com- 
pute the electromagnetic field, overlooking the fact 
that the field has no immediate meaning in terms of 
experience. 

Electromagnetic theory now presents us with a 
solution of the general problem ; this solution is con- 
tained in the four-field equations of Maxwell, the 
constitutive equations, and those additional equations 
(quite often lost sight of) which give the forces . 
exerted by the field on electric charges, or currents, or 
dielectrics. Let us inquire how we may set about 
testing the physical correctness of these equations. 
We may begin with one of the simplest possible tests, 
and inquire whether the equations are correct in 
stating that the force acting on a charge moving in an 
electric field is simply the product of the charge and 
the field strength. This, on the face of it, is a sur- 
prising statement. The field itself is affected by the 
motion of the charges which generate it, and it is 
natural to expect a converse effect. If, furthermore, 
we have sympathy with the medium point of view, 
it is easy to think that whatever it is in the medium 
that gets hold of a charge and exerts a force on it 
will find it harder to take hold when the charge is 
in motion. 

In attempting to check our statement experiment- 
ally, the only additional complication, as compared 
with the static case which we have already checked, 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



is afforded by the motion of the charge, for we have 
defined the magnitude of a charge in motion, so 
there is no difficulty here, and we may furthermore 
suppose that the field is generated by stationary 
charges, so that we need not trouble to inquire 
whether the procedure by which the field was orig- 
inally defined is here applicable. The task of check- 
ing the equation then reduces to the simple physical 
task of measuring the force on the moving charge. 
How shall we do this? If the velocity is low, we 
may tie a string to the charge and measure the force 
with a spring balance (or its equivalent). But now 
an examination of the equations shows that in more 
complicated phenomena perceptible deviations from 
the static behavior are to be expected only at much 
higher velocities than can be attained by towing 
charges with a string and a spring balance, so that 
it is evidently necessary to check the simple equation 
for the force on a moving charge also at high velocity. 
Since at high velocity the spring balance method for 
measuring forces fails, we are driven to the only pro- 
cedure that we have, namely a measurement in terms 
of the resultant acceleration, calculating the force by 
Newton's first law of mechanics. But this involves a 
knowledge of the mass of the moving body, which we 
recognize in general may be a function of the 
velocity. Now we have already seen, in discussing 
the concepts of mechanics, that the operations by 
which mechanical mass is defined cannot be carried 
out at high velocities, so that either the concept of 
mechanical mass becomes meaningless at high 



ELECTRICAL CONCEPTS i39 

velocities, or we must adopt another definition. In 
attempting to give this new definition of mass at high 
velocities, we are driven to a result of special rela- 
tivity theory, namely that all mass, mechanical or 
electrical, must be the same function of velocity. If 
now electrical mass can be found in terms of velocity, 
our immediate problem is solved and we shall be in 
a position to complete the experimental check of the 
equation. But as a matter of fact, in order to deter- 
mine electrical mass, we have to use that equation 
which we are now engaged in trying to establish. 
Logically we have again the vicious circle, the phys- 
ical significance of which is that independent opera- 
tions do not exist for giving unique meaning to the 
concept of force on a charge at high velocity. 

We seemed so close to our goal a minute ago ; that 
we may allow ourselves to jump the logical chasm, 
and assume that the equation is correct. Electrical 
mass now becomes a definite function of velocity, 
mechanical mass the same function, and we are in a 
position to compare the actual acceleration received 
by a charge in a field with that calculated by the 
equation. Our conviction, on the basis of all experi- 
ence up to the present, is that the two accelerations 
will be found to agree. 

The equation then does somehow make correct con- 
nection with experience in that a consequence of the 
equation can be verified experimentally, in spite of 
the fact that as the equation stands it is meaningless, 
because the operations do not exist by which meaning 
can be given to the individual terms. At low veloci- 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



tics the equation really says what it seems to say, 
because the individual terms have meaning in terms 
of operations; and, what is more, what the equation 
says agrees with experiment. At high velocities the 
equation does not mean at all what appears on the 
surface; by itself it has no meaning; it has meaning 
only when considered as a member of a system of 
equations, and only in so far as the system of equations 
makes by implication statements about nature that 
have meaning in terms of operations that can be car- 
ried out physically. The individual terms of the 
equation of the system do not have meaning at high 
velocities, and in fact there are more terms than there 
are independent physical operations. 

An exact analysis from the operational point of 
view of the significance of the equations at high 
velocities has perhaps never been made, and is not 
necessary for our immediate purpose. The discussion ' 
has brought out, however, that the number of phys- 
ically independent concepts has been cut down by 
two at least, in that we have made purely formal defi- 
nitions of the meaning of quantity of electricity, and 
of the force exerted by a field on a charge at high 
velocity. There is no reason to think that there is 
anything unique about this analysis, or that formal 
definitions might not have been given to other con- 
cepts than charge and force. We can only state that 
as far as physical content goes the equations have at 
least two degrees of freedom. It should then be pos- 
sible to find quite different sorts of equations which 
agree equally well with experience. In particular, 



ELECTRICAL CONCEPTS 



141 



since we have seen that the force on a moving charge 
has no meaning in terms of independent operations, 
it should be possible by arbitrary definition to make 
this force any function of velocity that we please (of 
course reducing to the proper value at low velocities) , 
and then to determine the other equations so that the 
entire group of equations is consistent with experi- 
ment. So far as I know, no one has tried to give 
such a modified set of equations, and indeed there is 
no particular reason why anyone should bother to do 
this, because the present equations are simple enough, 
and the modified equations, although perhaps differ- 
ing greatly in appearance from the present ones, 
would have no advantage in any greater or different 
physical content. 

But there is no reason to think that the present 
state of affairs will always continue. We have seen 
that the decrease in the number of concepts corre- 
sponds to our inability to measure as many sorts of 
physical things at high velocities as at low. Now it 
is the task of the future experimenter so to refine the 
possibilities of measurement at high velocities as to 
restore these two degrees of freedom. In particular, 
mass should be made measurable in mechanical terms 
at high velocities. When this restoration has been 
made, and all the quantities in our equations receive 
independent physical meaning, the significance of the 
equations in terms of operations will be quite altered, 
although the formal appearance will be unchanged. 
We must then be prepared to find, as always when 
we change the range of phenomena, that the equa- 



142 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



tions in their present form do not correspond to the 
facts at all, and that one of the alternative forms 
allowed by our present two degrees of freedom is the 
correct form. But until the new experimental facts 
have been obtained, it seems hardly worth while to 
attempt to specify the doubly infinite variety of forms 
which the equations might have consistently with 
present experiment/ 

So far we have discussed the extension of ordinary 
electric phenomena in only one direction, to high 
velocities. There is another extension which is much 
more important physically, namely to very small 
scales of magnitude. This extension is necessary to 
an understanding of the properties of matter in bulk, 
the electrical nature of the atom having been once 
established. Our problem is to show how the statistical 
average of the behavior of a large number of electrons 
gives the large scale effects which are within the 
reach of observation, and which are described by the 
equations we have just discussed. To get this statis- 
tical average we must be able to calculate at least 
certain features of the behavior of the individual 
electrons, which means that we must know the form 
of the equations down to dimensions of the order of 
those of an electron, or smaller. Now if one contrasts 
the scale of the supposed dimensions of the electron 
with the smallest dimensions on which we can make 

* Since this was written, a paper has appeared by V. Bush, Jour, 
of Math, and Phys., vol. V., No. 3, 1926, in which it is shown 
that there are advantages in supposing the charge of an electron to 
change when it is set in motion. 



ELECTRICAL CONCEPTS 



143 



independent experimental verification of those equa- 
tions, he must admit that there is an enormous chance 
for change in the type of equation beyond the limit 
that we can reach by direct experiment, and the 
chances of guessing the correct extension of the equa- 
tion to small dimensions are correspondingly almost 
vanishingly small. (We may perhaps say that experi- 
ments on the Brownian motion on a scale a good 
many atoms in diameter bring us the closest possible 
directly, which means that we are 10" or 10' fold 
away from electronic dimensions.) In spite, how- 
ever, of the apparently enormous chances against it, 
this program of extending the field equations to small 
dimensions and following out the consequences was 
exactly the program which Lorentz set himself.* 
That Lorentz saw that such a program might be car- 
ried through must be recognized as a vision of ex- 
traordinary genius, and that he was willing to devote 
to it the years of arduous and detailed calculation that 
he did is evidence of a pertinacity of purpose of the 
highest moral order. 

We now have to examine critically this program 
and to inquire what is the significance of the measure 
of success that Lorentz attained. The precise exten- 
sion of the equations that he made was very simple, 
for the large scale equations of Maxwell were taken 
over with as little change as possible. The equations 
are so familiar that it is not necessary for us to write 
them in detail; they express relations between the 

' See for example, H. A. Lorentz, The Theory of Electrons, B. 
G. Teubner, 1916. 



144 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



electric and magnetic force vectors (force and induc- 
tion now becoming the same thing, the difference 
between them in ponderable bodies being one of the 
things that is to be explained in terms of the elec- 
trons), the space density of electric charge, its veloc- 
ity, and the force acting on elementary charge. We 
have to notice that although formally the equations 
have changed little in appearance, nevertheless the 
physical content, as judged by the operations, has 
changed a great deal. Consider, for instance, the 
meaning of charge density. In the Maxwell equa- 
tions, p was merely the number of discrete elementary 
charges per unit volume, the distances between these 
charges being supposed so small compared with the 
scale of the phenomena involved that their average 
effect could be fairly represented in terms of their 
numbers. In the Lorentz equations, on the other 
hand, p has a value different from 0 only inside the 
electron; everywhere else p==0. Now an examina- 
tion of the previous discussion, in which we ques- 
tioned whether the magnitude of the charge might be 
a function of its velocity, will show that there are no 
physical operations whatever by which meaning can 
be given to p at individual points inside an electron. 
There is a single condition on this p, namely, that its 
integral throughout the total volume assigned to the 
electron shall equal the total static charge of the 
electron. Obviously a single scalar condition is a 
pretty blunt tool with which to attempt to determine 
a point function throughout a volume. Again, the 



ELECTRICAL CONCEPTS 



145 



equations talk about the velocity of the charge at 
interior points of the electron ; what possible physical 
operations are there by which meaning can be / 
assigned to the velocity of an am-orphous structureless ^/ 
substance in regions inaccessible to experiment? Here 
again, the concept as a detailed description of the 
behavior at a point has become meaningless, and 
again there is a single integral condition, namely, that 
the V associated with every p must be such that when 
integrated over the volume of the electron it will give 
a total transport of charge equal to that carried by 
the electron in its motion. This again is a single con- 
dition on a function distributed through space. Still 
again, the equations contain the electric and magnetic 
vectors at points inside the electron. What is the pos- 
sible meaning of these field vectors in terms of opera- 
tions? Our procedure for finding the field at a point 
involves by definition finding the force on an electric 
charge placed at that point. But there is no charge 
smaller than an electron, and the procedure degen- 
erates into a fiction. Again there is a single integral 
condition on the field vectors; the integral of the 
force on the assumed charge density when taken over 
the total volume of the electron must give a value cor- 
responding to experiment. Except for this single 
condition, the concept of the field at points inside the 
electron is an invention without physical reality. Not 
only is the field concept meaningless at points inside 
the electron, but it is meaningless at points outside 
within a certain distance, because the exploring 



146 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



charge can never be made smaller than the electron 
itself, and so can never come closer than a certain dis- 
tance. 

, The actual state of affairs is much w^orse than has 
already appeared. It was shown in the discussion of 
space and time that no independent physical meaning 
can be attached to lengths and times as small as have 
to be assumed in describing the behavior of the indi- 
vidual electrons. The operations Div, Curl, d/dt 
which enter the field equations are, therefore, phys- 
ically meaningless as they stand; they have only a 
mathematical meaning which begins to acquire 
physcial complexion in a most complicated way when 

j the equations are integrated over large enough 

V volumes. 

It is evident, therefore, that the concepts which 
enter the field equations have entirely lost their large 
scale significance; they have become blurred, fused 
together, and fewer in number. A precise analysis of 
this situation has probably never been attempted and 
would obviously be difficult: it would be interesting 
to know at least how many really independent con- 
cepts there are at this order of phenomena. An 
attempt at an analysis would probably be worth while 
from a physical point of view in suggesting possible 
experiments by which the number of physically inde- 
pendent concepts could be extended. 

Since the quantities in the field equations are mean- 
ingless in the naked form in which they enter the 
equations, it is meaningless to inquire whether the 
equations as they stand are true or not. In our pres- 



ELECTRICAL CONCEPTS 



147 



ent state of experimental knowledge it is also mean- 
ingless to ask whether, for example, the inverse 
square law between electric charges continues to hold, 
or whether an accelerated charge radiates. These 
questions have meaning only when applied to phe- 
nomena on a scale large enough to correspond to pos- 
sible experiment. 

There is a rather interesting obverse to the state- 
ment that it is meaningless to ask whether the field 
equations are true, namely, that it may not be mean- 
ingless to state that they are false. A statement is not 
true unless it is true in every particular, but it is false 
if it is false in a single particular. If we can show 
that a single consequence of the field equations of 
Lorentz, when integrated or averaged in such a way 
as to correspond to experimental possibilities, is false, 
then the equations must be false. It seems that, 
regarded as a complete description of physical 
behavior on a small scale, the equations must be 
judged false, because they contain no suggestion of 
quantum phenomena. 

Even if we have to recognize that the equations are 
false, there can be no question that they correspond to 
an important part of reality, and that they have been 
of the greatest service to physics. What is the sig- 
nificance of the success that they have attained? It is 
to be noticed that all the phenomena to which the 
Lorentz equations have been successfully applied, 
although not large scale phenomena in the ordinary 
sense of the word, are nevertheless phenomena involv- 
ing the cooperation of a number of atoms, and that 



148 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



the equations unquestionably fail when applied to 
phenomena involving single electrons. It appears 
from our best present evidence that on a small scale 
the behavior of nature is governed by quantum prin- 
ciples and is therefore quite different from large scale 
behavior, which we have seen is governed by the 
Maxwell equations. There must of course be a transi- 
tion zone in which the character of phenomena 
changes from quantum to Maxwell. Now any pro- 
gram like that of Lorentz is almost inevitably bound 
to begin to give correct results when we get up as far 
as the transition zone, for the simple reason that the 
relations of Maxwell have been put into the equations 
and are always there ready to appear as soon as the 
quantum relations begin to give way. The physical 
significance of the success of the Lorentz program 
seems to be that the transition from Maxwell to quan- 
tum takes place at a stage pretty far down toward 
the individual atoms. To find the precise details of 
the transition from Maxwell to quantum phenomena 
constitutes a large part of the program of the imme- 
diate future. 

All this skepticism about the classical work of 
Lorentz is likely to be rather irritating or depressing, 
particularly if one attempts to imagine what other 
course could have been adopted. Indeed it does seem 
that we find ourselves in a real quandary; Lorentz 
was practically forced, because of the character of the 
mathematical tools at his command, to take the course 
that he did, in spite of any recognition of the physical 
meaninglessness of the mathematical operations. We 



ELECTRICAL CONCEPTS 



149 



have already seen that conventional mathematics does 
not correspond t6 the physical reality; it cannot easily 
make a qualified statement subject to limitations, and 
it recognizes no difference between the physically big 
and the physically little and the corresponding 
change in the operational meaning of its symbols. It 
begins by being a most useful servant when dealing 
with phenomena of the ordinary scale of magnitude, 
but ends by dragging us by the scruff of the neck willy 
nilly into the inside of the electron where it forces us 
to repeat meaningless gibberish. Larmor recognized 
this, and in his electron theory, developed practically 
contemporaneously with that of Lorentz, endeavored 
to treat electrons as wholes, and not to make meaning- 
less statements about their insides.^ But he was much 
less successful than Lorentz in making his analysis 
give physical results, and one may suspect that it was 
at least in part due to difficulty with his tools. 

What we should like to be able to do is easy to see. 
The things that go into our equations must have inde- 
pendent physical meaning, and the character of our 
mathematical formulation should change to keep pace 
with the change in the physical operations which give 
meaning to the terms. For example, electrical density 
has a meaning for large scale phenomena, but means 
nothing on a small scale. Our ultimate electric unit 
is the electron; when we get down to this scale of 
magnitude, our mathematics ought to be making 

^ Joseph Larmor, JEthtr and Matter, Cambridge University, 
Press, 1900. In this book the electron is treated as a point singu- 
larity in the ether. 



150 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 

Statements about the relative behavior of discrete 
electrons, and not mention so much as by implication 
the density at points inside an electron. But this sort 
of thing we apparently cannot yet do; the proper 
mathematical language has not been developed. Such 
a language, when developed, must not only be able to 
resist the temptation to burrow inside the electron, 
but must also try to get along without the field con- 
cept, which we have seen is liable to so much physical 
abuse, and must reduce effects in complicated elec- 
trical systems to the ultimate elements that have phys- 
ical meaning, namely, a dual action between pairs of 
electrical charges, with no implications about physi- 
cal action where the charges are not. 

The Nature of Light and the Concepts of 
Relativity 

We have already discussed several aspects of the 
theory of relativity in connection with the relation to 
it of some of our fundamental concepts. There are 
still other topics connected with relativity which 
demand attention ; most of these involve the proper- 
ties of light. It will now be convenient to discuss 
together the properties of light and these concepts of 
relativity. We restrict our discussion of light to those 
simple properties which bear on the theory of rela- 
tivity. 

Practically all our thinking about optical phenom- 
ena is done in terms of an invention, by means of 
which these phenomena are assimimlated to those of 
ordinary mechanical experience, and so made easier 



LIGHT AND RELATIVITY 151 

to think about. To realize that invention has been 
active here, we must think ourselves back into that 
naive frame of mind in which experience is given 
directly in terms of sensation. The most elementary 
examination of what light means in terms of direct 
experience shows that we never experience light 
itself, but our experience deals only with things 
lighted. This fundamental fact is never modified by 
the most complicated or refined physical experiments 
that have ever been devised ; from the point of view of 
operations, light means nothing more than things 
lighted. Now experience shows that these things 
lighted may stand to each other in varied relations ; in 
attempting to reduce these relations to order and 
understandability we make a certain invention. This 
is prompted by several cardinal experimental facts: 
in the first place, things lighted have a simple geo- 
metrical relation to each other, in that screens placed 
on straight lines between the lighted objects may sup- 
press the illumination of one or the other and them- 
selves become illuminated. This leads to the concept 
of rectilinear beams of light, which is no more than 
a description of the geometrical relation between 
lighted objects. Then we have the experimental fact 
of the asymmetrical relation of the lighted objects, 
described in terms of sources and sinks. Finally, we 
have the discovery made at a much later stage, and 
not possible until physical measurements had reached 
a high refinement, that light has properties analogous 
to the velocity of material things. This was first dis- 
covered in connection with astronomical phenomena 



152 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



in the shift of the time of eclipse of Jupiter's satellites 
and in aberration, but was later found to hold for 
purely terrestrial phenomena, in that a beam of light 
reflected from a distant mirror does not return to the 
source until after the lapse of a time interval that can 
be measured with means sufficiently refined. This 
property of return after the lapse of time is precisely 
like that of material things, such as a messenger 
despatched for an answer, or a ball or a water wave 
bouncing from a wall. These various properties of 
light lead quite naturally and almost inevitably to the 
invention of light as a thing that travels, "thing" not 
necessarily connoting material thing. 

The question now for us is whether we shall regard 
this as a mere invention, made for convenience in 
thinking, or shall go further and ascribe physical 
reality to it, that is, shall we think of light as capable 
of independent physical existence in the space 
between the matter that constitutes the source and the 
mirror? Now in spite of the resemblances pointed 
out above, there is at least one universal and funda- 
mental difference between a thing that travels and 
light. We have independent physical evidence of the 
continued existence of the ball, for example, at all 
intermediate points of space; we can see it, or hear it, 
or feel the wind in the air as it passes, or even touch it. 
All these phenomena are independent of the initial 
and terminal phenomena, and hence by our criterion 
for the physical reality of an invention, we are justi- 
fied in ascribing physical reality to the ball in transit. 
But with the beam of light it is entirely different; the 



LIGHT AND RELATIVITY 



153 



only way by which we can obtain physical evidence of 
the intermediate existence of the beam is by inter- 
posing some sort of a screen, and this act destroys 
just that part of the beam whose existence we have 
thereby detected. There is no physical phenomenon 
whatever by which light may be detected apart from 
the phenomena of the source and the sink (under- 
standing that a mirror is included in the idea of 
sink) ; that is, no phenomenon exists independent of 
the phenomenon which led us to the invention of a 
thing travelling. Hence from the point of view of 
operations it is meaningless or trivial to ascribe phys- 
ical reality to light in intermediate space, and light 
as a thing travelling must be recognized to be a pure 
invention. 

The status of light is exactly the same as that of an 
electric field; there is not the slightest warrant for 
ascribing physical reality to either at points of empty 
space — light and field-at-a-point have no meaning 
until we go there and make experiments with some 
material thing. Of course the electromagnetic theory 
of light makes this resemblance inevitable, provided 
the theory and our views of the nature of light and 
the field are correct. 

It cannot be denied that there are some phenomena 
which uncritically considered appear to justify think- 
ing of light as a thing that travels; these will now be 
discussed. Probably the argument to which most sig- 
nificance is usually ascribed is derived from the 
phenomena of energy. The passing of light from 
source to sink is accompanied by the transfer of 



134 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



energy. But energy is conserved, so that we have to 
ask where the energy is in the time interval between 
the emission of light from the source and its absorp- 
tion by the sink. There is an obvious answer: the 
energy is in transit, of course, somewhere in the inter- 
mediate space between source and sink. If we think 
of light as propagated through a medium, then the 
medium is such that energy may reside in it, as in the 
electromagnetic theory of light, or if light is more 
material and ballistic in character, the thing that 
travels has itself energy. We notice in the first place 
that the conservation principle involves the time con- 
cept, because what we mean by conservation is that 
the total energy of the universe, at a fixed instant of 
time, is constant. That is, we have to integrate over 
all space the local energy at a definite instant of time, 
and this involves spreading the time concept over all 
space. It is further evident that unless we spread the 
time concept over space in the right way we shall not 
get conservation. The proof that it is possible to 
spread the time concept over space in such a way as to 
give conservation involves a knowledge of the prop- 
erties of light. It would seem, then, that we ought 
not to assume conservation in deducing the properties 
of light, when a knowledge of the properties of light 
is necessary to establish conservation. These consid- 
erations cannot be accepted as final, however, until a 
detailed analysis has been made, and this would be 
most complicated. But there is a more important 
consideration derived from our previous critique of 
the energy concept, namely, that there is no basis for 



LIGHT AND RELATIVITY 155 

asserting that energy is localized in space at all; 
energy is not a physical thing, but rather what we 
would call a property of a system as a whole. If this 
view of energy be granted, the whole energy argu- 
ment for light as a thing travelling, and also for the 
existence of a medium, falls. I believe that similar 
considerations apply to any arguments from the con- 
servation of momentum. 

The possibility of detecting light in apparently 
empty space by a screen constitutes perhaps the most 
immediate reason for considering light as a thing that 
travels. This point of view I believe is characteristic 
of the entire attitude of Einstein in deducing the 
theorems of the special theory of relativity. Ein- 
stein's light signal is for the purposes of the deduction 
thought of as a simple spherical wave spreading from 
the source and capable of being watched as it spreads 
by an observer outside the system, in much the same 
way that a water wave can be watched. Of course 
the light signal cannot actually be watched in transit, 
but we can come fairly close to this ideal by placing 
screens at any point we please to make the wave vis- 
ible. It is true that the mere act of showing the exist- 
ence of the light destroys that part of the beam whose 
existence is detected, but the screen needs only an 
infinitesimal amount of light to make it visible, and 
so by the usual physical argument we may suppose 
that the detecting screen produces only an infinitesi- 
mal modification of the total original light. 

Our satisfaction with this picture evaporates if our 
present quantum views of the nature of light are cor- 



156 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



rect. We can no longer think of the spherical light 
pulse as of irreducible simplicity, but it is an exceed- 
ingly complicated thing, perhaps more complicated 
than a gas from the point of view of kinetic theory, 
and simulates simplicity by some sort of averaging of 
the effects of the elementary quantum processes of 
which it is composed. If the principles of relativity 
are to continue to be regarded as fundamental, or even 
if they are to remain intelligible, we must apply our 
reasoning, not to spherical wavelets, but to the 
elementary process of which these wavelets are com- 
posed. Now the elementary quantum act is essen- 
tially a twofold thing: there is a discrete act of emis- 
sion at some discrete material particle, and the act is 
consummated by another discrete act (absorption or 
scattering) at some other discrete particle. We can- 
not yet fully characterize the details of this twofold 
process, but have to connect the place at which 
absorption takes place with the place of emission by 
statistical considerations. It is evident, however, 
that to think of emission as starting some process like 
a spherical wavelet travelling like a thing through 
space presents an entirely incorrect view, because in 
the wave there is no hint of the discrete place which 
is to terminate it. We may say crudely that there is 
no way by which the wave can know what discrete 
material particle is to complete the emission process. 
We may perhaps try to save the situation by remem- 
bering that a spherical wave is polarized and so has 
a unique direction associated with it; but further 
examination shows that this does not help, because the 



LIGHT AND RELATIVITY 



157 



unique direction is that of no energy flow, and absorp- 
tion can take place in any direction except this. It 
appears then that instead of being a help, the thing- 
travelling point of view is a positive embarrassment 
when we try to picture by means of it the essentially 
twofold nature of the elementary quantum act. 

Another plausible argument for light as a thing 
travelling may be deduced from our principle of con- 
nectivity. Imagine a dark lantern with a shutter that 
can be opened or closed so as to emit a momentary 
flash of light, a distant mirror, and a receiving instru- 
ment near the source. One of the properties of light 
that we always assume is that no permanent trace of 
the act of emission is left behind in the source. The 
most minute examination of all the details of the lan- 
tern and its surroundings at some time after the emis- 
sion of the flash has not yet shown any phenomenon 
that betrays a remembrance of the emission of the 
flash, unless perhaps we measure the total energy or 
momentum and have some way of knowing what the 
energy or momentum would have been if the flash 
had not been emitted, and in any event we cannot 
specify the moment in past time when the signal was 
emitted. In the same way we cannot tell from an 
examination of a mirror whether it has at any time in 
the past reflected a beam of light. Consider now two 
systems, each consisting of a source and a mirror dis- 
tant 3 X 10"* cm., identical in all respects, except that 
in one a light signal was flashed from the source l.S 
seconds ago, and in the other only O.S seconds ago. 
According to our hypothesis, the most complete 



158 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



examination of source and mirror in either system 
fails to show the slightest difference, but nevertheless 
there is something essentially different about the two 
systems, for in one a light signal arrives at the screen 
in 0.5 seconds, and in the other not until 1.5 seconds. 
This violates what we have suggested might be 
regarded as the cardinal and most general principle 
of all physics, the principle of essential connectivity, 
which states that differences between two systems 
must be associated with other differences. A most 
obvious and simple way of maintaining our principle 
is merely to point out that the system really included 
more than we investigated: the system properly con- 
sists of source, mirror, screen, and all intermediate 
space, so that if we had examined intermediate space 
we should have found light there in transit in differ- 
ent positions in the two systems, thus correlating with 
the differences in subsequent history. This argument 
appeals to me as perhaps the strongest that can be 
advanced for the view of light as a thing travelling. 
But it seems in no way conclusive. Our principle of 
essential connectivity made no mention of the time 
concept, but we have somehow smuggled it in in mak- 
ing the application above. We sought to give a com- 
plete description of our system at some one instant 
of time, and this involved spreading the time concept 
over space. This itself is a questionable operation 
and may be done in different ways. But, more impor- 
tant, what is the justification for supposing that the 
system can be completely described by giving a com- 
plete description of all the measurable parts of it at 



LIGHT AND RELATIVITY 



159 



some one epoch? We have seen that in the most gen- 
eral case the principle of essential connectivity must 
recognize that the concept of "initial condition" of a 
system involves all the past history, and we may have 
here a case in point. The answer can be given only 
by experiment. In dealing with ordinary experi- 
ence, when we do not have to distinguish between 
local and extended time, and are not dealing with 
optical phenomena, there can be little question that 
experience at least approximately justifies the expec- 
tation that future behavior is determined in terms of 
the present condition and that present condition may 
be specified in terms of the results of present opera- 
tions performed in the system. But before extending 
this principle to phenomena in which we have to dis- 
tinguish between local and extended time, we have to 
answer just that question which we are now consid- 
ering; namely, whether there are physical phenom- 
ena taking place in apparently empty space, and 
whether therefore empty space has to be included in 
the system. We find ourselves again treading the 
vicious circle. Perhaps experience will show that 
the extension of the principle of connectivity to 
optical phenomena involves something like this: 
namely, the future at any point in a material system 
is determined by a complete description of the pres- 
ent state of the system in the immediate vicinity, and 
by a history of the behavior at more distant points, 
this history extending over longer and longer inter- 
vals of time as the point becomes more remote. 

I believe, however, that these possibilities will not 



i6o THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 

seem very satisfactory, and that most physicists will 
discover in themselves a very strong disposition to 
feel that the future is determined in terms of a com- 
plete description of some sort of instantaneous con- 
figuration, time being extended in some suitable way 
over space. This instinctive demand that the future 
be determined in terms of the present may easily be 
consistent with the optical phenomena in our two 
systems consisting of source, mirror, and screen, with- 
out involving the material existence of light in empty 
space, provided that our assumption that the emis- 
sion of light leaves behind it no permanent record in 
the source was incorrect. It may be that detailed 
examination of a source after emission will disclose 
permanent traces, from which the instant of emission 
may be found by extrapolation. If the conviction of 
determinism of the future is strong, the physicist may 
well be impelled to search here for new phenomena 
indicating such a memory of emission. 

Let us now inquire how our physical structure 
might be affected if we should give up the identifica- 
tion of light with a thing travelling. One conse- 
quence is that light need no longer be thought of as 
having the property of velocity, since velocity, in 
terms of immediate experience, is a property of 
things moving from place to place. Giving up the 
concept of light as a thing travelling would enable 
us, then, to adopt an alternative method of describing 
nature with a different concept of velocity; we have 
seen that it is possible to define velocity in terms of 
operations different from the usual ones, in such a 



LIGHT AND RELATIVITY 



i6i 



way as to give the usual numerical results at small 
velocities, but different results at high velocities, and 
in particular to give an infinite velocity for light/ 

There is now no objection to an infinite number 
associated with light, if we no longer think of light 
as having physical velocity. We may, if we like, con- 
tinue for the sake of convenience to talk of the veloc- 
ity of light, clearly understanding that the infinite 
value which must be ascribed to this velocity corre- 
sponds to the fact that the physical concept of velocity 
does not apply in all respects to light. We should 
now have to revise our process for extending the time 
concept over space, because this was formerly so done 
as to give light a finite velocity. We are now to make 
this velocity infinite, which is obviously to be done 
simply by setting a distant clock on zero at the instant 
it receives a light signal flashed from our clock at its 
zero. The behavior of material things now takes on 
a simple aspect — there is no longer a finite upper 
limit to the velocity that can be given a material 
thing, and light has no longer the paradoxical prop- 
erty of bearing the same finite relation to each of two 
material systems which differ from each other by a 
finite amount (that is, the first postulate of relativity 
that the velocity of light is 3 x IC" in all reference 
systems). Light instead now bears the relation of 

^ No difficulty arises from the asymmetric character of light 
in assigning an infinite velocity to light because those physical 
operations by which we discover which is the source and which the 
sink are entirely distinct from the operations by which a velocity 
is measured ; or in other words, even in the limit, it still has mean- 
ing to say that an infinite velocity has a direction associated with it. 



62 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



infinitude to each of two systems which differ from 
each other by only a finite amount, and this is natural 
from the mathematical point of view. 

However, all is not simplified by this change in 
the method of setting clocks, but a price has to be 
paid. The price is that we have to give up the simple 
connection between the velocity of a thing and its "go 
and come'' time. Our changes have not affected local 
time; the time of passage of light to a distant mirror 
and return to the source is not changed, and is there- 
fore still finite, although we describe the velocity of 
light as infinite. Now examination shows at once 
that there is no immediate connection between the 
concepts of "velocity" and of "go and come" time, 
because the operations involved are different. A 
measurement of a linear velocity according to our 
definition involves two clocks at two different places 
or else a clock travelling with the object, while "go 
and come" time demands only a single clock at a sin- 
gle place, and also involves necessarily a reversal of 
direction of motion in the object under measurement. 
We see then that, according to the definition adopted 
for velocity, we have the choice either of doing as 
Einstein did in the restricted theory of relativity and 
making "go and come" time very simply related to 
velocity; or we may say that refined physical meas- 
urements show that something of significance hap- 
pens when the direction of motion is reversed, and 
that phenomena are not symmetrical with respect to 
a reversal of direction. The asymmetry which 
results from reversing the direction of motion we 



LIGHT AND RELATIVITY 



163 



may visualize as a sort of curvature in space and 
time, as of a small piece of an arc of a circle bent 
back on itself, with the two ends diverging. This 
alternative way of treating velocity would mean that 
velocity can be measured simply only by a specially 
situated observer; this need not be considered dis- 
turbing, because in fact the operations have been 
defined only with respect to such an observer. 

Which of these two possible treatments of velocity 
shall be adopted is to a certain extent a matter of 
convenience, determined by the sort of phenomena 
in which we are most interested and wish most to 
simplify. Einstein's chief concern was with optical 
phenomena, so that the motive for his choice is evi- 
dent. In this choice of Einstein it is not very evident 
that the desire to make "go and come" time simply 
connected with velocity played a very prominent 
part, but it seems rather that the desire to think of 
light as a thing travelling, with a finite velocity, was 
much more influential. This way of thinking of light 
is fundamental to all the treatment of restricted rela- 
tivity; without this sort of picture all the mathemati- 
cal deductions would lose their simplicity and con- 
vincingness, for in all the deductions we inevitably 
think of ourselves as an observer from outside, watch- 
ing a thing that we call light travelling back and forth 
like any physical thing. 

Now there can be no doubt that, when choice is 
possible, convenience and simplicity are important 
considerations; but I believe that there is another 
much more important consideration, namely, the 



ib4 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



most perfect reproduction possible of the physical 
situation. It seems to me that it is very questionable 
whether Einstein, and all the rest of modern physics, 
for that matter, have not paid too high a price for 
simplicity and mathematical tractability in choosing 
to treat light as a thing that travels. Physically it is 
the essence of light that it is not a thing that travels, 
and in choosing to treat it as a thing that does, I do 
not see how we can expect to avoid the most serious 
difficulties. Of course the whole problem of the 
nature of light is now giving the most acute difficulty. 
The thing-travelling point of view, even as treated 
by Einstein, does not land us in a situation which is 
at all satisfying logically. We are familiar with 
only two kinds of thing travelling, a disturbance in a 
medium, and a ballistic thing like a projectile. But 
light is not like a disturbance in a medium, for other- 
wise we should find a different velocity when we 
move with respect to the medium, and no such phe- 
nomenon exists; neither is light like a projectile, 
because the velocity of light with respect to the 
observer is independent of the velocity of the 
source. On the other hand, in aberration we have a 
phenomenon similar to that shown by projectiles. 
The properties of light are more like those of a pro- 
jectile than is perhaps commonly realized, as is 
shown in the papers of La Rosa ^ on the ballistic 
theory of light. The properties of light remain 
incongruous and inconsistent when we try to think of 
them in terms of material things. Einstein's re- 
^ M. La Rosa, Scientia, July-August, 1924. 



LIGHT AND RELATIVITY 165 



stricted relativity has made a great contribution in so 
grouping and coordinating the phenomena that they 
can all be embraced in a simple mathematical 
formula, but he does not seem to have presented them 
in such a light that they are simple or easy to grasp 
physically. The explanatory aspect is completely 
absent from Einstein's work. 

In view of all our present difficulties it would seem 
that we ought at least to try to start over again from 
the beginning and devise concepts for the treatment 
of all optical phenomena which come closer to phys- 
ical reality. No one realizes more vividly than I 
that this is a most difficult thing to do. If we are ever 
successful in carrying through such a modified treat- 
ment, it is evident that not only will the structure of 
most of our physics be altered, but in particular the 
formal approach to those phenomena now treated by 
relativity theory must be changed, and therefore the 
appearance of the entire theory altered. I believe 
that it is a very serious question whether we shall not 
ultimately see such a change, and whether Einstein's 
whole formal structure is not a more or less tempo- 
rary affair. 

Although it is exceedingly difficult to forsee 
what the treatment of the future will be like, it is easy 
to surmise certain of its features. In essence the ele- 
mentary process of all radiation perceived as radia- 
tion is twofold. There is some process at the source 
and some accompanying process at the sink, and 
nothing else, as far as we have any physical evidence; 
furthermore, the elementary act is unsymmetrical, in 



i66 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



that the source and the sink are physically differenti- 
ated from each other. This is the most complete 
expression of the physical facts; there is nowhere any 
physical evidence for the inclusion of a third element 
(the ether). Therefore all the phenomena appre- 
hended by an observer (and this embraces all phys- 
ical phenomena) can be determined only by the 
source and the sink and the relation to each other of 
source and sink, for there is nothing else that has 
physical meaning in terms of operations. This 
formula covers not only the possibility of such first 
order phenomena as aberration and the Ddppler 
effect, but also shows that such second order effects 
as that looked for by Michelson and Morley must 
be non-existent. It will thus be seen that some of the 
consequences of relativity theory are implicitly con- 
tained in certain very broad points of view. One 
interesting question that must be answered before we 
can get very far with a new treatment is whether the 
elementary optical process is of necessity twofold, or 
whether we may have emission without absorption, 
that is, radiation into empty space. Lewis seems to 
imply in recent papers that this is not possible.^ The 
astronomers have already pointed out difficulties in 
explaining phenomena like the temperature equilib- 
rium of the planets if we suppose this is the case. 

Other Relativity Concepts 
We now turn to some of the other concepts of rel- 

^ For example, in the book: G. N. Lewis, The Anatomy of 
Science, Yale University Press, 1926, p. 129. 



RELATIVITY CONCEPTS 



167 



ativity. One of the most important of these is the 
^^event"; in fact this concept is made fundamental by 
Whitehead/ We have already discussed the concept 
of ''event" under the ''identity" concept with v^hich it 
is closely involved. The event is usually thought of 
by Einstein as merely an aggregate of four coordi- 
nates, three of space and one of time. The principle 
of general relativity, namely, that the laws of nature 
shall be of invariant form, when formulated mathe- 
matically, involves the assumption that nature may 
be analyzed into events, and is expressed by the 
requirement that the mathematical relations between 
the coordinates of a chain of events shall be invariant. 
The same idea is also expressed by Einstein in another 
form, namely, that nature may be completely charac- 
terized in terms of space-time coincidences. In elab- 
orating this idea, Einstein assumes that the results of 
all measurement may be given in terms of such 
coincidences. 

Now it appears to me most questionable whether 
the analysis of nature into events is possible or suffi- 
cient. With regard to the coincidence point of view, 
it seems perfectly obvious that the world of our imme- 
diate sensation cannot be described in terms of coin- 
cidences; how, for example, shall we describe in 
terms of space-time coincidence the photometric 
comparison of the intensity of two sources of illumi- 
nation, or the comparison of the pitch of two sounds, 
or the location of a sound by the binaural effect? To 

* A. N. Whitehead, An Enquiry Concerning the Principles of 
Natural Knowledge, Cambridge University Press, 19 19, Chap. V. 



i68 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



justify the coincidence point of view we apparently 
have to analyze down to the colorless elements beyond 
our sense perception. It does not seem unreasonable, 
perhaps, to expect that the universe is completely 
determined in terms of the positions as a function of 
time of all the positive and negative electrons; but to 
introduce such a thesis now certainly goes beyond 
present experimental warrant, and is contrary to the 
general spirit of relativity, which nowhere else 
involves any reference to the small scale structure of 
things. Even if we were willing to overlook all these 
objections, we would still have the fact that the dif- 
ference between a positive and negative electron is 
not contained in any specification of the mere 
coordinates. 

A further very important doubt in principle as to 
the possibility of the analysis of nature into events 
is afforded by the character of the concept of event 
itself. We have seen that the idea of event involves 
the existence of discontinuities, and that this can cor- 
respond only approximately to the physical fact, 
because discontinuities apparently lose their abrupt- 
ness as we make our measurements more refined. The 
thesis that nature can be described in terms of dis- 
continuities of a very small scale seems much too 
special to be made a fundamental part of a theory of 
the general pretensions of that of relativity. In fact 
this, as well as a consideration to be mentioned later, 
suggests that the argument and result of general rela- 
tivity may be intrinsically restricted to large scale 
phenomena. 



RELATIVITY CONCEPTS 



169 



We now pass from these somewhat special questions 
to ask why it is that Einstein was able in the general 
theory of relativity to obtain new and physically cor- 
rect results from general reasoning of an apparently 
purely mathematical character. We are convinced 
that purely mathematical reasoning never can yield 
physical results — that if anything physical comes out 
of mathematics it must have been put in in another 
form. Our problem is to find where the physics got 
into the general theory. 

There are two questions to be disentangled here: 
we have to consider in the first place the significance 
of the fact that Einstein has been able to describe 
relations in nature in mathematical form, and in the 
second place of the fact that he was able to arrive at 
the mathematical formulation of these physical rela- 
tions by reasoning of apparently a purely mathemat- 
ical character, from postulates of merely formal 
mathematical content (invariance of natural laws in 
generalized coordinates). Now the theory of rela- 
tivity does not seem to differ in the first respect from 
any other branch of mathematical physics, such as the 
classical mathematical theory of electricity and mag- 
netism, for instance, and this matter has already been 
touched in an earlier chapter. It is a fact that the 
behavior of nature can in many cases be expressed to 
a high degree of precision in mathematical language, 
and relativity is not unique in this respect. In any 
event, we must not allow this possibility of mathe- 
matical formulation to obscure the essential fact that 
all physical knowledge is by its nature only approxi- 



I70 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



mate, so that we may expect at any time to find, when 
we have carried our measurements to a higher degree 
of precision, that our mathematical expression of the 
laws was not quite exact, as seems now to be the case 
with Newton's law of gravitation, for example. I do 
not suppose that Einstein would claim that the state- 
ments of relativity differ in this respect from any of 
our other statements about nature, although appa- 
rently some of his followers see something more here. 
(From the operational viewpoint the meaning to be 
attached to "something more" is somewhat obscure.) 

With respect to the second question, we may stop 
to notice that the special theory stands in quite a dif- 
ferent position from the general theory. The special 
theory is much more physical throughout; its postu- 
lates are physical in character, and it is obvious that 
the physics got into the results through the postulates. 
It seems to me without question that Einstein showed 
the intuitive insight of a great genius in recognizing 
that there are mutual relations between physical 
phenomena which can be described in very much sim- 
plified language in terms of concepts slightly modi- 
fied from those already in common use. In view of 
the remarks made on the nature of light, it is legiti- 
mate to wonder, however, whether the formulations 
of even the special theory will always stand. It 
seems to be true that all the facts of nature, even in 
the absence of a gravitational field, cannot be con- 
nected by the simple formulations of the special 
theory; that the physical relations are simple only in 
a sub-group ; and that if we wish to deal with all opti- 



RELATIVITY CONCEPTS 



171 



cal phenomena, we have carried our simplifications 
too far, for the emission of a light signal is not a sim- 
ple event, and light is not in nature like a thing trav- 
elling Just the sorts of physical thing w^hich are 
ignored in treating light as the special theory does 
are coming to be more and more important in the 
minds of physicists, and this is a reason for w^ondering 
v^hether ultimately Einstein's special theory may not 
be regarded merely as a very convenient way of tying 
together a large group of important physical phe- 
nomena, but not as being by any means a full or com- 
plete statement of natural relations. 

With respect to the general theory, however, I 
believe the situation is quite different. The funda- 
mental postulate that the laws of nature are of invari- 
ant form in all coordinate systems is highly mathe- 
matical, and of an entirely man-made character. Of 
what concern of nature's is it how man may choose to 
describe her phenomena, and how can we expect the 
limitations of our descriptive process to limit the 
thing described? Furthermore, Einstein's method of 
connecting his mathematical formulation and nature 
by way of coincidences of 4-events (three space, one 
time coordinates) seems to be very far removed from 
reality, since it entirely leaves out the descriptive 
background in terms only of which the 4-event takes 
on physical significance. Nevertheless, three defi- 
nite conclusions about the physical universe have 
been taken out of the hat by the conjuror Einstein 
(shift of the perihelion of Mercury, displacement of 
apparent position of stars at the edge of the sun's disk, 



172 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



and the shift toward the infra-red of spectrum lines 
from a source in a gravitational field), and the prob- 
lem for us as physicists is to discover by what process 
these results were obtained. 

An examination of what Einstein actually did in 
deriving his results will show, I believe, that the situ- 
ation is really different from that suggested above. In 
the first place, the requirement that the laws of nature 
be of invariant form actually places no restriction, as 
any one can see by setting himself the task of express- 
ing, for example, an inverse cube law for gravitation 
in terms of generalized coordinates. The work of 
expressing such a law can be attacked in a perfectly 
routine way. (The essential difference between the 
invariability requirements of the special and general 
theories is to be noted; the special theory requires 
that the velocity of light, for instance, have the same 
numerical value in all allowed systems: the general 
theory merely that all laws have the same literal 
form, but with variable numerical coefficients.) But, 
as Einstein says, if any one actually attempts to carry 
through the work of expressing an inverse cube law 
in generalized coordinates, he will find the task pro- 
hibitively complicated, and will seek for some sim- 
pler formulation. What Einstein actually did, there- 
fore, was to require that the laws of nature be simple 
in generalized form. Now we know that the law of 
gravitation as formerly expressed in ordinary coordi- 
nates as an inverse square law was approximately 
exact, and was also simple. Any deviations from this 
law are small, and all experience leads us to expect 



RELATIVITY CONCEPTS 



173 



that to the first order of small quantities the devia- 
tions can be taken care of mathematically in the form 
of small correction terms to this law. This by itself 
gives nothing, however, because a small correction 
term can be added to our equations in an infinite 
number of ways. If, however, we know that the 
equation must be of a certain type after the correction 
terms have been added, the possibilities are so much 
restricted that the form of the correction term may 
be determined. In arguing as to the probable type of 
the equation, Einstein advanced the considerations 
by which physics gets into the situation. 

In the first place, the special theory had prepared 
us for the possibility of finding that our measuring 
instruments might be modified in a gravitational 
field, analogously to the shortening of a meter stick 
when set into motion. In fact, special theory had 
indicated that in an accelerated system the modifica- 
tions might be too complicated to be treated by that 
theory. In the absence, then, of specific information 
we must be prepared for the most general possible 
alteration in space-time in a gravitational field. In 
describing space-time we must therefore use coordi- 
nates adapted to handling the most general possible 
relations, and these are the generalized coordinates 
of Riemann, which had been already discussed by 
mathematicians. Going back now to Einstein's cri- 
terion that the equations are to be simple, we have the 
demand that the equations be simple in generalized 
coordinates, and of course they must also reduce to 
the ordinary equations (that is, the equations of spe- 



174 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



cial relativity) in space where there is no gravita- 
tional field. In deciding the further question as to 
what the type of equation probably is, we are influ- 
enced by considerations of convenience as well as by 
physical considerations. Practically the only type of 
equation that can be handled mathematically is lin- 
ear, so that we shall certainly try first whether this 
type of equation may not continue to hold. Now the 
Newtonian law of the inverse square may be ex- 
pressed in terms of a linear differential equation of 
the second order in the old Cartesian coordinates 
( Poisson's equation) , so that our most immediate sug- 
gestion is that the equations remain linear and of the 
second order in generalized coordinates. As a matter 
of fact, this requirement turns out to be sufficient to 
determine the small correction term by which the 
ordinary equations can be generalized; Einstein's 
papers must be studied to see how this works out in 
detail. 

All this looks pretty mathematical, but as a matter 
of fact there is much physical content, because sys- 
tems which can be described by linear equations of 
the second order have definite physical properties. 
The requirement that the equations be linear corre- 
sponds to one of the most fundamental properties of 
our universe — the causality concept would not be pos- 
sible or would be much modified in a universe gov- 
erned by non-linear equations, for the joint effect of 
two causes acting together would not be the sum of 
their effects acting separately, so that the analysis of 
a situation into simple elements would be impossible 



RELATIVITY CONCEPTS 



175 



and the causality concept probably would not have 
arisen. Furthermore, an equation of the type of 
Poisson of the second order means that there are 
propagation phenomena, and equations of mechanics 
of the second order involve the existence of a scalar 
energy function. If, then, the behavior of the uni- 
verse can be described by differential equations at all, 
these equations must be linear of the second order if 
the universe is to have the broadest physical charac- 
teristics of our own universe. What Einstein really 
did, therefore, was to demand that even when space- 
time is warped by the presence of a gravitational field, 
those physical phenomena which can be described in 
terms of differential equations continue to be 
described by linear differential equations of the sec- 
ond order ; that is, that nature continues to be describ- 
able in terms of a causality concept, with propagation 
phenomena, and a simple energy function. The con- 
sequences of a guess like this about the properties of 
nature appeal to our physical intuition as being worth 
following out, and of course we know the experi- 
mental justification. 

Several general comments may now be made on the 
structure reached in this way. In the first place, the 
whole structure is only descriptive in character; we 
find certain correlations in nature which we describe 
with considerable completeness in mathematical 
equations, without introducing any new element of 
explanation or of mechanism. We have seen that as 
we increase our range from the realm of ordinary 
phenomena to phenomena of different character we 



176 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



arrive at a stage where for a time the process of 
explanation apparently halts, and we have to be satis- 
fied with a statement of mere correlation between 
elements; later, however, these elements may be 
accepted as the ultimates in a broadened scheme of 
explanation, and the explanatory process resumed. 
Are we at such a stage now with the general relativ- 
ity theory, and may later a new scheme of explana- 
tion be established based on the correlations of Ein- 
stein? This is of course a matter of individual judg- 
ment; I personally question whether the elements of 
Einstein's formulation, such as curvature of space- 
time, are closely enough connected with immediate 
physical experience ever to be accepted as an ultimate 
in a scheme of explanation, and I very much feel the 
need for a formulation in more intimate physical 
terms. 

In the second place, we must repeat the comment 
already made in discussing time, namely, that there is 
still a very wide gap between the theory and its phys- 
ical application, in that we have no way of identify- 
ing our physical clocks and our physical measures of 
time with the thing called time in the formulas. This 
gap must be filled by a specification of the physical 
structure of a clock. 

It has always been very puzzling to understand 
why Einstein has so strenuously insisted that the shift 
toward the infra-red is an integral part of the general 
theory, and that if the shift is not found, the theory 
must fall. In other words, Einstein insists that the 
assumption that an atom is a clock is an integral part 



RELATIVITY CONCEPTS 177 



of his theory. I believe that this attitude may be due 
''to a realization by Einstein of that very flaw in the 
logical structure which we are now emphasizing. In 
the absence of any method of specifying the details of 
construction of at least one clock, relativity becomes 
a purely academic affair, unless there exist in nature 
concrete things which may serve as clocks. Einstein 
must either be able to tell how to construct a clock, or 
else be able to point to a specific example of a clock. 
He chose the atom as the specific thing. Doubtless 
the reason was the apparent simplicity of the vibrat- 
ing mechanism of an atom, as shown by the precise 
equality of the frequencies emitted by all atoms of the 
same element. If the atom is not a clock, where in 
nature can one be found? But in the last few years 
we have come to appreciate the exceedingly compli- 
cated quantum structure of an atom, and Einstein's 
thesis loses much of its instinctive appeal. 

Since Einstein created the theory of relativity, it is 
perhaps ungracious to question his right to stipulate 
that the assumption that the atom is a clock is an 
integral part of the theory. This, however, degen- 
erates to a mere matter of language, and does not 
touch the arbitrary nature of the procedure. It does 
not prevent us from having a second brand of relativ- 
ity theory, that of X instead of Einstein, exactly like 
that of Einstein except that perhaps now the "clock'' 
is constructed in terms of the life period of a radio- 
actively disintegrating element. The only way to 
eliminate the arbitrariness seems to be to postulate 
that all natural processes, which run naturally of 



178 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 

themselves independently of what we may do, may 
equally well serve as clocks and give the same results. 
But in answering the question of the operational 
meaning of '^independently of what we may do" we 
shall effectively have to answer the question of what 
is a clock. This point of view may possibly, how- 
ever, get us a little nearer to our goal of finding how 
to specify the structure of a clock. 

Finally, the general theory is not completely gen- 
eral, but applies only to a certain range of phenom- 
ena, just as we saw that the special theory does not 
embrace all optical phenomena. The general theory 
applies only to those phenomena which can be 
described in terms of differential equations, that is, 
par excellence, to large scale phenomena. If quan- 
tum phenomena cannot be described by differential 
equations,' as apparently now they cannot, general 
relativity cannot by its very nature be applicable. 
General relativity does not give us a comprehensive 
formulation of the behavior of all nature, and as far 
as we can see, we are still as far as ever from such a 
general formulation. 

Rotational Motion and Relativity 
Physically there is a great dift'erence between the 
behavior of systems in uniform relative rectilinear 
motion and those in uniform relative rotation. The 
special theory of relativity states that there is a triply 
infinite number of systems with all possible uniform 

* This statement now takes on a very questionable aspect in 
view of the new quantum wave mechanics (March, 1927)- 



ROTATIONAL MOTION AND RELATIVITY 179 



rectilinear velocities with respect to each other, in 
all of which physical phenomena have exactly the 
same mutual relations, that is, natural laws are the 
same. Now the mere formulation of the principle 
suggests the sense in which "system" is here used. It 
is obvious that "system" refers only to a part of the 
universe; we are not making a hopelessly academic 
statement about what would happen if we had an 
infinite number of universes to experiment with, but 
are talking about operations that may be approxi- 
mately realized in our own universe. The "system" 
of the formulation we may think of as a completely 
equipped laboratory, out in empty space, so far from 
the heavenly bodies that they can have no effect. The 
different systems of the formulation are different lab- 
oratories, all built to exactly the same architectural 
blue prints. The phenomenon to which the postulates 
of relativity apply are phenomena which pertain 
entirely only to one or another of these laboratories. 
The meaning of this restriction is not completely defi- 
nite and has, in any special case, to be judged partly 
by the context. Obviously, to see from the window 
of a laboratory another laboratory passing with a cer- 
tain velocity cannot be counted as one of the allowed 
phenomena. Still less is it one of the allowed phe- 
nomena to observe that the center of gravity of the 
entire stellar universe has a certain velocity of trans- 
lation with respect to the laboratory. The special 
principle of relativity contains by implication there- 
fore the statement that certain very large and impor- 
tant classes of physical phenomena may be isolated 



i8o THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



and treated as taking place unaffected by the rest of 
the universe. Granted now the possibility of isola- 
tion, we have a second statement, which is usually 
treated as if it were the entire statement of the 
restricted principle, namely, that there is a triply 
infinite set of systems in which these phenomena run 
in the same way independent of the relative motion of 
the systems with respect to each other. When once 
the significance of the observation is grasped that 
absolute motion has no meaning in terms of opera- 
tions, we see that this last statement takes im- 
mediately a most simple and satisfying aspect, in 
fact, so simple and inevitable that we are inclined 
to see in this the complete essence of the situation 
and regard the meaninglessness of absolute motion 
as affording peremptory proof of the restricted prin- 
ciple. 

With this bias we now turn to examine the facts of 
rotary motion, and are disconcerted to find them 
quite different. No meaning in terms of measuring 
operations can be given to absolute rotary motion 
any more than to absolute translation, but neverthe- 
less phenomena are obviously entirely different in 
different systems in relative rotary motion (phenom- 
ena of rupture, for example) , so that apparently there 
are physical phenomena by which the concept of 
absolute rotary motion might be given a certain phys- 
ical significance. Given two worlds like our own in 
empty space, but surrounded by impenetrable clouds, 
and each provided with a Foucault pendulum, then 
we believe that it is physically possible that we may 



ROTATIONAL MOTION AND RELATIVITY i8i 



find on one of these worlds the plane of rotation of 
the pendulum gradually changing in direction, while 
on the other it remains stationary. This difference 
we regard as possible without other accompanying 
physical phenomena which are causally related to 
the rotation of the pendulum (of course we have to 
make the two worlds of infinitely rigid material and 
eliminate other phenomena which we regard as 
purely incidental), so that we apparently have here 
a contradiction of our cardinal physical principle of ^ 
essential connectivity. We are certainly not inclined * 
to give up our principle, and we believe that as a 
physical fact, if the clouds could be evaporated, an 
observer in one world would find that he was rotat- 
ing with respect to the system of the fixed stars, 
whereas the corresponding observer on the other 
world would find that he was stationary. Our prin- 
ciple of essential connectivity is therefore main- 
tained, in that the rotation of the plane of the pendu- 
lum is connected with a rotation with respect to the 
rest of the universe of the entire world in which the 
pendulum is mounted. As far as I am aware, no 
other way of maintaining our principle has ever been 
suggested. But this demands that we give up our 
physical hypothesis of the possibility of isolating a 
system. There is here no question of limiting behav- 
ior ; we believe that no matter how far our rotating 
world gets from the rest of the universe the Foucault 
pendulum would always behave in the same way; 
the system can never be isolated, but such local phe- 
nomena as the invariance of the plane of the pendu- 



i82 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



lum are always essentially determined by the rest of 
the universe. 

If now our system cannot be isolated, we must 
return to the phenomena of translational motion. In 
principle the act of isolation cannot be performed, 
the rest of the universe cannot be disregarded, and 
we should expect that different states of translational 
motion as well as different states of rotational motion 
with respect to the rest of the universe would have 
an effect on phenomena. We set ourselves the prob- 
lem of understanding this apparent enormous differ- 
ence between phenomena of translation and rotation. 
We remark that what apparently is a difference in 
principle may, in virtue of the approximate character 
of all measurement, be only a difference in magni- 
tude, and that translational effects may exist too small 
to detect. A physical basis for such a difference may 
be found in the enormously different numerical 
values of translational and rotational velocities with 
respect to the rest of the universe attainable in prac- 
tice. In describing phenomena of cosmic magni- 
tude, we may plausibly measure the phenomena in 
units commensurable with the scale of the phenom- 
ena. Thus in measuring linear distances, we may 
perhaps choose as the unit of length the diameter of 
the stellar universe, and in measuring rotation, a com- 
plete reversal of direction with respect to the entire 
universe. This last means a change of angular ori- 
entation of 2 TT, the first means a length of the order 
of 10' light years. Measured in such cosmic units 
the angular velocities attainable in practice are 



ROTATIONAL MOTION AND RELATIVITY 183 



incomparably greater than linear velocities. We 
now see that it is possible that the real state of affairs 
is as follows: namely, phenomena in any system are 
affected by motion with respect to the entire universe, 
whether that motion is of translation or of rotation, 
and the magnitude of the effect is connected with the 
velocity of the motion by a factor which is of the gen- 
eral order of unity when velocity is measured in cos- 
mic units. This last is merely an application of the 
argument so often made in physics as to the order of 
magnitude of unknown numerical factors, and will be 
found expanded on page 88 of my book on Dimen- 
sional Analysis. The linear velocities attainable in 
practice are now so exceedingly low that their effect 
has not yet been detected experimentally, but angular 
velocities are high, and the effect is easily demon- 
strable. In this light the special principle of relativ- 
ity is no different in character from any other physi- 
cal law; it is only approximate, and some day our 
measurements may become refined enough to detect 
its limitations. 

We have made a hypothesis here, which we may 
call the hypothesis of the immanence of the entire 
universe, namely, that isolation is impossible, or that 
the rest of the universe, no matter how distant, al- 
ways has a local effect on at least some phenomena. 
This is essentially the hypothesis of Mach,' and leads 
to a situation which can, I think, be contemplated 

^ E. Mach, The Science of Mechanics, translated by ]\IcCor- 
mack, The Open Court Publishing Co., Chicago, 1893. See 
especially p, 235. 



i84 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



with logical equanimity, although it has always 
seemed to many physicists most highly antiphysical 
in character. It must certainly be admitted that most 
physical experience justifies us in thinking that effects 
may be made as small as we please by getting far 
enough away from the cause of the effect. But if wc 
accept the considerations of the preceding pages, we 
must be prepared to admit that as phenomena change 
in range their character may change, and that in 
these new realms we must, at first at least, be satisfied 
with a mere statement of correlations. Certainly we 
have very strong physical evidence of a formal cor- 
relation between the Foucault pendulum and the rest 
of the universe. But a correlation of this sort may 
be without significance because of its very breadth; 
we never can prove the significance of the correlation 
by performing an experiment with the rest of the 
universe absent. Have we really done anything more 
than merely get things into such a formal situation 
that they cannot be assailed, a possibility which the 
mere laws of our thinking seem always to leave open, 
as has been suggested, or is there any physical con- 
tent to what we have done? We have seen that if 
our correlation is also suggested by other phenomena, 
then we may accept it as having physical content. 
Now there is just a glimmer of a suggestion that our 
hypothesis of the immanence of the universe may be 
needed in other ways. The gravitational constant 
and the velocity of light are always treated as arbi- 
trary magnitudes thrust on the universe from outside 



ROTATIONAL MOTION AND RELATIVITY 185 



with no connection with other phenomena. Never- 
theless, I suppose that no one regards this situation as 
ultimately satisfactory and does not entertain the 
hope that some day we may be able to give some sort 
of account of the numerical magnitude of these con- 
stants. We have not hitherto succeeded in finding 
any connection between these constants and small 
scale phenomena such as the charge on the 
electron, its mass, etc., so that there is some 
plausibility in expecting that a connection may be 
sometime found with cosmic things ; indeed general 
relativity theory already prepares us for exactly this 
possibility. Now the velocity of light and the gravi- 
tational constant control small scale experiments, for 
of course these two constants can be measured by 
local experiments, so that if the cosmic connection 
is found, we should have a control of local behavior 
by cosmic things, and therefore another example of 
the immanence of the entire universe. There is no 
need for me to waste time in apologizing for the 
highly speculative character of all this. It is worth 
while to emphasize, however, that our general con- 
siderations on the meaning of ^'explanation" have 
prepared us to admit as reasonable just the sort of 
explanation contained in the hypothesis of the imma- 
nence of the universe, and therefore to reserve a place 
in our physical thinking for possibilities of this sort, 
in spite of the fact that such considerations are not 
usually entertained, and may seem to many opposed 
to the spirit of physics. 



i86 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



Quantum Concepts' 
The history of quantum theory up to the present 
is a repetition in many respects of that of the early 
theories of electricity, in that all our thinking has 
been in mechanical terms. As far as we now know, 
quantum phenomena are always associated with 
atoms. We make for the atom a mental model with 
all the properties of the mechanisms of the ordinary 
scale of magnitude and with a few impressed prop- 
erties in addition which represent the new quantum 
relations. As we now think of it, the atom has a 
massive core about which electrons revolve under an 
inverse square law, the connection between the mass 
of the electron, its acceleration, and the force acting 
on it being that usual in Newtonian mechanics. The 
space in which the electron circulates is thought of 
as Euclidean, and the motion is described in time, 
which may be measured with clocks in the usual way. 
The general equations of electrodynamics do not 
apply; there are no propagation effects inside the 
atom, the motion of the electrons does not produce a 
magnetic field, and there is no radiation when the 
electron is in one of its possible stable states, in spite 

' This section was written early in 1926 without access to 
recent literature. Our attitude toward quantum phenomena has 
been so much changed since then by the "new'* quantum mechan- 
ics, that a number of the following statements are superseded as a 
statement of present opinion. However it has seemed worth while 
to let the section stand as written, because many of the develop- 
ments actually taken in the new mechanics follow the lines that 
it is here urged they ought to take, and in so far afford interest- 
ing confirmation of the point of view of this essay. 



QUANTUM CONCEPTS 



187 



of the acceleration. We may, if we please, in work- 
ing out the character of the motion, entirely neglect 
the electrical origin of the inverse square law, and 
treat this merely as an impressed force without 
further implications. Superposed on the ordinary 
spatial, temporal, and mechanical characteristics of 
the model are additional quantum properties, one 
which determines the particular orbit in which the 
electron moves [| pdq=nh], and another which 
determines the frequency of the radiation emitted 
when the electron passes from one allowed orbit to 
another. No mechanism is suggested to account for 
these quantum conditions, although the conditions 
are formulated in mechanical terms. 

We now have to ask what is the meaning in terms 
of operations of our usual concepts of space-time and 
mechanics when applied to phenomena of this order. 
It is of course evident, as has already been empha- 
sized, that the concepts have entirely changed in 
character, because we do not measure an electron 
orbit, for example, by stepping off the diameter with 
meter sticks, or by measuring the time required for 
light to travel across the diameter. The particular 
feature of immediate interest in this changed situa- 
tion is the change in number of our concepts on the 
atomic level. I shall not attempt to find by an exact 
analysis the number of independent concepts at this 
level ; probably such an analysis is not possible. We 
may, however, make an approximate suggestion. 
Apparently the most important concept in describing 
relations inside a quantum system corresponds to that 



i88 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



of energy on the ordinary scale. Changes of energy 
determine the frequency of emitted radiation, as well 
as the relations during collisions of atoms and elec- 
trons; these coUisional relations make direct connec- 
tion with experiment through the voltages applied to 
electrons in collision experiments. The analogue of 
the momentum concept also seems to have independ- 
ent significance, as shown by the Compton effect. 
The frequency of emitted radiation is also something 
with independent experimental significance. I 
believe that these three things are all that have direct 
significance for quantum experiments made up to the 
present time. In any event, it is perfectly evident 
that on the quantum level the concepts which at pres- 
ent have operational significance are considerably 
fewer than on the level of ordinary experience. 

Apart from the question of convenience, there may 
be justification in continuing to use our old mechan- 
ical forms of thought if new experimental relations 
are thereby suggested. That a very large number of 
such as yet undiscovered relations may be suggested 
in some such way is at once evident. Thus we have 
no present knowledge of any phenomenon associated 
with what the electron does when passing from one 
energy level to another. How long does it take to 
make the passage? What is its path during passage? 
Is it subject to the ordinary laws of electrodynamics 
during passage? When and where is the radiation 
emitted that corresponds to passage? When the elec- 
tron leaves one stable orbit is the orbit on which it 
will eventually land already determined? Does the 



QUANTUM CONCEPTS 



radiation train emitted during a change from one 
energy level to another have a definite length in 
space, or may it have a variable length and corre- 
spondingly something that corresponds to variable 
amplitude? What happens to the radiation when the 
electron passages are interfered with before the emis- 
sion of a quantum has been completed? What is the 
mechanism by which the quantum conditions are , 
imposed? Is it not possible that part of the clew to i 
the riddle of the manner of transition from purely 
quantum behavior to the behavior of classical 
mechanics may be found in the behavior of the elec- 
tron during passage from one energy level to another? 
Certainly we have a tendency to the classical behav- 
ior under those conditions, such as at high tempera- 
ture or in strongly condensed systems, in which the 
time occupied in passage might be expected to 
become a more important part of the total time. 

Corresponding to these questions there should be 
many as yet undiscovered phenomena, and the 
mechanical point of view therefore has its value in 
suggesting experiments to detect such effects. It is 
of course too early to see what the final result will be 
here; we cannot tell whether eventually enough new 
experimental kinds of behavior will be found to 
restore the number of independent concepts to that of 
the level of ordinary experience or not, or whether 
indeed it will turn out that a greater number of con- 
cepts is required. It is contrary to our instincts to 
expect a greater number, and a smaller number 
now seems to us not unnatural, but the considera- 



I90 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 

tions of this essay should prepare us for either pos- 
sibility. 

It is often said that quantum phenomena are incon- 
sistent with ordinary mechanics, and proofs of this 
assertion are often offered. I believe that no such 
proof, in the spirit in which the attempt is usually 
made, can be correct, for it seems to me that the 
remark of Poincare applies, namely, that any sort of 
behavior can be imitated by a mechanical system, 
, provided it is only complicated enough. A peremp- 
I tory proof of this can be given to any one who is not a 
• believer in vitalism. If a sentient being can be 
regarded as a mechanical system, we merely have to 
station inside each atom a Maxwell demon, with 
instructions to make the atom react according to 
quantum rules. Opposed to the spirit of this sort of 
reduction of quantum phenomena to mechanical 
terms, we have to remember that it makes sense to 
talk about the character of our conceptual structure 
only when the number of concepts is reduced to the 
number that have independent operational signifi- 
cance, that is, to the minimum number. 

In the meantime let us examine what may be the 
significance in the light of present experiment of 
statements like those ascribed to Bohr that our usual 
concepts of space and time may be inapplicable in 
dealing with quantum phenomena. This idea is 
often given the more explicit form that space and 
time may be essentially discontinuous at the quantum 
level. From the operational point of view, it is most 
difficult to see exactly what this more explicit state- 



QUANTUM CONCEPTS 



191 



ment means, at least in terms of those operations by 
which length and time were originally defined. Thus 
if space were discontinuous, it might mean that a 
point exists which may be reached by laying off a 
meter stick fourteen times, for example, and another 
point by laying off sixteen times, but that no point 
can be found with fifteen applications. Such a state 
of affairs seems to be inconsistent with our definition 
of the counting operation and to have no concern with 
any properties of space; for what shall we mean by 
laying off a meter stick sixteen times if it cannot be 
laid off fifteen times? It is conceivable that space 
might end, in the sense that beyond a certain limit 
there might be some irremovable physical hindrance 
to the continued laying off of distances with a meter 
stick (although I think that we should be inclined 
to describe such a state of affairs in terms of matter 
enclosing empty space rather than as the end of 
space), but to say that space may be discontinu- 
ous seems to be meaningless. In the same way, I 
believe it meaningless to speak of discontinuous 
time. We may have phenomena discontinuous 
in space and time, but not discontinuous space or 
time. 

It seems then that we must give up the idea that 
in the quantum domain the usual concepts of space 
and time may fail, in the specific sense that they may 
become discontinuous. What may we understand by 
the failure of these concepts in a more general sense? 
No one of course would expect that even eventually 
the concepts will have the same operational signifi- 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



cance for the inside of an atom that they have on the 
ordinary scale; it must be a modified sort of concept 
with which we are concerned, such as we have 
already seen is given by the field equations of electro- 
dynamics. If now the number of operationally inde- 
pendent concepts on the quantum level turns out to 
be the same as on the level of ordinary experience, 
and if there is also the possibility of continuous 
transition from the operations of the quantum domain 
to those of ordinary experience, then it seems to me 
that we should say that our usual concepts of space 
and time still apply in the quantum domain. But 
if the number of operationally independent concepts 
is either greater or less than on the ordinary level, 
then I believe we must say that the ordinary concepts 
of space and time cannot apply. One might still look 
for the possibility of separating out from the complex 
of concepts on the quantum level a group which 
might change continuously to those of space and time 
on the ordinary level, but I think that such a possi- 
bility is very remote when one considers that the total 
number of concepts changes, and that in the zone 
where the number changes the definitions are not 
unique by which one extrapolates a concept from one 
domain to another. 

If Bohr's idea is true that space and time cannot 
be used in describing ultimate quantum phenomena, 
one of the most immediate implications in terms of 
experiment might be that phenomena corresponding 
to intermediate positions of the electron between 
stable orbits do not exist. 



QUANTUM CONCEPTS 



193 



Finally, we must comment on the general tactics 
of the quantum situation. It would seem that there 
have already been a sufficient number of unsuccess- 
ful attempts to formulate quantum behavior in terms 
of ordinary mechanics to justify the expectation that 
ultimately something quite different must evolve. 
The difficulties of an unmodified carrying over of 
ordinary mechanical notions to quantum phenomena 
may be illustrated by a simple example. Consider 
a particle of mass m rotating in a frictionless circular 
track of radius r. Then according to quantum con- 
ditions it can move stably on this track only with cer- 
tain definite velocities, such that j pdq=mv 2ur=nh. 
Suppose now the particle rotating with one of the 
allowed velocities, and a tangential force applied. If 
the usual mechanical notions of force are still valid, 
the particle must respond by moving in its track with 
continually increasing velocity. After the velocity 
has been increased by a small amount, we remove the 
force. The motion is now no longer one of the 
allowed ones, and the particle must in some way 
change its velocity ; it must either slow down or speed 
up. In the first case it must either radiate energy, 
which a system of the simple mechanical properties 
we have supposed is not capable of doing, or else the 
law of conservation of energy fails, and also New- 
ton's first law of motion during the process of acquir- 
ing the steady condition. If, on the other hand, the 
particle speeds up, it must increase its energy from 
nowhere, and again ordinary mechanics does not 
apply. 



194 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



It seems then a mistake to attempt to formulate 
the quantum conditions in terms of the notions of 
ordinary mechanics (momentum, and position coor- 
dinates in either the ordinary or the generalized 
Lagrangean sense) . It would seem, on the other hand, 
plausible to expect that mechanics is not a funda- 
mental thing, but is in some way an effect produced 
by the aggregate action of a great many elementary 
quantum processes. Amplitude of radiational vibra- 
tion, for example, may be such a statistical aspect of 
a great many processes, in some such way as on the 
ordinary level of experience temperature is a statis- 
tical aspect of the average kinetic energy of the 
atoms. One possibility of this kind has already 
been more explicitly indicated; in the elementary 
process of emission of radiation, frequency and 
energy are not two independently assignable vari- 
ables, but are connected [E=h v]. That is, on the 
quantum level radiation has only a single property, 
which is properly neither energy or frequency. [We 
are now neglecting the polarization aspect of radia- 
tion.] On a higher level, that of ordinary radiation, 
the single elementary property has expanded itself 
into two (energy and frequency) through the addi- 
tional variable of the number of elementary quantum 
processes in the complex radiation. 

The program of the immediate future should be 
an extension of something of this sort, namely, to 
invent new concepts corresponding to the experi- 
mentally independent things on the quantum level 
(such perhaps as the resultant of the fusion of the 



QUANTUM CONCEPTS 



195 



energy and frequency concepts for radiation), and 
then to show how the ordinary concepts of mechanics 
(and very likely those also of space and time) are 
generated by statistical effects in aggregates of great 
numbers. Perhaps it is yet too early for an attempt 
of this sort, because it may seem that there are still 
too many possibilities of new experimental discover- 
ies which might upset the results of elaborate theo- 
retical speculation. If this should really be felt to 
be the case, I believe that physics ought for the pres- 
ent to hold in partial abeyance its theoretical activi- 
ties in this field, and devote itself to acquiring as rap- 
idly as possible the necessary experimental facts. We 
may emphasize again that the possibility of carrying 
out this plausible program can be proved only by 
experiment; it may be that more concepts will be 
required on the quantum level than for ordinary 
experience. 

The invention of new concepts is certainly not an 
easy thing, and is something which physics has always 
deliberately, and perhaps justifiably, shirked, as 
shown by the persistent attempts to carry the notions 
of mechanics down into the finest structure of things. 
This shirking has not had bad results, but on the con- 
trary good results, as long as physics has been pri- 
marily concerned with phenomena near the range of 
ordinary experience, but I believe that as we get 
farther and farther away from ordinary experience, 
the invention of new concepts will become an increas- 
ing necessity. 



CHAPTER IV 



SPECIAL VIEWS OF NATURE 

In this last chapter we propose to discuss certain 
special hypotheses about the structure of nature, and 
certain other matters that could best be left until we 
had examined our fundamental concepts. 

We have seen that in setting up the general rules 
which are to guide us in describing and correlating 
nature, we have to take extreme care to allow no spe- 
cial hypotheses to creep in, as otherwise we might be 
restraining possible future experience. Even here 
there is no hard and fast line of separation of the 
general from the special, and one might entangle 
himself in inextricable difficulties if his ideals were 
too meticulous. How for example is the critic to 
be answered who says: "Your very endeavor to 
formulate principles so broad as not to restrict future 
experience means, when examined in the light of 
operations, that you are seeking for principles which 
past experience suggests will not limit the future. It 
is in the very nature of things impossible to escape all 
the implications of past experience and therefore to 
find any completely general principle." I believe 
that we must admit the critic is right, and that rigor- 
196 



SPECIAL VIEWS OF NATURE 197 



ously our goal is impossible of attainment. We may 
say in partial self-defense that all the discussion of 
this essay has been subject to one explicit assumption, 
namely, that the working of our minds is understood, 
which of course involves the assumption that our 
minds continue to function in the future in the same 
way as in the past. Even with this proviso we can 
not rigorously avoid the implications of the past, but 
there can be no practical question that we recognize 
certain assumptions about the behavior of nature to 
be so special as to limit seriously the physical possi- 
bilities, and other assumptions to be less restricting. 
In the previous discussion we had to make assump- / 
tions, but I hope these assumptions will be recognized 
by all with physical experience to be so broad as not ; 
to restrict us seriously. More special assumptions or 
hypotheses have their very great use, however, when 
we attempt to push forward the domains of experi- j 
mental knowledge, because they may suggest new ' 
experiments or aid in correlating information already 
obtained. These special hypotheses may cover a very ; 
wide range of generality; some of them are general 
enough in character to be discussed here. 

Among these special hypotheses there is a group 
which play an important part in the speculation of 
most physicists, and which have features in common. 
These are: the hypotheses of the simplicity of \ 
nature, of the finiteness of nature in the direction of 1 
the very small, and of the determinateness of the ; 
future in terms of the present. That these views have ^ 
points of similarity is obvious if we consider a hypo- / 



198 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



thetical special case. Suppose that no physical struc- 
ture beyond the electrons and protons can be discov- 
ered, or is even suggested by any known phenomenon, 
so that the entire future behavior of a system can be 
determined by a specification of the present relations 
of all its protons and electrons; in this case nature 
would be both simple and finite and the future deter- 
mined by the present. 

The Simplicity of Nature 
Of these hypotheses, perhaps the most important 
is that of the simplicity of nature, because of its wide 
spread diffusion and the effect it has had on physical 
thought. The hypothesis of simplicity assumes sev- 
eral forms; some physicists are convinced that the 
laws which govern nature are simple, others that the 
ultimate stuff of which nature is composed is simple 
(perhaps protons and electrons and energy), or there 
may be a combination of both views into the belief 
that ultimately we shall find simple ultimate ele- 
ments behaving according to simple laws. In one 
respect it is obvious that nature is not simple, namely 
numerically — try counting the electrons or atoms or 
stars! 

Consider now the first of these aspects of the thesis 
of simplicity, which may be expressed as the convic- 
tion that the behavior of the entire universe can be 
comprehended in a few principles of great breadth 
and simplicity, such as the inverse square law of 
force, or the second law of thermodynamics, or per- 
haps still better the equality of the elementary posi- 



SPECIAL VIEWS OF NATURE 



tive and negative charges, which apparently holds 
to an enormous degree of precision. In explanation 
of a view like this there is in the first place the mental 
urge, because we can take a satisfaction almost 
aesthetic in contemplating such a universe, and there 
is in the second place a strong suggestion from ex- 
perience. Practically all the history of physics is a 
history of the reduction of the complicated to the 
simpler. For example, the behavior of a large part 
of the world of immediate experience can be reduced 
to the simple laws of mechanics. The behavior of 
another very large group of natural phenomena can 
be reduced to thermodynamics. The behavior of the 
heavenly bodies, which at first was described in a 
rather complicated way in the Ptolemaic system of 
astronomy, can be reduced to those same laws of 
mechanics which we find in our immediate neighbor- 
hood, with the one addition of the universal law of 
gravitation, which later refined experiment discloses 
is really active in our immediate surroundings. Sim- 
ilarly the laws of thermodynamics (except that part 
dealing with radiation) are reduced to the ordinary 
laws of mechanics through the additional assumption 
of the atomic structure of matter. Truly a stupen- 
dous accomplishment that may well color our whole 
future outlook. One may find great justification here 
for the belief that all nature will ultimately be 
reduced to a similar simplicity, and, in particular, 
justification for the attempt to find the explanation 
of all nature in the action of mechanical laws. Now, 
of course, as a matter of physical and historical fact, 



200 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 

this program could not be carried through, but obdu- 
rate physical phenomena were discovered. Electric 
phenomena, which at first seemed so promising, 
refused to fit into the scheme, and the converse 
attempt, to explain mechanical effects in terms of 
electrical effects, also failed. We still carry our ordi- 
nary mechanical notions down into the realm of small 
electric effects, and still talk, for instance, about non- 
electrical forces which hold an electron together. 
Nor are there experiments affording sufficient basis 
for believing that all the mass of a positive nucleus 
is electrical in character. We also think of electrical 
charges as having the property of identifiability, 
which involves the possession of sharp edges and a 
change in the law of force at small distances, and this 
is certainly a property carried over from our large 
scale experience. 

It seems fairly evident then that the laws of nature 
cannot be reduced to either those of mechanics or of 
electricity, nor probably, as is suggested by quantum 
phenomena, to a combination of both. This of course 
does not preclude the possibility that the laws still 
may be simple when expressed in other forms. An 
example of such a broad general law that goes deeper 
than mechanics or electrodynamics is probably 
afforded by the second law of thermodynamics when 
extended to include radiation phenomena. Examples 
of attempts to find other such simple laws are Tol- 
man's Principle of Similitude,' and Lewis's theory of 

' R. C. Tolman, Phys. Rev. 3, 244-255, 1914; 6, 219-233, 191 5; 
15, 521, 1920; Jour. Amer. Chem. Soc.» 43, 866-875, 1921. 



SPECIAL VIEWS OF NATURE 



Ultimate Rational Units/ and his recently enunci- 
ated principle of Complete Reversibility.' The first 
two of these attempts I do not believe are successful, 
for reasons I have stated elsev^here,' the third also 
seems somewhat doubtful. 

With regard to the general question of simple laws, 
there are at least two attitudes ; one is that there are 
probably simple general laws still undiscovered, the 
other is that nature has a predilection for simple 
laws. I do not see how there can be any quarrel with 
the first of these attitudes. Let us examine the sec- 
ond. We have in the first place to notice that ^'sim- 
ple" means simple to us, when stated in terms of our 
concepts. This is in itself sufficient to raise a pre- 
sumption against this general attitude. It is evident 
that our thinking must follow those lines imposed by 
the nature of our thinking mechanism: does it seem 
likely that all nature accepts these same limitations? 
If this were the case, our conceptions ought to stand 
in certain simple and definite relations to nature. 
Now if our discussion has brought out any one thing, 
it is that our concepts are not well defined things, but 
they are hazy and do not fit nature exactly, and many 
of them fit even approximately only within restricted 
range. The task of finding concepts which shall ade- 

^ G. N. Lewis. Vol. 15, 1921 of the Contributions from the 
Jefferson Physical Laboratory, dedicated to Professor Hall, Cam- 
bridge, Mass.; Phil. Mag., 49, 739-750, 1925. 

* G. N. Lewis, Proc. Nat. Acad. Sci., 11, 179-183, 422-428, 
1925. 

P. W. Bridgman, Phys. Rev. 8, 423-431, 19 16; "Dimensional 
Analysis," p. 105. 



202 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 

quately describe nature and at the same time be easily 
handled by us, that is, be simple, is the most impor- 
tant and difficult of physics, and we never achieve 
more than approximate and temporary success. Con- 
sider the example of time. The original concept of 
local time, which for long seemed satisfactory, turns 
out to be inadequate, and has to be replaced by 
extended time, which is so complicated that it is ques- 
tionable whether we shall ever be able to grasp it 
with the confidence that we must demand in a useful 
concept (by ^^grasp" I mean intuitive command of all 
the implications of the operations which are involved) . 
The concept has not yet been found which describes 
simply the temporal relations of the universe. 

Not only are concepts hazy around the edges and 
so incapable of fitting nature exactly, but there is 
always the chance that there are concepts other than 
those which we have adopted which would fit our 
present phenomena. Finding concepts to fit nature is 
much like solving a cross-word puzzle. In the puz- 
zle there may be some parts of the pattern which we 
fill completely and easily, but sometimes we find 
parts in which we can fill in everything except one 
or two obstinate definitions, so that we are sure we are 
on the right track, and rack our brains for the miss- 
ing words, when with a flash of inspiration we see 
that the obstinate words can be fitted in by a com- 
plete change in those which we had already accepted. 
It may be that we are soon to witness a similar change 
in our concept of the nature of light An important 



SPECIAL VIEWS OF NATURE 



difference between the cross-word puzzle and nature 
is that we can never tell when we have filled in all 
the squares in any of the parts of nature's puzzle; 
there is always the possibility of new phenomena 
which our present scheme does not touch. 

Considering, then, the nature of our conceptual 
material, it seems to me that the overwhelming pre- 
sumption is against the laws of nature having any 
predisposition to simplicity as formulated in terms of 
our concepts (which is of course all that simplicity 
means), and the wonder is that there are apparently 
so many simple laws. There is this observation to be 
made about all the simple laws of nature that have 
hitherto been formulated ; they apply only over a cer- 
tain range. We have not extended the laws of gravi- 
tation to small bodies, nor have we found that our 
electrical laws will work on a cosmic scale. It does 
not seem so very surprising that over a limited do- 
main, in which the most important phenomena are of 
a restricted type, the conduct of nature should follow 
comparatively simple rules. 

A tempting question is whether there may not be 
some laws of nature that are really simple, without 
relation to our mode of formulation, such as the law 
of the inverse square. I leave it to the reader to 
decide whether this question has meaning. In this 
connection it is possibly significant that the average 
physicist is strangely reluctant to tamper with the 
inverse square law. I find in myself a lack of sym- 
pathy, which I cannot justify by any of the consid- 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



erations of this essay, with attempts like the recent 
one of Swann," for example, to explain a wide vari- 
ety of hitherto obstinate effects by the assumption of 
slightly unequal departures from the inverse square 
law by the electrons and protons. Of course I hope 
that this feeling will turn out not to be prejudice, but 
will perhaps be justified by some such general obser- 
vation as that a departure from the inverse square 
law so slight as by definition to be forever beyond 
detection by direct experiment is meaningless; but of 
this I am not at all sure. 

We are now ready to consider the second respect 
in which nature may be simple, namely, because the 
material of which it is built may reduce to a few sorts 
of elements. In this discussion it will be convenient 
to consider also at the same time the more inclusive 
simplicity arising from simple laws acting on simple 
elements. The immediate question for us here is one 
of fact: does nature seem to be getting intrinsically 
simpler as we get toward small scale phenomena? 
There is much room for difference of opinion here; 
personally I feel that this expected simplicity is not 
in evidence, at least to the extent that we could desire. 
For instance, the fact that the electrons must have 
both electrical and mechanical properties is a straw 
in this direction. 

It must also be remembered that a certain simula- 
tion of simplicity is inevitable as we approach the 
limits of experimental knowledge, whatever the 
actual structure of nature, for the mere reason that 

' W, F. G. Swann, Phys. Rev., 25, 253, 1925. 



SPECIAL VIEWS OF NATURE 205 



near the limit our possible experimental operations 
become fewer in number, and our concepts fewer 
also. The question which we are trying to answer 
has, therefore, its real meaning only in terms of the 
possible future. Do we believe that if we drive in 
our stakes at a certain point on our present frontiers, 
this point will gradually, as physics advances, 
become possessed of a continually richer experience, 
so that nature at this point will appear increasingly 
complicated? Or do we expect a termination of this 
process of expansion fairly soon? It seems to me 
that as a matter of experimental fact there is no 
doubt that the universe at any definite level is on 
the average becoming increasingly complicated, and 
that the region of apparent simplicity continually 
recedes. This, however, is not the opinion of all 
observers. Thus Bertrand Russell, in "What I 
Believe", page 10, writes, "Physical Science is then 
approaching the stage where it will be complete, and 
therefore uninteresting." 

This is perhaps a particularly favorable epoch in 
the history of physics to urge the essential com- 
plexity of nature, because all our new quantum 
phenomena indicate a vast wealth of hitherto unsus- 
pected relations on the very edge of the attainable. 
There is one aspect of quantum relations, as also of 
our ideas of the nature of the structure of the 
nucleus of the atom, which is particularly signifi- 
cant in this respect, namely, that we have to describe 
phenomena by statistical methods. Now a statistical 
method is used either to conceal a vast amount of 



2o6 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



actual ignorance, or else to smooth out the details 
of a vast amount of actual physical complication, 
most of which is unessential for our purposes. There 
can be no doubt of the amount of ignorance that the 
statistical method conceals when applied to these 
phenomena, but there are also strong indications, 
particularly when applied to the nucleus, that it 
covers a vast amount of actual physical complica- 
tions. The nucleus of a radium atom becomes 
unstable on the average every 10* years, which may 
be plausibly taken to indicate that every 10* years the 
radium nucleus gets itself into some particular con- 
figuration. Considering the time scale on which we 
suppose events in the atom to take place, and also 
considering the fact that radioactive disintegration 
seems unaffected by outside agencies, this would 
indicate a perfectly appalling amount of structure. 
We are similarly driven to statistical methods in 
quantum theory, as for example, in Einstein's 
analysis of the details of equilibrium between 
emitting and absorbing atoms and radiation. 

In general, we cannot admit for a minute tnat a 
statistical method, unless used to smooth out irrele- 
vant details, can ever mark more than a temporary 
stage in our progress, because the assumption of 
events taking place according to pure chance consti- 
tutes the complete negation of our fundamental 
assumption of connectivity; such statistical methods 
always indicate the presence of physical complica- 
tions which it must be our aim to disentangle 
eventually. 



SPECIAL MEWS OF NATURE 207 

It appears then that present experimental evidence 
makes very probable structures beyond the electron 
and the quantum ; we may go even further and say 
that there is no experimental evidence that the 
sequence of phenomena in nature as we go to ever 
smaller scales is a terminated sequence, or that a drop 
of water is not in itself essentially infinite. (This 
statement contains by implications the meaning that 
we attach to infinite.) All the more, then, there is 
no evidence that nature reduces to simplicity as we 
burrow down into the small scale. 

Whatever may be one's opinion as to the simplicity 
of either the laws or the material structure of nature, 
there can be no question that the possessors of some 
such conviction have a real advantage in the race for 
physical discovery. Doubtless there are many simple 
connections still to be discovered, and he who has a 
strong conviction of the existence of these connections 
is much more likely to find them than he who is not at 
all sure they are there, and is merely hunting for any- 
thing that may turn up. It is largely a matter of 
psycholog}'. Everyone knows that the mere sugges- 
tion that a problem has a solution, or the knowledge 
that someone has already solved it, is often sufficient 
to suggest a relation that otherwise might not have 
been noticed. The chances are, therefore, that the 
relations between phenomena will be found by those 
who are previously convinced that the relations exist. 
The observation that most of the discoveries are made 
by men with particular sorts of conviction naturally 
strengthens the belief that their convictions are true. 



2o8 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



But this picture has an obverse side. The man who 
is convinced that there is a relation where none exists 
may waste all his time in vain seeking for it. Granted 
that nature has no particular predisposition to simple 
relations, the conviction that there are such relations 
is, from the point of view of any one individual, as 
likely to be a hindrance as a help. From the point 
of view of physical society, on the other hand, it is 
desirable that there be such convictions, for in such a 
society there will be more discoveries than in a society 
without such convictions. We have here again the 
old conflict between the individual and society. As 
in all other similar conflicts, society will not be able 
to demand permanently from the individual the 
acceptance of any conviction or creed which is not 
true, no matter what the gain in other ways to society. 
If nature is not simple, physicists will not continue to 
believe that it is, even if such a conviction does 
increase the total number of discoveries. It is an 
impossible attitude to expect that one can maintain. 
Does this then mean that physics is to face a drab 
future, becoming continually more prosaic, with new 
discoveries ever rarer, made by a continually decreas- 
ing number of misguided but fortunate enthusiasts? 
There may be such a danger, but the greatest part of 
the danger is avoided if its nature is clearly recog- 
nized. One of the problems of the future is the self- 
conscious development of a more powerful technique 
for the discovery of new relations without the neces- 
sity for preconceived opinions on the part of the 
observer. 



SPECIAL VIEWS OF NATURE 209 



There is an aspect here of our physical research 
that is often lost sight of', namely, the small propor- 
tion of successful discoveries compared with the 
number of investigators. Certainly the number of 
unsuccessful attempts, even in the case of those for- 
tunate individuals who make the great discoveries, is 
very much greater than the number of their success- 
ful attempts. (Faraday's reputed satisfaction with a 
1/10% return comes to mind.) This must always be 
taken into account in estimating the probable chances 
of correctness of any new theory. With so many 
physicists working to devise new theories, the chances 
are high that many false theories will be found, in 
which a number of phenomena may apparently fit 
together into a new relation, but which eventually 
prove to be inconsistent with other phenomena, so 
that the proposed theory has to be abandoned. As 
physics advances and the number of investigators and 
the amount of physical material increases, one has to 
be more and more exacting in one's requirements of 
a new theory. One must be particularly on guard 
against numerical coincidences. An interesting 
chapter might be written on numerical relations 
which have been hopefully published, but later had 
to be abandoned as without significance. 

Determinism 
If we are right in supposing that physical evidence 
gives no warrant for the idea that nature is finite 
downward, we have not only repudiated the thesis of 
simplicity but we have also made a very important 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



observation on the other general thesis mentioned at 
the beginning of this chapter, namely, the thesis of 
physical determinism. By determinism we under- 
stand the belief that the future of the whole universe, 
or of an isolated part of it, is determined in terms of a 
complete description of its present condition. [What 
we mean by present condition will be discussed later.] 
It is popularly assumed that every physicist sub- 
scribes to some such thesis as this. But now if there 
is infinite structure even in a small isolated part of 
the universe, a complete description of it is impos- 
sible, and the doctrine as stated must be abandoned. 
It seems to me that all present physical evidence pre- 
pares us to admit this possibility. I suppose, how- 
ever, that most physicists would subscribe to some 
modification of the original thesis, perhaps along the 
following lines. Given a description of an isolated 
part of the physical universe in the most complete 
terms that have physical meaning, that is, down to 
the smallest elements of which our physical opera- 
tions give us cognizance, then the future history of 
the system is determined within a certain penumbra 
of uncertainty, this penumbra growing broader 
as we penetrate to finer details of the structure of 
the system or as times goes on, until eventually all but 
certain very general properties of the original 
system, such as its total energy, are forever lost in the 
haze, and we have a system which was unpredictable. 
I suppose that it is a further conviction of at least 
many physicists that by sufficiently refining our meas- 
urements, the amount of haze at any fixed point in 



SPECIAL VIEWS OF NATURE 



the future may be made indefinitely small, and many 
might even go further and hope by studying the haze 
(perhaps statistically) to obtain some inferential evi- 
dence of structure beyond that yet experienced. In 
fact it may be that this last contains the germs of the 
ultimate method of investigation, if we ever reach a 
stage when we can no longer refine our methods of 
measurement. 

Determinism to the physicist is simply a way of 
stating certain implications of his conviction of the 
connectivity of nature. We have seen that the 
broadest possible statement of the thesis of connec- 
tivity is: Given two isolated systems with identical 
past histories up to a certain epoch, then the future 
histories will also be identical. The thesis of the 
determinism of the future by the present constitutes 
a specialization of this general thesis in that we sup- 
pose that identity of all past history is not necessary 
for identity of future behavior, but only identity of 
present condition. The general and the special thesis 
are not equivalent by any means: if past histories are 
identical then present conditions are also identical, 
but the converse does not necessarily hold at all. 

Now I believe that the general thesis (which I 
suppose all physicists will admit, but whose truth is 
nevertheless subject to the verification of experience) 
gets turned into the special thesis by a feeling of 
somewhat metaphysical content, which we may per- 
haps state by saying that we can see no way by which 
the past can affect the future except through the 
present. We do not like to think of the effect of a 



212 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 

cause distant in the past jumping over the present and 
affecting the future without touching the present at 
all. It is the analogue of that attitude of mind to 
which action at a distance in space is inconceivable; 
just as it is difficult to conceive of a body here affect- 
ing a body there without in some way an action 
propagated through intermediate space, so we do not 
like to think of a past cause jumping over time and 
producing a future effect without some sort of con- 
tinuity in the causal chain through all intermediate 
time. 

So far our discussion has been purposely loose: it 
is evident that what we mean by ^'present state" is 
crying for definition. What is meant by this may 
depend somewhat on the specific hypothesis that one 
adopts about the structure of nature. Historically 
the conviction of future determinism has been most 
intimately associated with a mechanical picture of 
the structure of the universe, so that it may be well 
to begin from this point of view. Suppose the 
simplest possible system composed of point masses 
without structure, as in the kinetic theory of gases. 
What sort of specifications do we believe necessary 
to fix the present state of such a system? The mechan- 
ical view of nature gives a definite answer. By 
present state we mean the positions and velocities of 
all the masses. This is sufficient for the complete 
determination of any purely mechanical system, in 
which the forces between the elements are known 
functions of only their relative positions. By a sort 
of extension of these ideas valid for mechanical sys- 



SPECIAL VIEWS OF NATURE 213 

terns, it seems to be often thought that the present state 
of any system is determined by a complete specifica- 
tion of the positions and velocities of all the ultimate 
elements of the system (provided always of course 
that this number is finite). This principle, however, 
does not appear to bear the check of experiment when 
applied to electrical systems with radiation. The 
theorems of the retarded potential show that such sys- 
tems are determined by the present position and 
velocities of the charges in the immediate vicinity, 
and by the corresponding data at remote points given 
for proper epochs in the past; in this case, therefore, 
past and present history are necessary to determine 
the future. But if we consider the electrical field as 
part of the system, we may fix the future in terms of 
the present positions of the charges, their velocities, 
and the values of the field vectors all over space, 
thus returning to a certain formal resemblance to 
mechanical systems, and suggesting a reason for 
ascribing physical reality to the electric field. This 
analogy with a mechanical system is, however, loose; 
complete analogy would allow the instantaneous 
values of the time derivatives of the field to be given 
also, and this is not possible. 

How is it that velocity can strictly be regarded as 
characteristic of the present state of the system ? Cer- 
tainly the usual operations for measuring velocity 
demand that we know the configuration of the system 
at two different times, and calculate the velocity from 
certain differences of the system at these two times. 
The velocity is defined as a limiting result, but even 



214 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 

in the limit the essential physical fact does not dis- 
appear that we must know the positions of the system 
at two times. We may now go further ; if the velocity 
is properly included in the present attributes of the 
system, we can see no reason for not including a 
specification of all the higher time derivatives also. 
In the case of the simple gaseous system under present 
consideration we can answer this question by exam- 
ining the operations by which we actually go to work 
to determine the future of such a system. The prob- 
lem of determining the future condition of such a 
system reduces to the problem of writing the differen- 
tial equations of motion of all its parts. If the sys- 
tem is a mechanical system, as in this case, these equa- 
tions are of the second order in the time derivatives 
of the position coordinates, and also involve the 
forces, which we suppose are known in terms of the 
relative positions of the parts of the system. Given, 
then, the positions and the way in which the forces 
depend on the relative positions of the parts, the equa- 
tions of motion can be written down for any con- 
figuration of the system, and these equations may be 
integrated (at least approximately) in terms of the 
proper initial conditions. Now the only boundary 
conditions on a second order equation are the initial 
positions and velocities. This is the reason that 
velocities have to be specified in giving the present 
condition of the system, and that it is not necessary to 
give the higher derivatives. Apparently the reason 
why we instinctively include velocity among the 
present properties of the system is not because 



SPECIAL VIEWS OF NATURE 215 

velocity is by its nature strictly a present property of 
the elements of the system, but rather because our 
wide experience with mechanical systems has shown 
that as a matter of fact velocity is necessary in such 
systems to determine future motion. 

But now if the equations of motion of the parts 
of the system are not those of mechanics, they will in 
general be much more complicated in appearance and 
will involve higher derivatives of the time than the 
second. Suppose for the moment that the equations 
contain only derivatives and the mutual positions of 
the parts of the system. Then to integrate the equa- 
tions and determine the motion we have to know the 
initial positions and the initial values of all the deriv- 
atives up to an order one lower than the highest 
which occurs in the equations. The equations of 
motion of an electron are even more complicated than 
this, in that the positions of distant parts of the sys- 
tem have to be given throughout an interval of time 
instead of merely an instant. It would seem that the 
feeling that the present state of a system may be deter- 
mined in terms of positions and velocities does not as 
a matter of fact apply to all the systems of our 
experience. 

The discussion up to this point has been subject to 
the fundamental assumption that the behavior of the 
system is entirely determined if we can give the posi- 
tion of each part as a function of time. This assump- 
tion is implicitly contained in Einstein's formulation 
of the general principle of relativity, namely, that 
there is nothing more to a physical system than a set 



2i6 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



of space-time coincidences, and that the system is 
fixed in terms of the space time coordinates of all its 
parts. Already in discussing the assumption of rela- 
tivity we have indicated reasons for dissatisfaction 
with this as a means of reproducing all experience, 
because in giving only the space-time coordinates of 
events we have entirely omitted the descriptive back- 
ground of the equations, which gives physical color to 
the system in question. This discussion also assumes 
that a specification of the positions, velocities, and 
higher derivatives (if necessary) of the elements of 
the system is possible, which amounts essentially to 
the assumption that the system contains only a finite 
number of elements. Now in view of the experi- 
mental fact that there is no reason for supposing that 
the structure of the universe is finite, this conclusion 
must be modified, but I do not believe that the neces- 
sary modification affects the essential argument. In 
view of the possible infinite structure it would seem 
that we cannot expect more than that the future is 
determined by the present within a certain penumbra 
of uncertainty, and this penumbra may be made less 
important by digging down deeper into the structure 
when specifying the present condition. 

We have also slurred over the ambiguities in 
^^present" condition when the system is spread over 
space. Probably a unique ascription of meaning to 
"present" is not possible for an extended system, but 
at least one possibility is indicated by relativity 
theory. Imagine a staff of assistants distributed 
throughout space, each equipped with clocks syn- 



SPECIAL VIEWS OF NATURE 217 



chronized and set with the master clock by light 
signals in the conventional manner, and each fully 
equipped with the necessary measuring instruments. 
Then what we mean at this point of the argument by 
"present" state of the system is the aggregate of all 
the information about the positions and velocities of 
the ultimate elements which I determine in my imme- 
diate vicinity at my origin of time plus the reports 
of similar observations made by all the assistants, 
each local observation being made at the time origin 
of each local clock. 

Going back now to the main argument, we have 
shown that the feeling that the present condition of 
the universe may be specified in terms of positions 
and velocities arose from experience with purely 
mechanical systems, and that the more general for- 
mulation, in which we add to the velocities the higher 
time derivatives, applies only to systems in which the 
ultimate elements move according to differential 
equations of higher order than the second. Further- 
more, our analysis seems to have shown that systems 
in which there is radiation do not allow a determina- 
tion of the future in terms of a present condition 
specified in terms such as these. It seems, howxver, 
that the general principle of the determinism of the 
future by the present may be saved by a change in 
the definition of what v/e mean by the present condi- 
tion of the system, ridding it of its mechanical and 
other special implications, and making more imme- 
diate connection with direct experiment. Let us 
understand by present condition of a system the 



2i8 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



aggregate of all information that can be obtained by 
any physical means whatever, with any sort of phys- 
ical instrument, not attempting to get out of this 
analysis information about hypothetical ultimate 
physical elements, with the proviso that the measure- 
ments are to be made now, extending the concept of 
"now" to points distant in space in the way intimated 
above. With such a general definition of the mean- 
ing of "present" we can now deal with systems in 
which there is radiation, noticing that our assistant 
observers must be stationed throughout apparently 
empty space as well as in the neighborhood of 
matter. That this does adequately cover the case of 
radiation is suggested by considering again the two 
systems of dark lanterns with screens and distant 
mirrors which we have previously considered, in one 
system a light signal having been despatched O.S 
second ago and in the other 1.5 seconds ago. Our 
thesis demands that there be some present difference 
in these two systems, because their future history is 
different, in one of them a light signal arriving after 
the lapse of 1.5 seconds, and in the other after only 
0.5 second. Now there is a present difference as 
reported by our assistants, for the assistant stationed 
half way betv/een lantern and mirror reports in 
one system a flash of light on the side of a screen 
which is turned toward the lantern, and in the 
other system on the side of the screen turned toward 
the mirror. 

This more general point of view answers the ques- 
tion whether velocity may be regarded as a present 



SPECIAL VIEWS OF NATURE 



attribute of the system, for the parts of a system which 
are in motion have momentum, and momentum may 
be detected by placing against such parts compara- 
tively rigid members which will receive a minutt 
deformation, so that velocity has a meaning in terms 
of physical measurements made at a single instant 
of time. 

There is a subtle and difficult question here, 
namely, whether in talking about operations of meas- 
urement we can ever get rid of temporal implica- 
tions, and therefore, whether a condition of the 
system in which temporal implications remain can 
properly be described as "present." I shall not 
attempt to answer this question : there must be some 
practically satisfying answer, involving perhaps the 
physical analogue of differentials of different orders 
in mathematics, short of carrying the analysis to such 
a degree of refinement that the concept of present 
becomes meaningless, as we can see might easily 
happen. 

With this enlarged understanding of what we mean 
by present state of the system, it seems to me that 
physical evidence is now rather favorable to the view 
that the present determines the future, subject to 
qualification about the penumbra, at least as far as 
large scale phenomena are concerned. It appears 
much more doubtful when we come to small scale 
phenomena, and in particular it is doubtful whether 
the principle can be applied to the details of the 
quantum process, and in fact it is not certain that it 
has meaning. It is certain that if it is true an enor- 



220 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



mous amount of structure beyond any that has yet 
been detected is implied. 

On the Possibility of Describing Nature 

Completely in Terms of Analysis 
There is a certain thesis that is loosely related to 
the view that nature is finite downward, namely, that 
an explanation of the universe is possible in which 
we start with small scale things, and explain large 
scale phenomena in terms of their small scale con- 
stituents, the thesis, in other words, that all the prop- 
erties of the large are contained in the properties of 
the small and that the large may be constructed out 
of the small. Some such thesis as this seems implied 
in the general attitude of many physicists. Let us 
examine the physical basis for this. To maintain this 
thesis would demand that aggregates of things never 
acquire properties in virtue of their numbers which 
they do not already possess as individuals. Is this 
true? Consider, for example, the two-dimensional 
geometry on the surface of a sphere. This is non- 
Euclidean. Is the geometry of the individual ele- 
ments of the surface of the sphere non-Euclidean, or 
do they acquire this property in changing scale? Is 
the kinetic energy of a number of electrons all moving 
together in such a way as to constitute an electric 
current the sum of the kinetic energies of the indi- 
vidual electrons, or is there an additional term? Is 
the mass of an electron the sum of the masses of its 
elements? 



SPECIAL VIEWS OF NATURE 



A mathematical consideration is suggestive here. 
Those properties of a system which can be described 
in terms of linear differential equations have the 
property of additivity; the effect of a number of ele- 
ments is the sum of the effects separately, and no new 
properties appear in the aggregate which were not 
present in the individual elements. But if there are 
combination terms (as in the electrical energy, which 
contains the square of the field) , then the sum is more 
than (or different from) its parts, and new effects 
may appear in the aggregate. Now of course the 
linear equation is of enormous importance in describ- 
ing nature, but many examples of systems with other 
types of equation can be found, as that above for 
electromagnetic mass. In expecting to find in nature 
such non-additive effects, we need not commit our- 
selves at all to the view that nature is governed by 
differential equations, but by analogy may expect 
similar effects if difference equations, for instance, 
should prove to be fundamental, or even something 
beyond present mathematical formulation. 

It is certainly very much easier to handle a system 
physically if the total action can be built up from 
that of its parts, because the analysis which estab- 
lishes the connection between the elements is easier 
to perform. It is obviously easier to show that an 
explanation in such terms is correct, because we have 
seen that explanation involves making experiments 
with representative elements absent or altered, and it 
is easier to vary the small things than the large things. 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



Those explanations which involve working from the 
small up will therefore be made first, and will appear 
to be of disproportionate importance. Places where I 
look for an explanation from the large to the small 
are perhaps in accounting for the values of the gravi- 
tational constant and the velocity of light and in 
those phenomena which general relativity theory 
indicates may depend on all the matter in the uni- 
verse, as the Foucalt pendulum experiment. We 
must, of course, also be prepared for such non-linear 
effects in the domain of unexplored quantum 
phenomena. 

A Glimpse Ahead 

Some of the general considerations of this essay 
may, with considerable plausibility, be expected to 
play a part in the future of both speculative and 
experimental physics. The most important effect may 
be expected from the clearer recognition of the opera- 
tional character of our physical concepts. Indeed 
during the writing of this essay there has been a very 
marked increase in emphasis on the necessity of 
understanding in terms of physical operations such 
fundamental concepts as that of the electron, by the 
new quantum mechanics [the mechanics of Heissen- 
berg-Born and Schrodinger of 1925-26]. 

We are to expect then in the first place a more 
self-conscious and detailed analysis of the operational 
structure of all our physical concepts. [It has been 
beyond the scope of this essay even to begin to attempt 
a systematic and thoroughgoing analysis of this 



SPECIAL VIEWS OF NATURE 



character.] This future analysis will show precisely 
how, as we extend the range of experience, the phys- 
ical character of the operations changes by which we 
define our concepts, as, for example, in mechanics 
the notion of force disappears at high velocity and is 
replaced perhaps by the notion of momentum. In the 
region of change in the nature of our concepts, special 
study will be made of the accuracy of our physical 
measurements, and new experiments devised of 
greater accuracy, in order that we may know pre- 
cisely to what extent the new concepts are equivalent 
to the old. Past experience suggests that we may 
perhaps expect to find new phenomena especially in 
those regions where the difficulty of carrying out the 
usual operation forces us to change the operational 
character of our concepts. There will be questions 
of a more or less formal nature to answer, as for 
example the best way of extending concepts when 
there are several possible courses open to us. 

We may expect more interesting results, however, 
when we get so far beyond ordinary experience that 
the character of the possible physical operations has 
become so restricted as to result in an apparent 
decrease in the number of independent concepts. It 
seems plausible to expect that the structure of 
nature is more fundamentally connected with the 
number of independent concepts necessary for a com- 
plete description than with the precise details of the 
structure of the individual concepts, such, for 
example, as whether space is measured optically or 
tactually. In those regions where the number of 



224 



THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



concepts decreases, we must make the most thorough- 
going experimental examination to discover if pos- 
sible new sorts of operations by which the number of 
concepts may be brought back to normal. In search- 
ing for such new experimental operations it seems to 
me that by far the greatest promise for the imme- 
diate future is offered by improvements in our powers 
of dealing with individual atomic and electronic 
processes, such as we now have to a limited extent 
in the various spinthariscope methods of counting 
radioactive disintegrations, or Wilson's ^-track 
experiments/ In this self-conscious search for 
phenomena which increase the number of operation- 
ally independent concepts, we may expect to find a 
powerful systematic method directing the discovery 
of new and essentially important physical facts. 

We can only conjecture whether the number of 
fundamental concepts will prove impossible of 
further increase or not, but present experience seems 
to give greater probability to the view that as we 
penetrate deeper the number of fundamental con- 
cepts will always tend to become fewer. We have 
already certainly one example in that the temperature 
concept disappears when we get to the atomic scale 
of magnitude, and possibly a second example in the 
building up of separate concepts for energy and fre- 
quency by the combination of great numbers of that 
one operationally simple thing which characterizes 



' C. T. R. Wilson, Proc. Roy. Soc, 87, 277, 1912. 



SPECIAL VIEWS OF NATURE 225 

the elementary quantum process in ordinary 
radiation. 

Different sorts of relations between concepts are 
conceivable in the transition zone where the number 
changes. We may find that other examples are like 
that of temperature, which is simply a statistical 
effect of a great many phenomena which may be 
described individually in terms of the ordinary con- 
cepts of mechanics, so that in this case the number 
of concepts changes merely by temperature dropping 
out, leaving the others more or less unaffected. Or 
all the concepts may be more closely interwoven, so 
that when the total number of concepts changes it 
may not be possible to separate out a group of con- 
cepts whose defining operations are unchanged. In 
such a case we must say that the original concepts 
are not applicable on the new level. The most imme- 
diate application of this idea has been already men- 
tioned, namely, to the concepts of space and time. 
If the operations by which space and time are meas- 
ured on the ordinary scale of magnitude cannot be 
carried down as a whole into the region of quantum 
phenomena, then we must say that the ordinary con- 
cepts of space and time are not applicable to these 
phenomena. 

Closely connected with the sharper analysis of the 
operational structure of our concepts, we may expect 
in the future also a closer analysis of our inventions. 
This will take the form of a search for new physical 
facts which shall give to our inventions the character 



226 THE LOGIC OF MODERN PHYSICS 



of physical reality. In case prolonged search fails 
to disclose such phenomena (as is probably now the 
case with the field concept of electrodynamics), we 
must then find some way of embodying explicitly in 
our thinking the fact that we are dealing with pure 
inventions and not realities. 



INDEX 



Absolute, 26 
Absolute time, 4 
Action at a distance, 46 
Analysis of large into small, 5 1 , 
220 

Arithmetic, 35 
Atom,59 

Bell, 84 
Birkhoff, 72 
Black body, 112 
Bohr, 190, 192 
Born, 222 
Boscovitch, 46 
Bothe and Geiger, 116 
Bridgman, 201 

Brownian movement, 107, 129, 

143 
Bush, J 42 

Caloric fluid, 59 
Campbell, 117 
Carnot engine, 125 
Causality, 80 ff 
Causal train of events, 85 
Clifford, 28 
Clock, 70 i¥, 176 
Compton, 116, 188 
Continuity, 94 

Conservation of charge, 135, 

136 

Conservative functions, 113 
Constructs, 53 
Correlation, 37 
Cosmic units, 182 
Cross word puzzle, 202 



Descriptive background, 64 
Determinism, 114, 209 ff 
Discontinuous space, 191 
Doppler effect, 166 
ds, 72 

Eddington, 93 

Einstein, VII, i, 2, 3, 4, 7, 8, 
9, 12, 13, 14, 64, 100, 155, 
162, 163, 164, 167, 169, 170, 
171, 172, 173, 175, 176. 177, 
206 

Electrical concepts, 131 f¥ 

Electrical explanation of uni- 
verse, 50 

Electrical mass, 139 

Electric field, 56, 133 

Empiricism, 3 

Energy, 108 f¥, 126 f¥ 

Euclidean space, 14, 15, 16, 18, 
23, 52, 61, 67 

Event, 95, 167 

Explanation, 37 

Explanatory crisis, 41 

Extended time, 77 

Faraday, 44, 57, 58, 209 

Final explanations, 48 

First law of thermodynamics, 

126 f¥ 
Force, 102 ff 

Foucault pendulum, 180, 184 
Fourth dimension, 74 
Future, 222 

Gauss, 15, 34 



228 



INDEX 



"Go and come" time, ii2 
Gravitational constant, 91 

Haldane, 25 
Heat flow, 130 
Heisenberg, 222 
Hertz, 44 
Hoernle, preface 

Identity, 91 fi 
Isolation, 82 

Joule, 124 

Kelvin, 45, 1 10 

Kinetic theory of gases, 40 

Lagrangean equations, 112 

Larmor, 149 

LaRosa, 164 

Length, 9 fi 

Lew^is, 166, 201 

Light, i5o£E 

Local time, 75 

Lorentz, 143, 147, 148, 149 

Mach, 183 

Mass, 102 fi 

Mathematics, 60 f¥ 

Maxwell, 44, 58, 112, 137, 148 

Meaningless questions, 28 f¥ 

Measurement approximate, 33 

Mechanism, 45 

Mercury, 105 

Michelson, 15, 26 

Michelson and Morley, 66 

Models, 45, 52 

Newton, 4, no 

Operational character of con- 
cepts, 5 
Operational thinking, 32 
Optical space, 67 
Ostwald, 109 



Penumbra, 34 
Perrin, 107 
Physical reality, 59 
Planck, 69 

Poincare, 48, 115, 116, 190 
Pythagoras, 61 

Quantum act, 156 
Quantum theory, 40, 47, 186 

Radiation and temperature, 123 
Relative character of knowl- 
edge, 25 
Relativity, 150 ff 
Reynolds, 93 
Rotational motion, 178 
Russell, 205 

Schrodinger, 222 

Space, 66 

Silberstein, 11 

Simplicity of nature, 198 

Simultaneity, 7, 8 

Spring balance, 103 

Statistical methods, 115, 117 

Stress, 54 

Swann, 204 

Table top, 106 
Tactual space, 67 
Temperature, 1 18 ff 
Thermodynamics, 117 
Thing traveling, lOi, 152, 157, 

164 
Time, 69 
Tolman, 200 
Truth, 78 

Turbulent motion, 120, 124 

Velocity, 97 ff, 213 f¥ 
Velocity of light, lOO 

Whitehead, 167 
Wilson, 224 



